I suppose that's a little awkward but I don't see how it's that bad. Easy mistake, how were you to know?If that's the worst you've got you've lived a charmed lifeI don't understand how a will would help, could you explain? I mean, what do I say in the will, "when I'm dead, close my accounts and end my lease cuz I'm dead"? That seems obvious...If you're in NYC and remind me, I'll be there next year!Really sucks for op, but we're talking kids here who don't understand how their actions affect other people. It's a shitty thing to do, but they didn't know that.&gt; girly shit

&gt; go to the horse races

You and I either have very different ideas of what girly shit is, or go to very different horse racesHappy birthday!The decent thing to do would have been to make it a dual birthday party. Even if more people/recognition came from one party, at least SAY it's for both of them.Happy birthday bud.Who has authority if I don't specify it?Ah! Fair enough, I'm just surprised someone would refer to the Kentucky Derby as "the horse races." That seems a bit like referring to the Superbowl as "a football game"Right on. Next time you're in NYC, let me know and I'll buy you a belated birthday drink. In the mean time, play some video games or binge on Netflix.There is literally no one in my life who can contest that. I'd love it to default to my parents, if they're still alive at the time... Which I suspect will be the case for a long while from now.Fair enough. Do you go to races often?Well, hit me up next summer. We can have a drink at my apartment, or if you're not into that we can play some video games. Or board games! Regardless, let me know and I'll find something, I love meeting new people.That sounds a lot more plausible. Well regardless, if you ever find yourself in new York let me know, I'll happily buy you a belated birthday drink and/or hang out and have a fun time with you.

Disclaimer: I don't know how you like to have a fun time but I will do my best to meet any expectations.I know the best board games. Can't wait!Oh. Neat. In America you're not responsible for anyone's debt but your own.These guys are being smug assholes.

Look, I think the selfie craze is as ridiculous as the next guy, but that's how they want to enjoy the game. It's baseball. You don't go to watch the game, you go to hang out and have fun and maybe sometime if you remember watch a little ball. If they want to go and take pictures of themselves or text people, well, whatever man. That's not a lack of parenting. They're adults, they can do whatever they want at the game.

These guys just sound like they're so out of touch with technology, they're bitter about it.that's stupid, unless you know specifically she's going to eat it. as a general rule, that's a terrible idea.do you think this is a knock against americans?

because it really is not.that sounds amazing, i don't see the issuewhy the fuck did i just spend three minutes of my life watching that1) no, you're full of shit. i've worked in plenty of restaurants and as a food vendor. *sometimes* there are assholes like you that think it's acceptable to do whatthefuckever with the food, because "that's how restaurants are," but most of the time there's a clear chain of cleanliness and... *being sanitary* throughout the food's life.

i've had to specifically talk to these assholes before and explain to them it's *not* common and it's not okay for them to be unsanitary.

and 2) oh, great, because some other guys were disgusting it's okay for this guy to be disgusting as well?Sounds like he's confusing an assistant director with an assistant *to the* director.

Good luck.ah, of course, because no one ever washes food before it gets to the vendor. you know, some food even comes from the DIRT? Can you believe they'd serve us food that had dirt on it at one time?

grow up. not everyone is as disgusting in a kitchen as you are.&gt; Cleanliness often goes out the window during lunch and dinner rushes.

maybe at your nasty-ass restaurants.

&gt; but I can promise you that most of the food you're eating has been handled way "worse" than what's shown in this video. 

no, you can't. you just want to.no joke, if this happens (and i've had similar things happen) where the store refuses to do anything, call your credit card company and dispute the charge. "I ordered a non-water damaged fallout anthology. I did not receive a non-water damaged fallout anthology. This charge is invalid. End of story." The bank will usually side with youisn't Wow closer to M^om upside down?what do you mean "and so on"? That's not an easily discernible pattern.we're talking long enough time that there may well not be independent nations at that point. we're talking thousands of years. speaking about it in terms of china's and russia's censorship policies is kind of missing the point.I'm sympathetic, but at the same time, it is kind of dumb to do stunts that could result in losing your bike, while aiming right for your pool.

It's not like he was way on the other side of the house or something and some freak accident caused the bike to wrest itself free of his control, drive off the driveway, around the house, and dunk itself in the pool.

He simply shouldn't have been doing those stunts next to the pool.

Doesn't mean he deserved it though.I dunno, what's the smallest sized construction crew you can have and still build something?

I can build a table by myself, but I'd need a 50+ man team to build a skyscraper (I'm assuming. I've never built a skyscraper).

I'd recommend you start meeting with a producer and your DP to start putting a budget together and figuring out what will be most beneficial for what you want to do.the actors are what perform the actions and say the dialogue, they're the most important things on set

directors are who tell them what to do, they're the most important things on set

the lens is what focuses the light into the camera, it's the most important thing on set

water keeps everyone from passing out on set, it's the most important thing

we could do this all day.First, keep in mind he doesn't owe you anything. He has absolutely no obligation to bring you on for work outside of class. His only obligation is to fulfill his teaching duties. He doesn't HAVE to give anyone else a chance, and looking at it from his perspective-- why would he? He found a group of people that work well with him, why would he possibly blow them off, people he's been working with for years, just for the sake of taking a risk on someone new?

You gotta remember, he's playing for keeps, and that means getting the people he thinks have the best chance of not fucking up *his* shoot. That means getting people he knows and trusts, not random students he's never worked with just for the sake of "giving them a chance."

So, what do you do from here? Talk to him personally. See if you can get some time after class or in the halls to explain, face to face, that you'd love the opportunity to come on board one of his projects and work with him and learn from him. Explain to him your skill sets and ask, if there's ever an opportunity, to bring you on board.

There probably won't be. He's already got his guys. But you never know when the perfect storm of conflicts is going to come up and he'll need to draw from someone else.

Also, keep in mind he chose the people he did for a reason-- he had the chance to directly view their performance and work ethic in class. And he saw yours too, and passed you over. Think about that, and how you'd rather present yourself to him in class and through your work in order to impress him.very little of it is film school talk, usually. sometimes it is, the theory part of it anyway (e.g. "This shot was really important to do as a close-up to convey the inner turmoil of blah blah blah") but most times it's just the cast/crew remembering funny times and telling stories from setJust popping in here, but Dr. Who also comes up on syfy channel (though I think a bit delayed as BBC america), it and bbc america are also on most people's cable plans-- because if they have cable, they have a full package (things have changed a lot in 8 years... "basic cable" isn't really an option anymore, or at least it's very rare)

but most importantly...

dr. who hits netflix and amazon prime a few months after it airs, which is *really* where people are watching it.in my experience, the last couple seasons have been going for more of a mid to late 20's demo

i suppose that could just be because i'm in my mid to late 20's, but that's where i see most of the fandom. and i went to the dr. who bar in brooklyn not too long ago, that demographic seemed to hold True (then again, we're talking about a novelty bar in brooklyn)No it isn't. Why would you even think that's the reason? The reason they can get away with it is *the first amendment.* It's asinine to say including "according to sources" is what gets them off the hook-- that's not True at all. The repercussions would be exactly the same whether they included those three words or not.

Their goal was not to incite a riot, their goal was not to maliciously damage a reputation. What exactly do you think the legal issues would be for them if they didn't say anything about "sources say"?

e: can't say i didn't expect the downvotes, but it's disappointing that many of you have such a weak grasp on citizens' rights in this countryIt's not like their regular drink prices are bad for the area.1) You're misunderstanding. I never said the first amendment gives you carte blanche to say whatever you want. I said it gave constitutional protections to the news to report the news-- it even gives them protections to report the news *incorrectly.* More on that later. Please don't put words in my mouth.

2) 

&gt; However, if my neighbor Susan said that (and I can prove it to avoid similar suits by her)

No you can't. That is indeed defamation if it meets the requirements of defamation (whether susan said it or not and whether you attribute it to her is not a factor).

&gt; then there's technically nothing wrong with me saying "Susan said neighbor Joe is a child molester!"

Yes there is. That's defamation, if your intent was to knowingly and maliciously damage Joe's reputation (if you're just gossiping, that's a different matter, but gossip can have the intent to defame someone as well). It's still defamation even if you cite a third party-- that has no bearing on the situation at all. You are mistaken when you say this is a technical loophole. It's not.

It's not against the law to report the news incorrectly. If they do, they are **honor bound** to print a retraction, but not legally bound.

Hell, it's not even against the law to lie. That's right, you have the constitutional right to lie, and you have the right to do it on air. There are limitations to this (you can't lie to defraud someone for monetary gain, you can't lie under oath, etc.), but there is no law that simply says you can not make unTrue statements in public. The news can say that polar bears are invading Jamaica and break *absolutely no laws.*

*E: More realistic example: Every year the news reports Santa's progress on delivering toys to children throughout the world. This is a lie. Sorry to say, Santa does not exist. They are not tracking anyone delivering presents to anyone. This is not a malicious lie, it is not an intent to defame anyone, but every year they go on air and lie to everyone and it's completely legal.*

So, again, I ask what you think the charge would be against CNN? Defamation? They did not report it with the malicious intent to damage someone's reputation. They simply reported the news.

Everything they say has a source. This does not protect them from breaking the law, but they didn't break the law. No laws were broken here, nobody is legally entitled to any damages or compensation in any way. **IF** someone can prove the media had a specific agenda to knowingly and maliciously damage Toby Reynolds's reputation, then they'd have a suit. But that is not what happened.

tl;dr the media is legally allowed to be wrong

source: first amendment of the us constitution&gt; it's not reflective of her inability to do them

Um, it is literally reflective of her inability to do them.Fine, whatever.The problem with this is you're assuming everyone deserves a top position out of college.

I guarantee with the right connections people will pay pa's before they've demonstrated their worth, who will then grow into grips and electrics and camera assistants, or move into other departments. All while getting paid.

The real "issue" isn't that people have to work for free at first, it's that cameras are cheap so everyone wants to skip the work and the ladder climbing and just be a cinematographer off the bat.

I guess what I take issue with is the idea that people have to work for free to demonstrate their value. They don't have to. They can, and that's fine, but they don't have to, they'd just rather not be a PA.It's not accurate, but it's not inaccurate either. I've known people to make all of the rates listed (for the jobs I know, I have no idea how much a production secretary or q CEO makes) but I've also known people to make more or less. A big part of the problem is it seemed to jump before pay for television and pay for block buster features and pay for low budget Indies, but only occasionally noted it.What gear?&gt; (Anybody who has reason to think that usually figured it out fairly quickly.)

Tim Drake. Tim Drake is the only person to piece it together just from public persona and studying Batman (and Robin).&gt; the only real life analog I can think of is trying to spot a celebrity passing off as a "normal" person

So, first of all, this is probably the closest real life analog we have, but it's still nowhere close to superhero alien v. bumbling news reporter. Imagine how many people *don't* think of the guy on the subway as potentially being a celebrity, and multiply that by a factor of ten. It would be WAY harder for people to make that connection.

However you do make a good point with

&gt; However, people knowing him for years (like any of his coworkers at the Daily Planet) really shouldn't be missing this.

But then, maybe it's just a personal joke of "Hey my co-worker looks like, *exactly* like Superman without his glasses!" We all know people who look *exactly* like celebrities (or even just other people). It's a weird, funny thing that we sometimes tease them about then move on.

Sure. EVENTUALLY someone would notice that (to borrow an old trope) Superman and Clark are never in the same room at the same time (or whatever)

but that's where the second part comes in:

DC keeps goddamn rebooting everything so Superman's only really ever been active 5-10 years. 10 years is the MAX. Right when it reeeaaaalllllyyyy starts to stretch believability, BAM, DC hits us with a reboot.

In other words:

&gt; How many times has Jimmy told Clark "wow! I wish you were there! Superman beat up the bad guy and you missed it!"

Currently? Before the big reveal? It was maybe like twice.

And, if you really wanna get down to sinister-ness... it's possible anytime anyone came close to figuring it out, some psychic (like Zatanna) may have... adjusted their brainwaves to stay away from those particular thoughts (as we know, wouldn't be the first time)Yes and no. The thing you have to remember is Nolan just plays games and tells lies to the media all the time. He said Joker never would've been in the third. He's also said he won't do a third because now he can't do it with Ledger. He's also said he was never going to do a third no matter what.

(for that matter, he said he'd never do a second)

so... who really knows. Honestly I'm not sure Nolan even knows. I can't possibly imagine Nolan never once sat in bed thinking of cool ways to put Ledger into the third. But obviously they never got into development before Ledger died (they actually were still working in TDK when he died, I'm pretty sure they were even still doing reshoots but Ledger had finished his part), so no official plan was ever made.google jim lee batman 608 in google images

find the highest resolution you can

send it to a place that does custom printingAlso, it's cool how OP's friend managed to rack focus from a subject thousands of feet away to one eight inches away that quickly.

(for anyone unconvinced you can literally see the shitty hack job they did with the line around the beak and some of the feather)No. Alfred's past needs to stay in his past until it unexpectedly shows up to help Batman out. Alfred is a much more interesting character when you have to remind yourself "Oh yeah, he had a life before the Waynes" and then feel a little bad that you forgot that... and then remember Alfred wouldn't have you think of him any other way.I fucking hate Morrison, with a passion

and I enjoyed his Batman &amp; Robin run

so there's that.No one wonders that.Yeah but I imagine there are costs that are much higher than just being tripled, such as needing a minivan instead of keeping your regular car, possibly needing a home extension or even a new home for a nursery for three kids instead of one or two, etcWhy not just get a vasectomy at that point?Personal preference: too aggressive can be a turn off, but a little blatant communication is welcome. Unfair as it is there's more of a danger of a guy being called a creep for making an unwanted move than the other way around, so we have to be really really really sure if we're going to. Makes things a lot easier if the gal can just say "you know, I'm very attracted to you." &gt; Needless to say my mother was furious, but honestly it was her fault for not getting me the actual shoes in the first place.

Yeah, that's definitely how SHE saw it.It's entirely possible his dad *did* realize that and was pissed anyway. My dad asked me to put the keys to his car on his dresser once and I somehow lost them, he was pissed and I thought it was because I had rendered his car a completely useless hunk of metal stuck in our driveway.to be fair, for all you know they were themed novelty shots for the office holiday partywouldn't that just give frogs the advantage and continue to fuck up the ecosystem?i don't get why you people think this solves the problemMine has some short somewhere and makes noise no matter what until you hit the "reset" button

the worst part is my roommate is somehow completely oblivious to this fact and every single day i have to get up from bed to go hit the reset button to stop the goddamn incessant beep-beep... beep-beep.... beep-beepuse nail clippers. seriously, my quality life went up immensely when i made clipping all those cuticle bits off a part of my morning routineand then when the person who finally picks up doesn't feel like dealing with you they "transfer" you and hang up on you. this may or may not be preceded by a round robin of departments transferring you back and forthyou are wrong, fuck you raisin-loverthat's a wonderful theory. now go try it and see how you're wrong.you don't come to new york often, i take it. there are many *absolutely amazing* pizzerias in new york, but chances are very high that the one on the nearest corner is total shit.

there's no, like, standard of quality required to be a new york pizzeria. new york has a reputation for great pizza, because we have the oldest and several of the best... which caused the city to be completely riddled with cheap, crappy pizza places looking to cash in on that reputation.

i'm not trying to give you a hard time, just saying, if you come to new york and get the pizza from the nearest corner place and think it's great... you are going to be *amazed* when you find some of the actual best places.

(pro-tip, a quick and easy way to tell if the pizza will at least be pretty good or pretty bad is to look at the kitchen workers. are they actual italians, or are they mexicans? say something in spanish and see how many people respond)throw a toddler-sized doll once you get in there and say "Oh no Spider-man, save the kid!" and then run away before he figures it outyeah but don't be sad, you'll still get to spend time with all those people you thought were your friends and family...


...in court.teens, man. teens can do some really fucked up shit with no empathy.

not all of them of course, but you don't have to be in a particularly bad or fucked up place... just young, eager to impress your friends and lacking empathy.&gt; it's what humanity acts like when it is totally anonymous.

sorry, but 4chan isn't a fair sample of "humanity"

there's a pretty specific demographic that visits-- hell, even *knows* about-- 4chan.hey, kill any snails lately snail killer?&gt; I am actually gay

how would you know? you obviously don't understand sexuality.I worked on commission as an electronics salesman

I definitely wasn't the highest seller, but I still made a fair amount of money by:

1) Being friendly and charming (but NOT overbearing)

2) Being knowledgeable about the product (this is more rare than you may think)

and most importantly

3) Genuinely helping a customer find what's best for them, rather than what I want them to purchase. I would let them know if an upgrade or a special feature would be useful for them, I'd let them know all the details of the warranty and let them decide if the money was worth the ease of repair, etc.

I tend to believe people can see through bullshit pretty easily, so while *great* salesmen can convince someone to buy something they don't need, I could still make money by people choosing to buy from me because I'm trustworthy instead of blowing me off because they could tell I was full of shit.As you may be finding out, it will boggle your mind the number of people (students, even!) who will defend this to the death. I honestly don't understand why people *don't* think working for someone deserves a fair wage.

And by the way, I am well aware of the legal definition of internship, I am also well aware of the recent court rulings that basically Noneified most of it, and even if they hadn't happened-- of *course* working a new job benefits the employee with experience, that's what *always* happens, that's the definition of experience. Internships *also* benefit the employer (even under the letter of the law), it is not a fair trade for monetary compensation.if you liked grimaldi's, give julianna's (next door) a try next time. my absolute favorite pizza spot in nyci'm almost positive that's not the actual hook, just similar enough to make people think it is (probably copyright/royalty reasons... even though WB might own the rights, they'd still have to pay various royalties)&gt; his kids make him get a driver because of his age.

This scene amuses me. "Dad, you *have* to get a driver. End of story."

"I'm a billionaire, I don't have to do anything! I'll cut you off and cancel your credit cards, I swear to god!"

"Dad, you forced me to live a normal life and make my own way. I support myself because of you, remember?"

"...shit. I knew that'd bite me in the ass."that is the worst warp stabilization i have ever seen. i'd rather just see the shakey handheld bullshitit's definitely sit on your ass great

what it's not is start your own mega-company with no major financial risk great.

but most adults could take $3mil and not have to work another day in their lives if they didn't want to. they couldn't live in extravagance but if they wanted to sit on their asses for the rest of their lives, they could and never have to worry about it&gt; There's something

Is the "something" that it is the opposite of it?

I mean, isn't what you're saying basically the same thing as saying "There's something about the color blue that's not red"Build one. Should be pretty simple, can probably just modify parts of your school's standing sets if they have any (ask your theater department)I personally would not be interested in hiring someone who markets themselves as a video editor, audio designer and composer. I would hire separate specialized people for each of those tasks.Yes there is. There's the student's claim that the prof said it was on a wednesday.

What you meant to say was there's no evidence the student was mistaken. Literally all the evidence we have from this picture says that the prof said the test was on a wednesday. Anything else is an assumption you're making.I'll study for tests earlier when profs start not scheduling all their tests during the same time period and stop having them involve recent material (causing me to study the night before anyway).

Actually, I won't study for tests ever again because I finished college years ago. Fuck yeah!I believe that the ruling was that an IP address *alone* is not enough to identify someone.

I don't know the specifics, but it seems plausible if someone could reasonably prove you were the only one with access to the IP it could be used to identify you.I'd rather have the waters be a little more clear but still muddied enough to protect my rights

than have to deal with the hassle and life-ruining accusation of possessing child porn


but that's just meI'm not sure you understand how evidence works. You seem to be confusing it with "proof," which isn't a legally recognized term. Because pretty much nothing is actual *proof*.It kind of makes sense.

Artists and record companies don't really put as much effort into catching this stuff as you'd think. They pick a few MAJOR songs, occasionally a few major albums, and monitor those. And they don't even catch them all.

It's pretty easy to believe you downloaded 1000 songs and only hit one that was a major/popular enough single that someone caught it.by a lawyer presenting them as evidence? what are you missing here? This is how evidence works. One guy says "Here's a thing we'd like to introduce as evidence." Another guy may or may not say "Here are some reasons that evidence may not be True." Then the judge or jury decides who to believe.

Just because the evidence is difficult to verify doesn't make it not evidence. Just like an eyewitness testimony is still evidence, but a lawyer can cast doubt on it by saying things like the person wasn't wearing their glasses, it was dark, they could be lying, etc.

Still evidence.It is that simple. Well, depends on the state. The crime may be not having proper certifications and safety standards, etc. but the crime wouldn't be prostitution.

(I believe you also need intent to distribute, at least in most states)

But good luck getting a prostitute to agree to a recording of her prostitution.that's not... how that works.I imagine people have something set up to record, say, the previous 30 seconds.

So in a way, yes they record 100% of their game time, but they immediately erase everything after 30 seconds (or whatever timer they have set up)Focus is... well, what's in focus in an image. There's no way both the bird and the tower would have been able to be in focus at the same time, so the photographer would have had to change the focus from something very far away to something very close, in the split second it would've taken for him to register a bird flying by.I hate Origins, I will always hate Origins, it's a flawed game and the flaws haven't and won't go away.

I can't speak for anyone else. But when Origins and City are both sitting right there on my shelf to each other, I can't imagine *ever* deciding to pick up Origins againI do feel it's weird, I also felt like they changed it from Dick just for the sake of changing it, rather than any particular good reason.

But whatever. It didn't bother me nearly as much as Batman being a douchebag to all of his partners. Why even have partners if you're going to refuse to let them work with you?racking is quickly changing focus from one thing to anotherI believe the city being evacuated was done so it wouldn't feel unrealistic that there wasn't a (technologically impossible) city full of actual people. Other games have kiiiind of made very sparse "fully populated" cities work, but it's always felt pretty unrealistic to me and AK was obviously going for full realism

also, so tank battles could take placeSure...

but I also want it to be sixty bucks or less and be done in two or three years. I don't think there's much chance of seeing what you're suggesting, despite it being cool.FWIW new york isn't all that different, and Gotham is inspired from NYC.You might be better served getting some equipment from your school and making your own video with friends. That way you'll get a little more film making experience while creating something that can be tailored to show off your editing skills.Yes, lenses can make a huge difference in visual quality. No, it's probably not the best place to put your money. I'd first look at making sure all crew is getting paid and see if there's any helpful positions you're missing. Next I'd make sure there's plenty of good food, water and coffee for everyone. Then I'd focus on production design. After that I'd probably opt for better audio gear.

THEN I might think about renting some lenses, but I might go for better lights first depending on your needs.You know what I would've liked to see, is not even a "fully populated" Gotham, still keep the "most people have evacuated" idea... but then have some civilians out. They could occasionally get beat up by thugs (a la spider-man 2) and you'd have to go save them. Most of the time I just ignored roving bands of thugs, but I'd sure as hell jump down there to save some people!that was a special side questan f22 would not allow that great of depth of fieldReally? I felt they were pretty lame. They diminished batman's detective skills to him basically just turning on his detective computer and letting it do the rest.

The problem with trying to recreate making the player the best detective in the world is that... the player's not going to be the best detective in the world. So you either have to make it impossible to solve or dumb it down.and i still hate the game. i'm honestly shocked anyone is saying it's their favoritetwo of the nyc boroughs are indeed their own islands, two others share a third island (along with the rest of long island). The bronx is the only one that's not on any island, which could be comparable to gotham's "mainland."

The point isn't that they're exactly the same, it's that there's not exactly no precedent for having a city take place over multiple islands.well, my point is there's no realistic f-stop which would give you the depth of field to capture that image. just because something is set to the hyperfocal distance doesn't mean everything is in focus.fwiw those are different gogglesshutter speed has nothing to do with focus.

honestly, you barely grasp understanding that these terms even exist. i strongly encourage you to do more reading and research on photography and cinematography if you want to learn more.Well, parks also have the "take nothing with you" rule, which you broke by eating the apple in the first place (and again by taking the core with you).

What are you worried about here? Legality? No one will bother you with this but technically you could be fined.

Morally? You screwed up by eating the apple, it's not your tree and not yours to take.

Environmentally? The apple might have just stayed where it was... but it may well have spread out, been eaten by another animal, etc. Either way, you messed up what nature was going to do with it.

But at the end of the day if it's going to biodegrade relatively quickly it shouldn't be a burden on your mind.haha, they're mutant freaks!yeah, i actually can't draw though

ps replicating doesn't count. that's like saying anyone can write a novel if you can open a book and type up what's on the page

e: it's neat how everyone just told me i was wrong without asking for any kind of explanation or reasoningthe very first time a video game connected to the internet.It's been three hours, cough it upAs a former wedding videographer, weddings always, ALWAYS get delayed. I've never seen a bride walk down the aisle on time. One thing or another causes a small delay and they add up.Hey no fair calling dibs, you can't go back for seconds until you've finished what you haveMost people can do a fair job of replicating something if they learn the technical ability (for drawing, that's "holding a pencil over paper and pushing down")

i think you and i both know that's not what someone means when they ask "can you draw?"...dude, you tagged this as no spoilers and then showed the final cutscene... even if it was just the end, that's a pretty big spoiler. and there's no way to deny it wasn't that, because it ran right into the creditsnightwing could use a motorcycle, and they could easily modify his suit for the arkham-verse to have glide capabilities. hell, his name's literally got "wing" in it, it wouldn't even be that much of a stretch (and it's not like they didn't modify the hell out of his suit anyway)

they made it work with catwoman in AC, i don't see why they couldn't make it work in AK as welli don't need *anything* in the game. everything in the game, as well as the game itself, is a want. if you want to get pedantic about it.

but if it makes you feel better, pretend there's a parenthetical "to make the game a satisfying batman game and conclusion to rocksteady's trilogy" after "want"yeah, but it's a movie studio, not a batcave, and it's got no alfred


so


not really the same thingThat's definitely how I was imagining using it.My plan is to wait until I find a bunch of anonymous post it notes to myself with personal details.Yep. I can recreate something perfectly if I can see it and can "grid" out where all the lines are in relation to each other

But ask me to come up with something original and I just can't. The eyes will be way too big, and differently sized, and the mouth will end up where the nose is, etc. Not on purpose, I just won't be able to put it together freely. I can't even create the thing in my head.And yet there would be (and often is) a MASSIVE outcry if anyone ever found out hulu was using information they collect on you to market to you.

Instead I'll have to continue watching car commercials instead of seeing sweet new video game or movie trailersWell, what are you worried about? You didn't answer.I dated a girl once who was very conservative. She made a big deal about what a long process it is to get ordained. I told her I once got ordained on the internet. I am an ordained minister. She didn't believe me.

I couldn't find the email confirming it... So right in front of her on my phone I got ordained again in thirty seconds.

She was not amused. I however, definitely was.I don't get why people upvote this shit, and I definitely don't get why they feel obligated to do it. It's like the nineties when everyone would say "psyche!" After a story. It's not funny, it's not clever... My bad for not assuming you were just flat out lying for no reason, I guess.**This has nothing to do with shutter speed.** Stop citing shutter speeds for how this could be in focus. And aperture has nothing to do with shutter speed either. You're just mixing up all kinds of terms. Again, I strongly urge you to go look some of this stuff up. And not on wikipedia, because you're not going to understand what it's telling you.

I honestly can't tell if you're trolling or not. If you want to look up some facts at this [depth of field chart](http://www.dofmaster.com/doftable.html) you can see how an aperture of f1.4 on a 24mm lens does *not* give you a depth of field from 2ft to infinity (at any focusing distance). It's closer to 23 feet to infinity at a focusing distance of forty four feet.

I don't know what you think hyperfocal distance is, but it's not what you think it is. It's the focusing distance at which the depth of field is the greatest. You can't just pick whatever you want it to be. That doesn't even make sense.[Don't stop there](/r/tits+ass+titsandass)All chaps are assless.The best thing you can do, if you have a skilled DP, is find reference material and send it to them. I *love* when people can tell me "I want it to look like this TV show, but with camera movements from this movie" or that kind of thing (obviously the discussion will be more in-depth and not as blunt, as I mention below).

You can even watch it with your DP and point out what you do/don't like about the particular material as it relates to your film.

Above all, even when discussing the reference material, I would stay far away from specifics-- "I like how there's shadow here, I want the same thing but with more light on them," "I like the colors there but I want it even more colorful," that kind of thing. It'll be far more useful if you mention what *tone* and feeling and emotion you like about any particular thing-- it's very likely your DP will be better able to pick up exactly what's causing that emotion than you are. For instance, you might say you like the colors of one scene, when what you really like is the contrast from the previous scene. You may say you like the shadows of a scene when what you really like is that it's underexposed (*not* heavy in shadows).

That's my suggestion. Just remember, your DP is going to be better than you at figuring out what can be done visually to create a tone-- so you should tell him the tone and let him figure out how to get there.I'm not particularly great at coming up with creative titles, so I usually just figure out what my movie is about in a few words and name it that. If anyone can give you tips on how to come up with great, creative, unique titles, and you're able to do that, go for it. If you're like me though, that's not going to happen so just figure out something descriptive that's not too dumb.On the lower level you'd contact friends and colleagues to see who's out there who can do great work for you (if you don't know anyone personally)

on the higher level you'd pick one of the reputable vfx companies, likely a company that someone in the production has a relationship with.

So, for yourself? You can get some low, low work done if you just need a portfolio builder by browsing craigslist or wherever people are posting vfx jobs these days, but for any real work you'll probably need to start developing relationships and connections with filmmakers (as we all need to at some point or another)

ps I'm not heavy into the vfx world but from everything I've heard it's most common to get a job at these vfx companies by knowing someone who works there and mentoring under them until a higher position opens.Your art degree is not going to help you get a job in the film industry (hell, a film degree doesn't even help with that). So you tell us. Is your time in school benefitting you in any other ways? Are you expanding your creativity? Learning new techniques? Making connections in the film industry?

If you're not, you may be wasting your time. Your degree isn't going to be of any help to you in the film industry, so you need to find other ways that school can be a benefit to you.

For me, easily the biggest benefit of school was that it gave me protection, money and time from the "real world" to practice my craft. You're allowed to make mistakes as a student you're not allowed to make as a professional, and you can work for cheaper as a student to build your connections and portfolio while living off grants and student loans and things.this doesn't help this time around, but as chris mentioned you're missing some things, specifically two major factors:

the first, is give them a set limit of revisions. Of *course* they're going to keep coming back with changes if they're on your time and cost the client nothing. "Hey can we move that text up a little bit?" "Thanks but now I think it'd look better lower." "Great, but lower than that." "You know what, it was better where it started." etc. etc.

I usually do two rounds of revisions. You want more than that, you gotta pay for it. (In practice, if there's one or two small things to fix up at the end, I'll do it without charge, I've never had anyone take advantage of that and keeps client relationships healthy)

The second factor is: *put a time limit on it.* I often do two weeks to respond with notes after the first delivery, and a week after the second delivery, though sometimes I'll change this depending on my schedule or the amount they're paying.

Before I started doing this I absolutely had people e-mailing me *months* after the delivery wanting changes.

Anyway.... you didn't do that. So yeah, if I were in your situation I'd send an e-mail along the lines of "Hey, just checking in and wanted to make sure you received and got a chance to view the video." You may want to also say "If you have any notes, please let me know as soon as you can," but that's up to you.Then they'd do the other thingthey're really not, though. there's no clear linear progression. it's basically a random smattering of "not standing" sprites.It's unlikely that engaging in revenge tactics is helping him cope. The far more likely situation is that it's digging him deeper into a bad place and preventing him from moving on in life.

All while, y'know, being pretty mean and childish.I really don't think I am. He's sitting in '99. He's laying down in '04. Hell, his '96 is almost the same pose as '02, but '02 is from a different angle and somewhat better graphics.

It really is just a general smattering of poses. The only real trend is that as the years go on we tend to be able to see the character better, whether through different poses or different angles.it's almost as though she were portraying a character rather than stating truthful facts about herselfOf course not; he's lying down in '04. Like I said.So yeah, a few others have pointed it out but here's the deal:

In their world (and ours), you can't give someone a prison sentence who's been shown to be not mentally competent (and some other things)-- in other words, insane. Every villain in Arkham, the insane asylum, has successfully used insanity as a criminal defense in court. Whether or not Joker-- or any of the other nutters-- would actually fit a criminally insane defense has been explored and debated at length, but it doesn't really matter-- in the world of Gotham, they do. So, they can't be killed by the state. They can only be detained in Arkham until they've been cleared by a doctor as having recovered from their insanity (which is occasionally how a few of them "get out"... I think Joker has actually had Harley declare him sane a couple times, and of course there was TDKR with both Joker and Harvey)

There was, as someone else pointed out, one time where an ambitious DA wanted to make a splash and managed to pull some strings to get Joker tried as sane-- and when he was convicted, he *was* given a death sentence. I don't recall the details but that's the gist of it.

The twist here-- and, spoilers for Death Row-- is that Batman actually went back to the case and managed to prove Joker was *innocent* of those particular murders. In other words, Joker had not been found sane and guilty of any crime, so back to Arkham he went.Are you providing equipment and recording space? If not, I'd try to get them to say what they have budgeted for your position or the project, but as a student I think in the range of twenty an hour is about right. I wouldn't go much lower and honestly, if they want to go much higher they might be looking for someone a bit beyond the skills and experience of a student. I know, more money sounds great, but it can be damaging if someone is expecting a level of quality you can't deliver.Big soft light on her, a bit camera left and not too far above eye level, I'm guessing a kino flo. Pretty close to her. The rest of the room is probably ambiently lit, probably just an open window. Fairly shallow depth of field, probably caused more by having a longer focal length than anything done intentionally (the dof greatly decreases on the close-up of the product). Uhh what else. Note she's not actually sitting on the bed, she's probably on a chair or stool positioned next to the bed.

Camera settings? I dunno. Probably small variations on the standard settings, there's nothing real intense going on here. Note that the color temp isn't consistent between the two videos. It's a little colder in the above and a little more magenta in the bottom.

I'll also add this set-up isn't particularly interesting or well done for my taste, it's just quick and efficient. If you can narrow down what it is you like about this I can help guide you on what aspects to shoot for and which ones to relax on. My gut says what you're probably reacting to is 1) soft light 2) subject brighter than background 3) shallow(ish) depth of field. If it were me I'd get the light a bit harder to give a bit more shape to the face, I'd make the background not *quite* as dark because that yells that the subject is being lit to me, I'd also try to add some splashes of light or something to the background to break it up and I might give her a bit of a shoulder kicker or something to make it a bit less boring. But, the one light set-up they have is quick and efficient, so, y'know, pick your battles.

ps changed my mind about the background, it's probably lit artificially from camera right with another big soft source. it's fairly ambient so it could still be a window but the shadows are consistent from the two videos, so i'm thinking it's more likely another light. wouldn't be surprised if these guys just got two kinoflos (or something similar) and called it a day.I'm not sure what else help you want... Put your subject on a chair next to a bed, stick a kino flo on a stand about five to ten feet away from the subject and left of the camera, point it at your subject. Get another kino flo, put it camera right and point it at the background. Adjust to taste. I'm gonna take a shot in the dark and say you're on Canon's rebel line? Put the camera ten feet or so from your subject, put your lens at around 40mm-50mm and set your f stop somewhere around f4. Make any adjustments you need.

Then tell me how close I was to all that.really, the key concepts in all those videos are

1) subject is lit relatively flat and separate from the background (also lit very flat). this is achieved here mostly just from the distance between the subject and the background (part of why they're on chairs and not on the bed) AND by having the light close to the subject (which makes the light fall off faster) but if you can't manage it quite right, just point the light sideways so the subject's shadow is falling on a wall that's *not* in frame

and 2) the shallow-ish depth of field. you can get there like i said pretty easily by getting to around 50mm and keeping a fair amount of distance between subject and background (again, why they're on a chair and not the bed)

so yeah. subject on a chair next to a bed, one light pointed at your subject, one light pointed at your background, 50mm, you're good to go.

good luckSecond scenario is likely that A gave B lottery tickets to hold on to in a completely unrelated event to his birthday. This is going to be trickier than it seems, the judge is definitely gonna have some questions on this one.to a lot of broadway performers, that crowd is the *only* crowd that matters.Weren't you even paying attention to that movie? We'd need the *best* damn oil drillers out there. A team so good it wouldn't even make sense to try to teach astronauts how to do their job.People keep saying that, but did Google come to my birthday party? Did Google spot me ten bucks for lunch? Did Google stop me from drunk dialing my ex?

No, man. Google was never there for me. Some fuckin' friend.i'm a small-time freelance cinematographer and share a name with a very famous oscar-winning director/screenwriter. i'm in the same boat as you, unless someone already knows how to find me i'm basically ungoogleable.

and yeah, i do occasionally get people thinking an oscar-winning director wants to be camera man on their low budget documentary. it's amusing.It really annoys me how those ads show a bunch of totally plausible scenarios and *immediately* after claims sex is no accident. Come on, you just showed us that's not True!I'm with ya. It sucks, but I have a very good friend whom I knew was cheating on his gf. I think it was shitty of him, but it was none of my business.

(it eased it somewhat that i was pretty sure the gf knew and didn't care-- one of those "so long as i don't find out about it and it stops when we're married" kinds of things... not that that makes it okay)FWIW there *have* been cases of people with vasectomies-- **even after they've been verified by doctors as infertile**-- getting someone pregnant. doctors can be mistaken, the sperm count can be too low to catch but still there, and sometimes vasectomies can spontaneously reverse themselves years after the fact.

this is all incredibly rare and all, but i wouldn't use a girl claiming she's pregnant as the *only* evidencei think what happened was, imagine someone usually e-mails you from imail on their phone or whatever, but you found out one particular e-mail was actually sent from gmail.google.com, as in they logged in to their gmail account on a browser to send it.She was spending the night at a guy's house whom she had admitted to having feelings for, and OP obviously did not know. From that alone, we don't know that she was *specifically* lying, but chances are good she had said or indicated she was at home, or may have said she wouldn't spend time with the guy. At the very least, even if none of that's True, it's kind of fucked up that your gf would spend the night at a guy's house she has feelings for and not tell you. I have friends of either gender stay at my place all the time, and it's nbd, but i always tell my so when they've stayed over (or occasionally I'll do a blanket "So-and-so has been spending a lot of time here and has been sleeping over a lot, just so you know")As I said above, from the posts OP gave us there's technically no evidence of a lie, but it's very, very likely that there was a lie involved and OP just didn't mention the specifics (such as, she had mentioned she was home and going to bed when in reality she was at the guy's place)Hey man, accidents happen. What if he was in the bathroom but tripped and fell right as she was on her hands and knees scrubbing the floor outside the bathroom so it would be clean and presentable for when you got back, huh?

Or what if the guy had just got a snake bite on his dick and she was sucking the venom out? She could have been trying to save his life! And instead of telling her that you can't suck the venom out of a bite and the best thing to do is call 9-1-1 in that situation, you just dumped her. Now she'll never know.i'm right there with ya. it's not even like i'm thinking of the ex, and it doesn't matter how long it's been, it's just that habit.I like to think of it as you're conning science. As in, science may empirically say one course of action is the most rational, but if you *con science* and do something different, you may follow an irrational but morally superior path of action.is feeling like you've been fucked a real thing?it's like a car wreck. i know it probably doesn't apply to me, i know it *could* happen to me but probably won't... but watching it just makes me all the more disturbed and anxious.


but i keep watching anyway.it's weird how some people, when they ask a question say "question." As though they need to clarify what form of sentence they're about to speak.

also sorry you got cheated onyour subconscious often picks up on things you can't or won't pick up on consciouslynothing wrong with preferences, what sucks is she went out with him in the first place despite being against her preference when it was obviously a dealbreaker.Does anyone else think it's not *that bad* if they were in a committed, sexual relationship and he stopped once he realized she was asleep? Yeah, he should have gotten permission before hand, but talking about filing a police report seems a bit much....ah, i didn't see the no condom part. but still, this seems like a "hey, don't do that again" kind of talk. not a "i'm calling the cops and ruining your life you rapist" talk.

the key here, i think, is that he stopped when he realized she was asleep. so him taking advantage of her being asleep doesn't make any sense.Yeah, it's like... do they expect him to charge himself money to take his own picture off the site? Do carpenters bill themselves if they build a cabinet for their kitchen?see though, yours is actually (technically) illegal because those fries belonged to someone else and you just didn't charge yourself for them. OR they were given to you as compensation for working there. Either way, different from what the guy did.When you mentioned all the bad shit he and his family did, I thought "Hey my family is actually totally clean, I could do something like this and not fear similar retribution"

then I realized I never *would* do something like this, and neither would anyone else with a clean record (and clean family record).HR won't wonder why he changed his name?That's basically it. In the world of comics super-intelligence from non-metas is pretty common. To be an interesting villain, and one that can keep up with Batman, they need to be *insanely* (put intended) intelligent.i dunno, supes has brainiac and luthor who are two of the smartest beings in the galaxy right there, and darkseid's a genius combatant/generali liked the spy v. spy parts1) that's kind of the idea of it. it's just an interesting way of twisting data

2) the important thing to remember is when we *first* heard it (and the fact that we're hearing it now again in a different form cements my belief it's just an urban legend) was that he would actually *make* more money in that time than $100, not that his investments would earn it. Therefore, in a direct correlation of time to money it's literally not worth his time to bend down and pick up a $100, because his one second (I heard it as four seconds) would be more valuably spent doing other things.

Now, that makes a *little* more sense but it's still a twisting of the facts, because he's not literally making a set amount for every second he works. He's not hourly, and if he was his pay wouldn't be subdivided into seconds.it's really depressing that what a quarter is to me, is equivalent to more than my entire life's debt which is crushing me right now and causing untold stress and anxiety, to bill gates.i mean, yeah, but in the mean time think of all the lower people it has to go through whose lives are improved by itand the press can not violate any of those special clauses, but none of them have anything to do with reporting the news. releasing the names of shooters is reporting the news. you may not like it, i may not like it, but it's news.

(and i believe the press always has the right to release the names of anyone they choose, but are sometimes not given the identity as a matter of policy by the police... though if you have a source proving me wrong i'd be interested in seeing it)Hey OP, how about this one:

Let's go back to what the point of the news *is.* As a way to inform the public of the current events of the land.

This is an important thing to keep in mind. People have been tossing around first amendment excuses, but no one's mentioned the reason is that it's important we never let the government for *any* reason prevent the news, legally, from informing us of the current events of the land.

**This is not to say they get carte blanche to say whatever they want at any time.** I know that, you know that, so let's just skip that whole part of the argument: the point is that the government can't prevent them from reporting the news, the current events of the land. It can prevent them from doing other things, but not that.

So that's important.

Now we should look at why it's important, in this case specifically.

Let's say the killer wasn't caught. Shouldn't you have the right to know if the person who's babysitting your kids *right now* is the prime suspect and cited by eyewitnesses as being on a shooting rampage against kids? What about your next door neighbor? What if the person is just casually walking down the street, going about their lives, but the news has been prevented from releasing their identity to the public so no one knows it?

"There's a mass shooter on the loose in your neighborhood, right now, but the law says we can't tell you who *all these eyewitnesses* say it is. Good luck."

Pretty shitty, huh?I'm trying to wrap my head around your internal conscience, but apparently it's not okay for these guys to take sacred artifacts but it's totally okay for archeologists to do it? You know the archeologists are going to take the stuff and put it in a museum, right? What's the difference? That one person puts it on display at his house and the other does it for the public? What if the museum sells it to a private collector (as they sometimes do)? Are the archeologists retroactively shitheads in that event?

e: i don't care if you don't like the question, it's valid. if you're okay with some people stealing things but not others, you should at least be able to give a reasonable explanation for whyand yet we all think it's hilarious if martin freeman says he kept a copy of the one ring or sam jackson says he hung onto the pulp fiction briefcase or some shit.

i get that these aren't graveyard artifacts, but this is the exact reason they admit to it: *usually* the public loves this stuff.just keep in mind


there is exactly one way this ends well for you

and about a hundred ways this ends with you getting completely fucked the fuck overThis is good information to have

**however**

keep in mind that they lost that fight. They had to suffer the detriments of national relief, so now they *deserve* to receive the benefits of it, even if they were assholes about it before.I do....that's kind of my point?right onLook, I agree with you, but what about this:

Do you like social security? Let's pretend you say no, but you have to keep paying into it anyway. When you become eligible, having paid into all those yours, are you going to decline your checks when they come? Hell no. You may have been against it but you were still made to participate in it, so now when it's your turn you get the benefit from it.I'm not aware enough to know the specific method of removal, as far as I'm aware what you're referring to is the early parts of a dig. At some point, artifacts are in fact removed by archaeologists. They don't just grab the first thing they see and chuck it in a wagon, no.Not only did I *already say that,* but it also misses the point of my post, which wasn't to justify these guys' actions but explain them, as the guy I replied to was asking.I know that, I *said* that, I wasn't trying to justify their actions. I was answering a question the guy asked.i never let this one die, i don't care if you bastards downvote the hell out of me.you made all of that up, didn't you?i could probably get behind thatThanks for the advice and encouragement, I don't really let it get to me-- plenty of people have money troubles, plenty of people have all kinds of troubles, at the end of the day i've got a roof over my head, my lights are on and there's food in my fridge, for now at least and that's good enough for me. It's just unsettling when I see it put into perspective like that."rich people keepin' the poor man down!"that was the end? *that was not a happy ending!* why did the video try to make me think it was? an entire village died just so some warlord could feel superior.*they* were the hand that feeds. or, no hand was feeding them when they were biting. i dunno, your analogy doesn't really work.If you don't mind me asking,

you advocate for sexual education for teens. Do you feel your sex ed was lacking, and do you think that's what caused your pregnancy? To what do your attribute your pregnancy? Were you using birth control?&gt; I also think it's fuckin weird when I find a patient sleeping with their head at the foot of the bed and their feet where the pillow is. Don't sleep like that, cmon

I used to do that a lot as a kid. For some reason, the disorientation helped me sleep.i think... you may have copied that from the other question and accidentally opened it when replying to this one. weird idiosyncrasy of res.'preciate it but i've found that's more helpful for people with reliable income

ps things get bad sometimes but they always swing back around. managing to keep my head above water so far and things get better every yearexactly!&gt; well, what 6 foot guy wants to try to fuck a 5'2 girl?

preferences don't have to necessarily be easy to findnope, had the sn long before the martian was even an idea in the author's headcome on, like you've never tripped over something and found yourself balls-deep in some innocent chick? happens to the best of usSo you don't think it's important that we make sure the news is legally allowed to report the current events of the land?

If we can't agree on that simple topic, there's not much I can do for you.

There's a difference between being allowed to do something and doing it. I have the legal protected freedom to *say* lots of things, but I choose not to say most of them for my own reasons. But even if I don't say them, the protection is still important.No it isn't. They can still be against it but be willing to take advantage of a system they don't like but are forced into anyway.Keep in mind he stopped once he realized she was asleep. So I don't really buy the argument that he was purposefully using her being asleep to get sex in a way she wouldn't allow other times.man, you got some fucked up views on sex.I think it's ridiculous you think people in a committed sexual relationship need to ask permission every time they have sex, yeah. A simple "hey I'm not into that" suffices, not "I'm calling the cops for rape!"No one said anything about owing anyone. The fact that you keep jumping to that is what's messed up.Man, I wouldn't even be mad.Dang, buncha snipes just ran off with the all the backfocuses.It does mean that. They'll probably keep doing it though.Hey panties can inexplicably move themselves to the side, and maybe the guy forgot to button the flap on his boxers.Maybe, doesn't make it less shitty. A person can not realize they're too blind to drive, still makes it shitty when they run someone over.sorry to hear that, thanks for sharingWell, kinda. It's not so much a rank they bestowed upon him for being a badass, it's more like "You're pretty badass, you'd be great for this new genetic modification program we came up with."Astoria has some very safe parts.

It also has some not so safe parts.I hate all of these options.

[Let's go with Batman instead](http://static.comicvine.com/uploads/original/13/139190/3458417-5839658305-jim-l.jpg)There's a site on the internet that may interest you

www.imdb.com

also why doesn't hyperlinking work?I disagree, I think the above guys got it right when they said

1) anything released even close to christmas is gonna get destroyed by star wars

and 2) most of the people going to see this r-rated movie are going to be the fans, might as well clean up during a dead period than try to compete against star wars or civil war.Any chance that this is quote that's meant to be literal and the movie goes full meta with deadpool doing his thing but constantly hounded by gripes? Like studio execs keep bitching at him for his poor video game sales?As others said, a portfolio is going to be more of an asset, but if you insist on a reel just cut a couple short scenes together. Wouldn't go for a montage. A slick montage reel will make you attractive to low budget projects who don't know what they're looking for or what directing is. Those aren't the kinds of jobs you want.Tie between Pfister and deakins. Pfister is probably less creative but damn does his stuff look cool. Deakins because, well, have you seen his stuff? He uses EVERYTHING at his disposal to make everything come together just right, and never needs to get too showy about it. And he seems like the nicest, humblest guy. Shouldn't matter but it does.

E: as far as active ones go, anyway. Taking the entirety of anyone who's ever shot anything is too much, it's like asking what's your favorite movie.&gt; r with a shorter lens, use the subject to block your reflection.

In my experience, this almost never works out well.I Reddit. A lot.

But seriously (actually I was pretty serious) I try and keep my productivity up by looking at whether I can improve my portfolio, my site, my reel, even my cover letter. Honestly most of it is busy work and I can't imagine it makes that much difference, but it does keep me feeling like I'm doing something and keeping that stuff up to date helps in the long run.

I take the opportunity to reach out to friends, and of course to let colleagues know I'm available. And if I really get bored I say fuck it and put my own project together.&gt; -Drink

Best answer.I'm sure he would. Doesn't change my opinion.&gt; How do you consistently fuck up walls?

You must have had a boring child hood.

Or maybe you had a ton of friends to play soccer with and keep you entertained or whatever, I don't know.I'm sympathetic to your point, but keep in mind this is a film forum. There's nothing wrong with female filmmakers pointing out the hardships of being a female filmmaker. It's like the black lives matter thing, just because they're bringing up one issue doesn't mean they're indifferent to others.

Also, I doubt men are kept from those other professions as much as they're just less likely to seek it out. Except for stuff involving child care, at which men do seem to be at a major disadvantage.Pretty much the further you get from the trains/Broadway/30th ave the dodgier it gets. I've certainly felt uncomfortable walking at night to that park by the river. It's not as bad as east new York, but it's not as safe as you make it out to be.It's like the national election, I vote but it doesn't seem to matter!

PS you guys knew it would be dickbutt didn't youWell, we did fix net neutrality. So where does that leave us?You know, if you guys keep flooding the options with dickbutt, since we're in contest mode all those upvotes are going to be wildly split amongst each, effectively canceling each other out.If you at least could figure out which school you want to bitch about, it'd make a lot more sense. Sounds like you're probably talking about new York film academy which has nothing to do with nyu.

ps i went to both. nyfa was borderline scam, but wasn't *completely* useless. far too expensive for what it offered though. nyu was as prestigious as its reputation makes it out to be, but isn't worth the money if it's going to be a struggle for you to come up with it.

really though, it kind of undercuts your point if you don't even know the name of the school. especially if all you're going to do is bitch about it.You want the subject to move in real time? Film him against a green screen, timelapse the location with a slow shutter and comp in your subject. Or I guess you'd technically be comping in the background. You know what I mean.

At least that's how I'd do it&gt; a little research

**research**?

how the fuck old am i compared to everyone else on this site?i'm not familiar with the guy, but isn't his whole shtick kind of making fun of games? it'd be like paying the mst3k guys money to do a rifftrax of your new movie then getting mad when they make fun of it.

also, whether they liked his video or not, if they gave him no clear guidelines they at the very least owed him money for that first video.&gt; Google+ graveyard where almost every google product that doesn't compete with Office or Outlook has gone to die.

people bitch about or make fun of google+ constantly.Remember, we're a big ass country and there are a LOT of different experiences people have had with high school. You're not going to get one right answer here.

But from my experience, to relate it to the media portrayal... It's similar, but the media amps up the drama a TON. There are definitely cliques, but they're usually not quite as unwelcoming as they seem. It's not like any given clique hates everyone outside of their clique, it's more like a bunch of people who share common interests hang out with each other, and don't hang out with others because why would they hang out with someone with different interests? Most of the time high schoolers aren't as mean as the media shows them to be--there are rare instances where it happens (which makes got good TV) but they're still people. They're dumb, naive, self centered and driven by hormones but they're usually not cruel on purpose.

The jocks usually are the most popular, but they're still usually friendly to other groups so popularity, while important isn't as important as TV makes it seem. Cheerleaders usually aren't nearly as popular as the media wants you to think, they're just an easy pick if a movie needs a well defines group to be the popular group.

This is all just my experience. I guess the major point is that usually people aren't intentionally mean to each other, though they are mean it's usually borne out of self centeredness. It sucks, but there aren't really bad guys in high school, just assholes.Early Community episodes are actually pretty spot on for community colleges.&gt; in Canada

You get out of here! This thread isn't for you!anyone who spent a year hauling their xbox around to play halo by connecting with cables thinking "god damn it's going to be so cool when i can finally do this from home via the internet" remembers it. In fact I'm surprised it was only a year, that time period seems like it went on for ages.

i'm not bitching, 15 years is a long time it just kind of snuck up on me.IMO that's still pretty young to be explaining that kind of thing (unless they specifically have questions). I was reading when I was four, but I was definitely not ready to learn about that kind of thing. i wasn't even ready to be learning about sex, to be honest (i know this because my sisters decided to explain it to me anyway and it freaked me the fuck out and made me super uncomfortable about sexual topics for longer than i probably otherwise would have been)...this sign was in no way derogatory. i imagine the people running this business aren't misogynistic in the least (I've found porn peddlers to be pretty open minded and fair), and I'd wager that women even worked at the store and might have helped with the sign.

ps not relevant to the conversation but derogatory is an adjective not a noun. just throwing that one out there.if that was a joke it was both funny and well executed.Shit, is *that* what those numbers were for?all of that sounds like a pretty fun challenge to do over a weekend

except no lens of truth. no lens of truth? fuck. fuck that. no way. fuck that shit.are you allowed to reset from last save point?even though you're generally right, this is reddit so you're about to get a hoarde of people telling you what a smug ass you are for not knowing that *they specifically* never played zelda.

...

oh wait, you already got a bunch of those replies.dude, it's oot.

E: fuck you guys, it's oot.haha, he deleted his commentFwiw you might have been better served academically staying behind. I was in a similar situation considered skipping a grade (not for bullying but for academics, I was the oldest kid in my class and was more tuned for the year ahead of me) but since everyone in my class did poorly academically I stood out more and got accepted into better schools. I wasn't any smarter than the other kids applying from different years/schools, I just seemed better in comparison and got the benefit of breezing through dumbed down work.All the band kids kept having sex with each other, too. On the one hand, they were the most bizarre, weird people you'd never expect to get laid. On the other hand, they were all getting laid way before anyone else.I totally get that, but that's the difference between fun weekend visiting my parents and breaking out the n64... And doing work. I guess I'm just not dedicated enough.

I'm also pretty drunk, so there's that.You have every right to hate it, and women have every right to have preferences. Quite the conundrum.

But your ex kind of sounds like she sucks.It's cliche, but... Where do you see yourself in five years?I am in the ues and have never lived in Astoria, but I seriously dated a woman who lived there pretty recently. Take it for what it's worth, but I still say some parts of Astoria are dodgy while others are the height of local tourism.Well, I specifically limited it to academics for a reason. From my previous comment, and my understanding of yours, I bet you can guess I'm well aware of the social and psychological values of being where you need to be. I was just throwing something out there, but if what you did worked for you, that's awesome.Alright pal, I'm not going to give your comment an actual response unless you can learn to stop taking quotes out of context.

PS derogatory is an adjective, not a noun.I love the challenge, I'm just not up for memorizing stuff off a guide to complete it. As you said, to each their own. I may dig into the challenge someday (some long, boring Christmas vacation) but fuck all if I'm doing it without the lens of truth.

But that's just me.Shit, he deleted the whole damn post.

Can't say I blame him, it was a bad call.The things I'm not allowed to say because they will harm others are wholly different from what the news reports.

I may not be expressing myself well. Let's do this. Can you name all the forms of speech that are not protected by the first amendment? (I promise I'm going somewhere with this)Get out while you still canSo, you're not up to meet my request?

E: I know what's protected and what's not. I don't need to look them up. As I said, I'm going somewhere with this. You're welcome to join me, or bail early. But if you bail, I'll suspect it's because you didn't want to have a discussion about it.Yeah, I'm not gonna argue with kids. When you're ready to make some decisions on your own, get back to me.you know, it's not really honorable to bully someone who's bullying someone, particularly with these kinds of 4chan encouragements to commit suicide. this doesn't make you any better than they are, it makes you an immature asshole.i hear they have a class you can take for that now&gt; Apparently women get pretty graphic when discussing their guys with their friends.

This has always bothered me. I'm very much a "private life stays private" kind of person, and it's not that I really care *that much* but what gets me is how women always act indignant about how they have this *right* to talk about their sex life or whatever. The thing is... that's my private life, too. Those aren't just your details you're sharing, they're mine. You don't get to make that decision unilaterally.

Anyway. I'm just rambling I guess.why the fuck don't any of you people lock the bathroom doorHeh, I saw that come up too. I was greatly amused by it. Especially by the "specific reasons" he had for needing these cameras but won't say why.Seriously, I get more annoyed when they're paying less than the rental price than if they were just asking someone to work for free.You have clearly *not* ever evicted someone, then. It's not a matter of whether you have cause or not, it's a matter of going through an excruciatingly long, complicated and frustrating process.You make it sound like companies are super eager to find some way to get rid of their cash. Someone should let them know if they're that desperate, I'll take some of it....

good times hereyeah, that's part of why that line is so amazingly hilarious (and terrible)that's not really ladies' night though. yeah, they can call it that but we all know ladies' night commonly means drink specials for chicks

ps by definition swag has to be for everyone. otherwise it's not swag, it's just stuff.you could make a pretty sweet stabby thingy by unbending and connecting a bunch of paperclips, use the usb as a frame and to help hold it together.

the skittles are in case you get hungry.it's also a bullshit notion, but is catchy and cynical so people like to repeat it.

no one's *selling* these women (literally or figuratively), though they're certainly benefitting the club with their presence. that's not selling a person as a product, it's more like a mutually beneficial relationship.that sucks, but i still support the right of private clubs to run their membership however they want. public businesses, don't be discriminatory jerks. private clubs, well, if the club's full of jerks don't go there.

wait are we talking clubs as in you need a membership to be part of the group, or clubs as in loud annoying house music and sweaty people on x?we'd do the same at my college place, when i found out some of the guys were letting girls in for free (particularly the snobby chicks that *demanded* to be let in for free, and the guys at the door would cave to get attention) i was livid. first, because we usually didn't make back all of our money on booze, but we didn't mind taking a small hit for a fun party... except each person we let in free was money out of *my* pocket (not the guys working the door)

and second because fuck that you pathetic assholes, just because they have a vagina doesn't mean you should cower to them. they get charged like everyone else.i imagine the best way to do a ladies' night that doesn't discriminate is to have drink specials on specifically "girly" drinks, drinks that are popular with the female crowd. anyone can buy them but they're more likely to appeal to women. and this isn't just a technical loophole, i can totally see a bunch of chicks being like "Ooh it's half off lemon drops at [bar] tonight, we should totally go!"ya gotta be quickhahaha what? you can't ban drink specials. that's just the price of the thing. bars are allowed to charge whatever they want whenever they want. if they want to make the price of a thing be less for one night they're allowed to. you might be confusing it with something else.

either that or i'm totally wrong and boston is *really* fucking weird about business's rights.oh my god this is amazing. i hate it on principle but i love it in practice. why doesn't every place have this?this sounds like one of those things that you think "How can anyone ever get caught at this, they could so easily just lie about it"

but you're forgetting that people are stupid and don't know the law. So it's less about specifically cracking down on these women, it's more about if some chick is just openly telling everyone how she regularly goes to bars just to screw guys into giving her free drinks, a cop doesn't have to just sit there and listen to it, he can issue a fine or arrest someone (and in fact, that exact scenario has happened... some people witnessed women openly doing/admitting this and called the cops, they got arrested). Imagine some girl is all flirty with you, you offer to buy her a drink, as soon as it's in her hand she says "Thanks, but I'm not interested in you, I just wanted you to pay for my drink. Bye." Well, you get to call the cops on her, especially if other guys can say the same thing happened to them. in the past, there have also been cases where bars were paying women to do this to guys to inflate bar tabs. it's also often tacked on to other charges. so yeah, it can get enforced.

it's similar to how-- you'd think no employer could *ever* be caught discriminating against employees, right? They could just say they fired the black guy for some other work-related reason. Except tons of employers just straight up say "I don't want no negroes working for me, get the hell out of here."i'm not sure it's thought crime, it's specifically about their actions. it appears to mostly be an issue of fraud. a woman is paid by a bar to flirt with guys to get them to buy her drinks, specifically to inflate the bar tab. also, sometimes the bartenders will just give the women flavored water so they can get five or six drinks from a guy in an hour, then move on to the next one without getting too drunk. that's a whole 'nother level of messed up. how would you feel if some flirty hottie asked you to buy her a drink, so you did, and then a few more, but you're having a good time so why not... then she turns and walks away and the entire time you were buying her ten dollar shots of *water*?

so it's more those scenarios that get into trouble, it's less a girl just out on the town looking to have a fun night but not pay for anything.i'm right there in the target demo and i still hate it. i hate that girls get stuff cheaper, i hate that it attracts guys who are looking to find girls so drunk their judgment is impaired enough to sleep with them... i just hate everything about it.

sure, i know that respectable people *can* benefit from ladies' nights, but that's a by-product. you and i both know the point of ladies nights is to get lots of single women in there and get them drunk for cheap so single guys will spend a lot of money to be around them.i see where you're coming from, and i mostly agree with it, *however* it's entirely possible the increase of clientele alone makes up for the discounted drinks, meaning the prices of the drinks wouldn't have changed for the guys had there been no ladies night.

in other words it's possible that they weren't subsidizing it. (but probably they were)i'm totally with you.

now. how do we get all men to stop thinking their best chance at getting laid is to hit on chicks too drunk to know they don't want to sleep with the guys?

cuz i don't think we're gonna have a lot of luck convincing them of that. some guys truly disgust me with the lengths their desperation will lead them to go to just to get laid.it's not that the women won't go out, it's that the women will want to go to the bar that's offering them cheap booze.take a tango course. thank me later.*just* to get women? sure, that's lame. but to get women and engage in a fun activity? that's a whole different story. if you hate dancing, sure, but who hates dancing? (once they've been taught how)

it's fun as hell man. you just need to find the right dance. i'm more of a swing guy myself than tango or salsa.i would 100% be the guy showing up with lipstick.

however, i would be the guy showing up with lipstick with all his friends who are also in lipstick. it's fucking weird if you do it alone. it's fun if you're with a group of guys/so people don't walk in on you naked. have you even been reading this thread?that's advertising, not selling. the women aren't a product being sold in any way.4chan is the most prolific site of total disregard for basic decency with its members commonly harassing people and telling them to kill themselves.

which is what you're doing.I agree with everything you said, but that in no way has convinced me anyone involved is a *product.*

I'm not saying the it being mutually beneficial is the reason why no one's a product (just mentioning that that was the case here). I'm saying the reason why no one's a product is because *no one is a product.* No one's being sold. If all the women were employed by the business, were behind a pay wall and performed services as directed by the business, then they'd be a product that's being sold.

But that's not happening. They're patronizing the bar, and that works out well for the business so the business encourages it. But they're not selling the women as a product. At best, they're using the women as advertising.Do you have a source? I'd genuinely like to see it, because I've had experience with people telling me bullshit Mass laws that it turns out are total rumors based on misunderstandings of admittedly bizarre laws. It's frequent enough I'm willing to say it's a result of mass having confusing, messed up laws... but it's hard for me to believe they actually found a way to ban changing the price of something.just because you keep saying it doesn't make it True. you can't justify any dumbass thing you want to say by saying you mean it figuratively.i assume you're referring to this one?

&gt; (c) sell, offer to sell or deliver to any person or group of persons any
drinks at a price less than the price regularly charged for such drinks
during the same calendar week, except at private functions not open to
the public;

1) doesn't ban specials on drinks not normally offered the rest of the week (e.g. mango margarita mondays, mango margaritas at half price of regular margaritas... and don't offer mango margaritas the rest of the week)

and 2) "except at private functions." they can have drink specials all they want, they just can't do it for the public. you want to have a private screening of your latest web series at a bar, they can make some kickass drink specials for you

in other words

**drink specials are not banned outright**

special nights are banned, specials on drinks offered at higher prices other times are banned. that's not the same thing.

or, to put it another way: you misunderstood an (admittedly bizarre) mass law.

bitch.

e: and if you had just said, as i admitted was possible, that my specific reasoning was wrong, that'd be fine. but you had to go and be a douchebag about it, and be wrong at the same time.of course not, you made it to specifically harass one person.

and yeah, people have committed suicide after that kind of harassment.well, don't let luke die then. problem solved.see, i thought he was just talking about how the imperials still overran the base in the movie.&gt; Or even better different coins spawn based on the flow of the battle.

i hate that shit (it's why i can't get into mario kart these days). If someone's doing better because they're doing better, they shouldn't be punished and forced to take a disadvantage (and vice versa).you made an account with a username specifically telling the guy to kill himself, and you don't think you harassed him?I have no idea what your comments said, but telling someone specifically to kill themselves is harassment. If it was just a joke username that's one thing, but you targeted an individual.Well, it is great to pick up women. He wasn't wrong about that. You're the one who assumed it was done only to get women.I've done all of that before and still been ripped off. Some people are just scum bags. Good advice and following it will certainly cut down on a lot, but there's always going to be a few that just don't want to pay for the work you've done. Hopefully you never meet them.No, you don't.If you really want to fuck with them delete it after a few minutes, wait, and do it again. And repeat.he sounds like he modeled the accent after a rural ohio's community theatre adaptation of oliver twistaww that's sweeti dunno, i think he's always been a good actor, he just often picks roles where the acting (or his interpretation of the character) calls for being... muted or shallow.So Ebert's basically saying Rickman totally fucks it up but is so good it doesn't matter?

Impressive.you pretty much nailed the movie, and why i think christensen gets a bad rap as an actor.Wasn't it Harrison Ford who put a stop to that nonsense in the OT? I think the quote was "Look George, you can write this shit, but you can't say it." I like to imagine he then smacked Lucas with the rolled up script and yelled "Now do it again!"&gt; Bill Nighy outside the obvious Davey Jones role in Pirates

oh shit, i knew "bill nighy" was the guy who played davey jones, and i know who bill nighy is as an actor, but for some reason i never put the connection together that *that* was the guy under the make-up and fx. does that make any sense? probably not.

(i did the same thing with martin freeman in the hobbit. one day i just realized oh shit, that's *martin freeman!* and everyone's like yeah duh you knew that)i don't think josh whatshisface did a bad job in those movies, the character was just kind of lackluster. and josh (that's his name right?) did a good job of playing him lacklusterly.Lemme reformat that for you.

&gt; Batman Begins

&gt; Terrific: Almost everyone. Terrible: Katie Holmes.suck a fuck!that's how the books went too. and why i lost interest around book 5. i just didn't dig taking this lighthearted kids world (which, by the way, only really works if you don't think about it too hard, much like most kids fictional worlds) and injecting serious plot and drama around it. i can take a work seriously, or i can take it not seriously, but i can't do both at the same time.he's usually regarded as a fantastic director.

and personally, i think he did a great job with the HP movies, it's just impossible to take that popular a book and adapt it in a way that satisfies everyone.You're missing a nuance in the wording, I think.

It's not that the company wants to offload cash-- they're not looking for somewhere, anywhere to dump bills because they ran out of space in the vault. Which is how the wording makes it sound. What's actually going on, as you know, is that the shareholder are simply taking their cut of the profits.Okay, now that you've learned *how* the stock market works in eli5 terms, let me answer your question. Because, as many people are missing, stocks don't just arbitrarily increase in value. They don't make money out of nothing. You're right, that money is coming from someone who's spending it.

And here's who:

The customers of the business the shareholders hold stock in.

To boil it down to the simplest terms, shareholders are owners of a business, and keep their share of the profits from the business. Obviously, the way a business makes a profit is by selling a product or service to customers.

So yeah. Follow the dollar all the way back, the people they're taking money from is the customer. (it can get more complicated than that with various ways of buying or selling or lending or inflating value or whatever, but that's the eli5 version)Good explanation, except I don't think the political downside of being soft on crime is creating less of a deterrent. The accusations are usually more along the lines of "That politician is soft on crime, he *wants to put criminals back on the street!*"

I think it's more skewed towards letting criminals out of jail than not preventing others from going there.

minor point though and it's hard to say who's right or wrong, just my opinionwould being shunned mean more people leave me alone, or more people give me trouble? if i ever go to prison i think i'd prefer everyone to just leave me the hell alone.how have we gone so far into this and still no one has just posted a comment telling me what it is? i gotta click on outside links? no way man.

no way....i'd wager there's a bit more to this story he's not sharing. it's possible, but i find it unlikely even on probation a judge would hit this guy for four years for sleeping in a car belonging to the grandparents of the person he was hanging out with (even if she denied it, it's a pretty plausible story and sounds like there were witnesses).

That could absolutely be what happened, but what I find more likely is there were some other charges involved he's not really wanting to share. (not to rag on the guy anymore, but you can tell he's defensive/playing the victim card by opening with how he was going through a tough time and just needed money for rent. maybe he fought the officers, maybe they charged him for giving booze to kids, maybe there were drugs involved... i dunno. maybe none of that and it happened exactly like he said)&gt; We would get a HUGE cinnamon roll for breakfast alongside a bowl of oatmeal and fruit on Thursdays. Wednesdays it would be biscuits and gravy. Sunday it was what they called the "grand slam", two fried eggs with bacon, potatoes and toast.

dude that sounds awesome now i want to go to prison

&gt; I would get racks of ribs, tri tip and coconut shrimp, brisket sandwiches, spaghetti w/ meat sauce and garlic bread, sodas to drink, drumstick ice creams, etc.

wait no i want to do thathow often were you dp'd for accidental infractions?what about me?that may be True for most pd's, but not all. my dad's a public defender and i know he personally gives *way* more attention than any other pd. he treats them exactly the same as his paid clients (he has a private practice too).

on the other hand it's driving him fucking insane and aging him like crazy because no one can take that much work and give that much attention to individual clients. but he still does his absolute best for every client.well yeah, *but*, people are also terrible at breaking into a super fortress by crouching behind bushes and scaling the wall. but we do that shit in video games by proxy. shouldn't there be some mechanic to have your character be great at reading facial cues even though you personally are not?Despite what many others are going to say, **the law** and precedent says that *it is completely legal to have sex while drunk,* it is legal to consent while drunk, being drunk has absolutely nothing to do with your ability to consent.

However, someone who is *not in control of their own actions* can not give consent (the legal standard is whether they are able to understand what they are consenting to). This can be caused by being inebriated. It can also be caused by many other things. The amount of booze you've drank has nothing to do with it directly, the only thing that matters is your mental state.

And here's the tricky part: you have to literally not be in control of your own actions for you to be unable to consent. Most people don't understand what that means. But what the law and precedent has decided it means is, if you are aware of your surroundings, if you are aware what you're doing, **if you are aware what you are consenting to** then it's not rape. Even if you are extremely drunk, even if your judgment is extremely impaired, it's still not rape.

So what does this look like, practically? Essentially, if someone has to lead someone anywhere, and they are unable to walk on their own and don't understand they're being lead (think, like, you could walk someone to their car or you could literally walk them off a cliff and they wouldn't understand the difference) they probably can not consent. If you ask someone if they want to have sex and they say yes, but then you ask them if they want to fly off the empire state building and they say yes, then you ask them if they're a power ranger and they say yes, that's not consent because they clearly don't understand what you're asking. If, however, they can of their own accord follow someone to a bedroom, take off a guy's clothes, take off their own clothes, it's probably not rape even if they're *extremely* intoxicated.

So, that's the law's stance on it. (Seriously, I urge you to look up the laws, I guarantee a lot of people are going to get this wrong with what they ASSUME consent is) *however,* your school can and almost definitely does have private policy on what constitutes "rape." Their policy isn't the law, so you won't get in legal trouble (for violating their policy but not the law), but they can kick you out of school.

And school policies are many times extremely, extremely unfair, especially to men.

Edit: and please keep in mind it doesn't matter what actually happened, all that's going to matter is what the evidence shows. If you're considering having sex with a very drunk but consenting girl, it would be good if her friends heard her say she's going to bang you. If she wakes up the next day and can't remember it and cries rape, and the only witness is some guy who says she was super drunk, had passed out earlier and it looked like you were sort of carrying her, that's going to look a lot like rape even if that's not exactly what happened. The guy may not even be lying, just recollecting to the best of his ability. In all honesty your best bet is to just wait until they sober up. You don't want to bang chicks who only want to bang you when they're drunk, anyway. That's just depressing.No it isn't. You are mistaken.&gt; Both parties can also be at the point of inebriation where in the eyes of the law they could not give proper consent.

This is not True. Sex between two people can not be passive by both parties. At least one person needs to be active, which means at least one person was capable of consent. If neither were capable of consent they would literally be incapable of having sex with each other.you say that like it matters. she's two, she's still a person.

you dipshit.awesomeYou are either misunderstanding that law or misunderstanding what drunk means. Either way you are mistaken. It is legal to have sex while drunk in all fifty states. I frequently have sex while drunk in new York and I'm not breaking any laws.Yes you are correct. This is usually used in cases of drugging someone's drink or, as you said intentionally telling someone they're drinking watered down or non alcoholic drinks when they're not for the purpose of impairing her consent. However, I think I've also seen it used when someone repeatedly refills a wine glass before it's empty, for instance, so they don't realize how much they're having. I do believe (though I may be mistaken) that a key factor is intent to impair judgment. If you just keep handing her a lot of drinks because you know she likes to drink a lot, and then hey now she wants to have sex, I don't believe that's the same. But yeah your point is valid.That's definitely something that happens more than it should. I strongly recommend just waiting until they're sober.Yep. It may not be illegal but it's a pretty douche move.What kind of effects, specifically?

The eli5 version is that you use computers to animate something. There are very sophisticated programs that can help calculate exactly how those animations move to make them appear realistic. They don't draw it in frame by frame, they essentially animate all the parts and then use the computer programs to calculate how those parts should move and how quickly they should move.

Depending on how much cgi there is it can take a few days to several months to animate a few minutes. I believe Gollum took something like twenty six hours to calculate the animations for *each frame.*

If you ever wondered why you hear about a movie finishing shooting, and then it's like eight months later before it's released, now you know.It totally depends. Sometimes it's hand-drawn, sometimes it's animated with computers. I don't know much about cartoon animation, it's not really related to cgi, but I imagine what happens is they don't actually use programs to calculate movement, they just animate each individual part. What they may do is, say they want someone's arm to start at their side, then raise up, swing back, throw forward and punch someone. So what *might* happen is they'll tell the computer "On this frame the arm is at the side. Four frames later it's raised in the air. Two frames after that it's pulled back, and three frames after that it's punching someone" and then the computer will fill in all the blank spaces.

What happens on modern cartoons like the simpsons is they'll have each part of the character animated separately, and then have each part with a bunch of different animations. So they'll animate, say, Homer's mouth opening for a scream. They leave the rest of Homer alone but put the "open for scream" animation on his face.

and again, this is all just guessing from what i know about animating things with computers-- i really don't know the specific processes used in modern cartoon animation.Sure, that's a bit different. I guess a better way of saying it is if you're not sure if she'd consent when she's sober, wait until she's sober. If you're sure she'd want to bang you whether she's drunk *or* sober, go for it. Drunk sex is fun.Depends on what stage they're at. And I'm sure everyone does it a little differently.well, you can blame it on people just being fat, and maybe that's it

but what's far more likely is they said "100 feet to the beach? Wow! That's like right outside my door! I step outside and I'm on the beach!"

then they actually get there and it's like "Oh... it's actually more like... 100 feet." plus even though it was technically only 100 feet they might have had to walk more to get to an entrance if there was a fence.

i'm not saying it's worth complaining over, but it explains their disappointment in a way that's not "muricans are so fat and lazy"okay, so, that's exactly what i'm saying is *not* True. whether or not she remembers it has nothing to do with whether she was able to consent, everyone blacks out at different points of drunkenness, and there are many people who are active and able to give consent while blackout drunk.

this is a stigma that people have pounded into your head for a long time, that *taking advantage of drunk women is raaaape!* but it's not True. women can get blackout drunk and have sex, men can get blackout drunk and have sex, it can all be consensual.

maybe not, y'know, an honorable thing to do, but not illegal.hang on, i know this reference...yeah. what's interesting is anime actually pioneered this style of animation. way back in the day animation was suuuuper expensive and the asian animation companies couldn't afford it. so they'd have the animators animate just one or two important features and leave the rest totally still.

so you know how in anime, when the evil masked villain finally reveals himself to be the hero's dead brother or something, and there's this dramatic zoom or sweeping pan on the hero where his body is perfectly still but his eyes widen a ton and his mouth opens in shock? In western animation you'd see the whole body and everything move and react, but to save money they decided hey let's just draw the eyes and mouth moving and keep everything else still.

these days it's a lot cheaper to animate everything, but since anime created that specific style they still use it.say it all you want but i'm not wrong. there have been many changes in many states over the past year or two that have wildly swung things, essentially making it impossible for men to even have the chance to defend themselves.i know. i'm not disagreeing with you. i specifically said it was a shitty reason to complain.

what i am saying is, i don't think the reason is that americans are too fat or lazy for a hundred foot walk. which, by the way, your statement would also apply to.honestly, i think because of the texture medium-rare/medium steak can *seem* like something people hate

but when they get past that ( through the kind of brow beating you gave) they realize it's way better.

well that and the whole "any pink in your steak and you will literally die!" yellow journalism news reports from, i dunno, ten years ago? and probably many times since.That makes sense, it's definitely beyond my area though so I can't speak much to itNow I'm picturing you running up to random people on the street holding your phone at them shouting "Look at my albums! Nicetomeetyou LOOK AT MY ALBUMS!"That's not giving yourself up. If you give your phone to the cop specifically to look at particular photos, and he goes and finds other incriminating evidence, that constitutes an illegal search.Maybe check for another comparison, because an easy answer to that is it's illegal most places to go nude, and unacceptable at most businesses to wear less than a shirt shoes and pants. If I could go drink at my local bar in my underwear I would.That's not True, that's not how consent to be searched works. They have exactly as much freedom as you give them. You can dictate exactly what they're allowed to look at, for exactly how long, and you can revoke consent at any time.

For instance, if you tell a cop he's allowed to look in your glove box but he finds weed under your seat, that's an illegal search.

If you tell them they can look at a specific set of pictures, they can't legally look at anything else.

Now, of course it's still a headache, and they can lie about consent if you don't have witnesses, but they can do that anyway.Let's be honest though, how many of us haven't wished we could just replace our actors with these.Working over Halloween? Hell no.That's insane. That's how people start Falsely crying rape, which ruins lives.It'd be easy to say it's because modern pop stars are manufactured more than they're discovered, meaning they don't have as much talent as really great singers

But that's the easy way out. There might be some truth to it, but the far more likely explanation is that this is currently the popular style in pop music.This is probably more of an ask Reddit question or something, because there's not really an explanation to be had, you're really just looking for a one word answer but the mods don't allow one word answers on here which is fine because I'm typing up an explanation right now anyway all so I can sum it up with the one word answer to your question

Nope.Thanks bud, appreciate the encouragement&gt; Just like men, the absence of norepinephrine during the REM phase of the sleep causes erections.

It's True, men do often cause erections.i had so much fun with no force lightsabers only 1v1 back in the day.I haven't played the beta yet but it *looks* like what i'm seeing is when you go for the lightsaber attack within range of an enemy it "locks on" ala halo 2 and pushes you forward for the attack... which registers as a hit, even if the enemy moves. which looks shitty, but if that's the case it makes sense because it's lame to have it lock on/force you into the attack at a certain location (taking it out of your hands) but miss because the person moved.

if you guys remember halo 2, it was frustrating as hell when that exact thing would happen, you'd get the auto-lock when you attacked but the auto-lock would miss and you're like "well come on"like 90% of the comments are agreeing with you, sooo...it's a fetish. other people's fetishes always seem bizarre to people without them.

yeah, the majority of people (myself included) think it's weird as hell and can't comprehend it. but hey, if that's what someone's in to and everyone's consenting......your explanation doesn't quite add up. "I'm mad so I'm gonna rape something of another species!"

It explains the motivation but not the action.Man, you should read it.

It's fun, playful, well written.

I recommend it.that only works if you don't get hung up on every time or a lower guy who refuses to cooperate.that's something that's only embarrassing in your head and no one really gives a shit, except maybe a quick chuckle or "witty" comment if they think they're a comedianI never get that pissed at any particular customer service worker, but after three or four of them who clearly don't give a shit, clearly don't follow through on promises, and often times just *hang up* on me when they don't feel like dealing with the problem

I can certainly be demanding about not letting them off the hook. Still not personally insulting, but the trust is gone and you're not going anywhere until I actually see the credit on my account, I don't care how many times you assure me the problem will be taken care of.

I simply can not believe that the executives' policy is to hang up on customers after a little while or transfer them to a wrong department, or outright make promises and do nothing. Maybe, at worst, attempt to talk a customer out of doing what they want you to do, but outright promises?

Nah. The only rational conclusion is that, of course some of them are good employees who want to do their best for you but the vast majority are just people working crap minimum wage jobs with unlikely and minimal repercussions for just not giving much of a shit.You know, I'm just throwing this out there, but if the customer support guy had just said that, that would have been a very believable and understandable mistake

instead of just whoops, typo!pro-tip: any time you call a company that's known to have bad customer service, record it. it's 2015, there's a bajillion simple ways to record a phone conversation.he wasn't talking about pokemonalso, onyx are *rock hard*Our brains didn't evolve with cars in mind. They evolved with, like, being hunted by a jaguar (or whatever) in mind. So your brain doesn't know what to do with a car. It thinks hey, we're sitting, our body's not really doing anything physical, there's very little activity or stimulus... this seems like a good time to go to bed!

What it gets amped up for is you running, lots of stimulus and physical exertion and excitement... in other words, the stuff you go through when being hunted by a jaguar.

Try falling asleep while running. Your brain won't go for it....

i'm pretty sure this is the room captain america woke up ini'm almost positive i remember hearing that he just never finished making it

the fire thing i didn't hear about until years latermobile user spottedThere's nothing you can do besides learn discipline. There will almost always be healthy options available, and if there aren't you should request them. Get up early and go for a run, and do some body weight exercises.

But no one wants to do that while under the stress of shooting, so discipline to do it anyway is the only answer.This is exactly what I was ready to say. This logic is incredibly flawed. A court not having jurisdiction over someone is only relevant in trying to enforce that judgment. It has nothing to do with rendering a judgment. If it's a legal suit in Minnesota, then it has nothing to do with whether Scar shows up or not. They don't just say "Well I guess what he did *was* legal since he didn't show up."

Instead, they say "Well, it wasn't legal and he's guilty, and we can enforce punishment on anyone in Minnesota so... if he shows up in Minnesota, you let us know."

If he DOES show up to court to defend himself and is found guilty, they just skip that second part and say "And since you're already in Minnesota, we don't have to wait for you to get here. Take him away, boys."

tl;dr the legality of the judgment has nothing to do with jurisdiction&gt; Also, I'm pretty sure I can't punch someone, then flee the state and be immune to legal consequences.

Yeah the whole analogy is fucked and not based on any actual law. It's more like someone grossly misunderstood other issues of jurisdiction and tried to force them into a hypothetical where it didn't apply.Gravity pulls you to the center of the earth, not "down." It's like if... nah, there's really no better analogy than to just say that. Everyone around the earth is pulled to the center of the earth, so to them "down" is always towards the center of the earth no matter where they are.The "as soon as you drive it off the lot" isn't technically accurate, just an interesting way of thinking of the concept.

What really depreciates the value is that, once it's bought, it goes from a brand new car to a used car. Brand new is worth more than used (if you're confused of the reasoning of that, let me know, otherwise we'll move on).

During test drives, you don't own the car. It's still "new." It's being used under supervision of the dealer, or at best is still under their responsibility. If there are problems with the car, it's up to them to fix it and thus they ensure it's in good working order as a new car.

After it's been purchased the only person who has responsibility for ensuring it works is the person who bought it... and they have a much lower responsibility to ensure it works (and are less capable/qualified than the dealer).

In fact, even if you purchase it, drive it off the lot, and decide you don't want it and return it (and the dealer accepts this), it's still worth just as much because the purchase was void and it becomes a "new" car again, even though you drove it off the lot. Responsibility to ensure it's in full working order falls back to the dealer.I believe that's just preference, like how some people keep ketchup on the table and some put it in the firdge. It may also be convenience, since most other cheeses need refrigeration and it doesn't make sense to keep parmesan separate all by itself just because you can (except, as you said, in the case of the kinds used specifically for tomato sauces, which are often with the tomato sauce)It doesn't matter a whole lot, these days most universities will accept either so if you have the option it's mostly preference (though if you specifically know which schools you want to apply to you should check with them). Where I was I didn't have the choice, it'd be unusual if you did (but not impossible).

I believe the SAT's are more common in the north and ACT's in the south.

If you're still unsure, just take whichever all your friends are taking.It depends on what you need a lawyer for. To generalize it (almost to the point of uselessness, really), a good lawyer will be up to date on the laws and judgments in his field and will know all the relevant aspects to his field. Good lawyers give more attention to their clients, regular lawyers often just want to do their job.

I know all that basically just sounds like I'm saying "A good lawyer is better at being a lawyer than a regular one," which is about all I can say unless you want to narrow it down to specifics. What are you looking for, criminal defense? Estate managing? Contracts? Prosecution? Copyright law? Divorce?Mostly cross-platform communication. Texts work to any and all modern cell phones, even if they're not smartphones. I can text pretty much anyone I want to, as a feature that comes standard on mine and *everyone* else's phone.

That said, there have been some periods where a few other apps took a strong marketshare. Back in the day, when blackberry was a major leader, blackberry messenger was *huge* and many people used it. Then blackberry died off and apple took over, and imessage has a huge draw.

But at the end of the day, when you're talking about apps, there's always going to be cross-platform communication and diffusion problems (some people use whatsapp, some use kik, etc.)Imagine a family tree. Your typical branching family tree, with ancestors at the top and kids at the bottom.

Each time you go "over" one level, that adds a degree to your cousins. Over one level is first cousin, over two levels is second cousin.

Each time you go up or down one level, that adds a generation (removal) to your cousin. Your mom's cousin is your first cousin *once* removed, since it's one generation up. Your grandmother's cousin is your first cousin *twice* removed, since it's two generations up....i torrent using my phone and often request desktop sites. so how does that fall into everything?it's my understanding that data *does* work pretty much how food works. It's unlimited (plants and animals can reproduce indefinitely), but delivery of it isn't. If you want more, or want it faster, you have to pay to increase delivery volume or farm land. Similar situation with data.what do you mean foxfi used to do? i still use it...Okay, before we all jump to conclusions let's keep the following things in mind. And I hate the big carriers as much as the next guy.

1) Of course AT&amp;T won't say how they know someone's tethering. If it becomes general knowledge it'll be easier to bypass.

2) Of course the people in customer support don't know how AT&amp;T knows he was tethering. They're not engineers.

3) He was using an unapproved OS that allowed tethering *allegedly* without the carrier's knowledge (indicating a strong motive)

and most importantly...

4) people will often lie to their dying breath if they think they can't be proven to be lying.

This guy's making an appeal for you to believe he never tethered, and it's easy to sympathize with him against the goliath AT&amp;T... but looking at what's most likely, the guy was taking advantage of his unlimited data plan by tethering in a situation he thought wouldn't get him caught, got caught, and won't admit it.No, but 90% of the time I can guess what you're going to order and be right. People are more stereotypical than we'd like to think.dude, you do fireball to *kick off* the night. no shots are gonna be fun at the end of the night anyway, that's how bad nights happen.i'm pretty sure every college town already has a band with that namei get so annoyed when bartenders try to upsell me when i order well drinks. Rum and soda calls for house rum, come on. I get you have a job to do and want a bigger tip, but I don't like being played or sold to, either. If you want a good tip, make my drinks well and fast and don't ignore me when I'm trying to order. (i understand if you're busy, but not if you're just flirting with chicks or texting on your phone)i'm willing to bet they have a manager/owner who's super overbearing. they probably know you're over 21 but have a manager/owner looking for an excuse to bitch at them or fire them.i'll give you the benefit of the doubt and say this must be a regional thing

i've been bartending in new york for a while, and ordering rum and cokes in it for longer. Rum and coke goes for house rum (and don't try and upsell, i'm not having it)It takes two people to make a baby, but only one of them gets 100% control over the decision on whether to have it.

I'm not blaming women, but it's unfair as hell.that's not really making it any more fair, that's just refusing to deal with the unfairness

ps there was a post not too long ago about a guy who decided to "work it out on their own" with his wife... until a few years later she decided she wanted money, so she got the court to order it AND since there was no court order (and thus no recognized record) of him paying it before, he had to pay all of the back support (again) as wellTo some women those things are the same.i don't think the person being calm would have the lasting effect of making this the operator's worst call everWhy? We should be doing CPR either way, not thinking about how unlikely it is to work.Legally, probably not. Practically, at your level they're probably not going to care or find out, and if they do at worst they'll ask you to take it down.

So you're fine.

HOWEVER

The smarter, and more professional answer, is to approach them and say "I'd like to use some of this footage for my reel, is there anything in particular you'd prefer I not use?" Occasionally there will be sensitive information or just stuff they don't want other people to see. I had a great shot I wanted to use in my reel but the producers asked me not to since it gave away a major plot reveal of the story. Fair enough.That just sounds like a prank. Dialing random numbers to confuse people.

Think this through. Who goes and cuts down a tree without any kind of plan on what to do next or ability to reason it out? Who *tells* someone to go cut down a tree with no reason or context?

**And** they couldn't tell you're a female?

Is it possible? Yeah I guess. But that sounds exactly like the kind of harmless prank someone would play with random phone numbers.&gt; Edit: NO I did not go to the picnic

dude when did you get so lame?eh, booty call is kind of a recognized term that's more than just the sum of its words.&gt; but only one of them gets 100% of the responsibility of physically growing and birthing it.

and that sucks, but it's not really comparable towards having the sole decision on whether or not someone has the responsibility of a *person* for, really, the rest of their lives (but legally 18 years)I mean... I think bare minimum all those kids get to go home, right? That seems like an improvement.

We can argue it out from there on whether their life would be better or worse, but i don't think there's any real way to say as a hypothetical.

What we know is that those conditions would cease to exist, so that's... good.Who would've guessed *cigarettes* would kill me?&gt; Both parents have the choice to "walk away."

That's not True ethically or legally.what the fuck why is mario a goombapsh, that doesn't look so hard. you just hit the things without hitting the other things. what's the big deal?Also, I'm not just saying men don't have the option to abort. Men also don't have the option to not abort if they don't want to.

Again, I'm not blaming women, or anyone. I don't think a woman should ever be forced to carry a baby she doesn't want. It's just unfair is all.My first thought. Essentially this says the first webcam was made so someone could push work onto someone else.

Which, yeah, that sounds about right.fair enoughStay as far away from the bronx as possible.i think it's one of those things where you just stop noticing it after a whileNo it isn't. It's just that everyone else was short too. (by modern standards... which is the time period we're in, and use as a reference point for comparison)NO ONE IS CONTESTING THAT.

DUDE WAS STILL SHORT. EVERYONE ELSE BEING SHORT DOESN'T MAKE HIM ANY TALLER.why

why didn't i read your comment first***what's the word?***if you saw a 5'6" person right now you would absolutely describe them as shortwell, i don't really care if you believe me or not. 5'6" is noticeably short for an adult maleThey've seen the terminator but they don't understand the concept of a country?It's sounding like the best thing we could drop on them would be smart phones.&gt; e local warlord has paid/threatened you to shoot at them with a rifle.

Why didn't you go kill the local warlords? I'm not attacking you, I just don't understand. If someone is terrorizing innocent people into attacking you, you go get the guy terrorizing him. What stopped that from happening?I understand that. Doesn't change what I said.Sure, anyone can sue anyone. Obviously if any court proceedings happened after their death they would have to have someone (an inheritor or executor of the estate) represent them/their estate.I didn't say *no one* should be taught this fact, just not mandatorily in all first aid courses.

If someone regularly or is expected to regularly perform CPR, this is likely a statistic that will ease their mental state.poorly, until they look it up because of how bad they feel.

now, let's reverse it: how's someone gonna feel when they find out their daughter died and might have been saved by cpr, but the guy who could have performed it gave up prematurely knowing it almost never works?er, where are you getting those numbers? average american **male** is 5'10", he was 5'6"&gt; Also, where did you get 5'6"?

wikipedia, and four inches below average is enough to be noticeable to people. three inches is still short but wouldn't be as noticeable.I was talking about the american soldiers. You have the choice of killing a farmer or a warlord, why pick the farmer?Eh. You may need a dedicated group to study and play regularly to *kick ass* at it

but look through it. It's clearly designed to be fun and entertaining *because* people fuck it up and no one understands it. Go through Who's On First and tell me which is more fun: devising a common jargon to differentiate every possible unique option, or saying "Hit you are!" "UR?" "Yes." "Wait, Yes is after UR?" "No, just you are!" "Okay... We got it wrong!" "I said hit you are!" "That's what I put! UR!"

etc.i was totally shocked at how fast he was reacting

....until i realized it was out of sync.hey when're you jerks gonna bring your dumb game to MacOS so I can play it?i wonder if it's cheating if you link up on skype and show everyone what the bomb looks like over videochatStart slow. They'll warm up. Give them space to talk, don't over ride them. Don't ask for specifics, ask for generalities. If you're not getting the answer you want, don't repeat the question, this will confuse and frustrate them. Instead, move on and find another way to get them to talk about it.

I once asked a guy if he had any specific memories of interactions with the subject of the doc. He kept talking in generalities. So I moved on, and later asked him what his favorite memory was, and got a specific memory like I wanted.

If they're hovering around the subject you want but not quite getting there, use phrases like "can you elaborate on what?" "Do you have any other thoughts you want to share about that?" If they're warned up people love having their opinion validated so if you ask for more of it they'll give it to you.

One of the hardest things is keeping them on track and knowing when they're straying too far, and knowing how to bring them back. This mostly just takes experience but try to keep it in mind. At all times, be aware of what the purpose of the interview is. Is what they're saying serving that purpose? If not, drive it back.


And above all, listen and react. Ask follow up questions. Don't just move down your list of questions.

Good luck. If I think of anything else I'll mention it.

E: one other trick I learned. If you have the time, after the interview cut the camera and sound but don't put anything away (let your crew know this before hand so you don't have to say it in front of the subject). Tell them youre taking a short break before you pack up. Thank them for their time, and have a friendly chat about shooting and the subject of the documentary. Nine times out of ten at some point in the conversation they'll say "you know, I wish I had said on camera..."

If it's good stuff, have them sit back down and turn the cameras back on and have them say it. If not, finish the conversation, tell everyone break's over and pack up.

Also, of course, be respectful and when you make promises honor them. If you tell them something is off the record or won't be used, don't use it. You never need to lie to anyone to get a good interview. If it's an emotional moment and they ask for the cameras to be turned off, turn them off (but keep rolling if they don't!)

E2: someone else mentioned to have them restate any questions as a sentence. Yes, tell everyone that at the beginning... But be aware almost no one will do it. DO NOT get hung up on this. There will be a way to make it work in editing, and a True, emotional response is always better the first time. I've watched amazing moments get ruined because the interviewer interrupted to remind them to restate the question as a complete sentence. When in reality, the stuff they were giving worked just fine. For example, if you ask "did you like him?" And they say "yes, a lot. He was a great man and my best friend." Then all you need is that second sentence anyway. Don't ruin the genuine response just so they can say "I liked him a lot" first. Of course, if all they say is "yes," that's not usable... But it also means they didn't connect with the question anyway. So if that happens, go for the follow up: "tell me why"Happy to help, good luck. Let us know how it goes.that's crazy man, was that kind of thing common with her? it's a very, very touchy subject with many women. I totally get that it's their body, but it's *also* men's next 18 years. There's no good answer, it just sucks.hell yeah i love that game

but we called it circle of death (midwest name, kings seems to be an east coast name) which, in my opinion, is a way better name.

ps instead of no names, sometime try no pronouns. it's hilarious when everyone starts referring to themselves in the third person, and everyone slips up and says "You have to drink! ...damn, now I have to drink.... twice! Damnit!"Sure, I agree, don't tell them.

But you should do it for every call. It might not even have anything to do with the customer service rep. They could be totally genuine and helpful and then mysteriously there's no record of that conversation and the company won't do what was promised.

I once had a problem with verizon, where I took a broken phone into a store and the rep told me it was covered under warranty. I send it in, they send me a new one and everything's groovy until two months later I get billed $300 for a new phone because there were minor cracks on the screen for the one I sent in.

Which there totally were, but it was cosmetic damage unrelated to the hardware problem. Regardless, if it wasn't covered because of the cracks in the screen the rep shouldn't have told me it was covered.

My mother calls verizon (it's on her account) and gives the info for the store and rep I talked to.

The guy says "Oh, you took it into a store? No problem. I will put a $300 credit on your account."

Awesome, problem solved.

Until next month, they shut off our service because... there's an outstanding $300 balance.

The guy she talked to on the phone did absolutely nothing wrong. At some point, verizon reversed the decision and said we must have been mistaken. I would **love** to have had my mother have a recording of that conversation.

Sometimes reps are assholes, but sometimes reps are mistaken. Sometimes they're not even mistaken but the company changes its mind. Having a record of what was promised to you is incredibly useful in these situations.

And the way I see it, the reps accept it as a possibility by being on the other end of a public support line. They're representing a company, this isn't their private phone line.it's just a lot of post work, man. all of them are done differently. mostly just fast wipes, some zooms, but there's a ton of different stuff going on. there's also some in-camera stuff he does to help the process along, i imagine this was very well planned out.

i wouldn't recommend trying to recreate this until you've got a lot more skill in post. these are all very clean and well done, but similar effects can be done easily (though a bit rougher)... but not if you can't yet identify them.When I'm bored and want to come up with a new idea to kick around, I sit down and say to myself "What's cool?"

and whatever the first thing I come up with is, I pull something out of that. It's a starting point.Why are you asking?Ah, so now we see some of the different playstyles. Because I was thinking the most efficient way would be to have the guy read off the colors "RED BLUE RED YELLOW" then move on to another module while the person working on "wires" writes down RBRY and goes through the if's on their own."An upside down w"

I can't believe no one told him the word for that is "m"It's pretty shitty that you think that just because we can't make it completely fair for both sides, that means it's not unfair to the man. It can be completely unfair (which it is), that doesn't mean there are any better solutions.

Oh, and I noticed how you didn't make any mention on if the man wants to keep the child, he has no say in it.

It's unfair that the man has no say in it. That's all there is to it. I don't care how much you want to claim women will have to pay more for the child (not True, it's variable) or that the "burden" of raising a child (it's not always a burden) is at her disadvantage-- most of the time, if both parties want custody the woman gets it, if only one party wants custody it's up to the woman to decide who, if neither party wants custody then the child goes up for adoption. The woman has the clear advantage on who gets custody.

But if it makes you feel better to think that it's completely fair (or even that women are at a disadvantage!) for their to be two parties involved in making a baby, but only one gets 100% of the decision on what happens to the baby, then I'm not going to be able to change your mind. Because that is completely irrational.Give this thread a quick skim and you'll see people will give up. You should be trying until an ambulance arrives, that doesn't mean everyone's going to if they think it's doing no good.browse craigslist rooms for rent

make a tally for each time you see "females only"

now make one for each time you see "males only"

guess which one will have more tallies

(ps for real fun also be sure to note that females *or* males are always willing to live with females, but many females will not live with males)It really does say that folks, along with telling you they'll give men counseling if they've been served with a restraining order (absent from the women's description).

However, they do add in a final line about offering support for men who have experienced abuse. Not that that makes up for the blatant ~~misogyny~~ misandry.... Did you ever tell the guy? That's an awkward conversation.

"Dude you're so awesome how'd you get her to come to me?"

"Oh I banged her."

"What? Fuck you dude."

"No you don't understand it was really bad! The sex was terrible!"1) that's still sexual discrimination

2) have you honestly ever lived with adult women? or adult men? if we're going to generalize (you started it) women are *way* more gross than men in living situations. particularly the bathrooms. slobs can be either gender, but typical women are going to have more hygienic/cleanliness issues than typical men. don't buy into the frat boy stereotype, it's not True of typical men.No, it is not legal for a hotel to discriminate based on sex. If this is what's happening, her options are to sue or find somewhere else to stay, because nothing will happen unless she fights it.

It is legal for a private club to discriminate based on sex, but I do not see anywhere that this is a private club, supported by the fact that:

If she really wants to, she can just book online. I gave it a shot and went all the way through to them asking for a credit card for my reserved 3-night stay and never once told them my sex. They never asked, **and I never saw anything about it being men only.**

So I would guess that this isn't official policy, and was the result of either a mistaken clerk, a particularly bitchy clerk, or your friend misunderstood the clerk's *suggestion* that it's best suited for gay men.good looksit's four bucks dude, it's plenty of game for four bucks.

it's just a short game in general which kind of sucks.

(oh, and by the way... i actually bought it, beat it, returned it within the time limit and got my four bucks back, so that'd shouldn't really be a concern for anyone anyway)henry winkler is pretty well known as a short actor, yeahit's really notit is literally discrimination. it doesn't matter *why* you are discriminating, if you will allow one sex over the other, that's discrimination.yeah you're right, i forgot for a second that women are tiny fragile creatures that need men to protect them because they can't protect themselvesi felt the game was too short to be worthwhile. if i had enjoyed it more i would have kept it.

i did everything i was allowed to do. i didn't screw anyone out of any money. i didn't keep the game. that's how returns work....what comment do you think you're replying to?i have nothing against preference, but this is the reason why you shouldn't discriminate solely on sex:

plenty of males and females are comfortable being in their underwear around each other (if you personally have hang-ups about it, that's on you)

and plenty of dudes hook up with other dudes (and vice versa)that's the worst straw man argument i've ever seen. i clearly was talking about the definition of discrimination. it doesn't stop being discrimination based on why you're discriminating.most common grocery store cheeses do if you want to sell them to people without mold on them, which is what most customers want.how do you get into the speeder in the first place? i can't figure out how vehicles workMales can overpower other males, females can overpower other males. Go through craigslist again and see how many people are specifically saying "no weight lifters" or "no wrestlers!"

None
But there's plenty of no males.I'm hesitant to jump into... Whatever's happening in the comments here, but just so you know, throwing away water bottles isn't much of a threat. You're only hurting the production by tearing through water after one sip then throwing it out and cracking a new one. It doesn't affect the person whose water bottle it was at all.You're exaggerating. I don't care how over worked you are, you always have time to take a sip of water if you need it, and that's a safety issue so if you have a superior who's not okay with that tell them to fuck off.

Now z remembering to mark it when you've got a billion other things on your mind is different.That cam op was an idea, as I said in the comment above no one should be looking down on you for drinking water.&gt; You sound like you pick up garbage on set

Man, why'd you have to take it there?Well, a reminder would probably work better than an empty threatCalifornian?I guarantee I would instantly forget my number.I always have a smart water bottle that I just keep refilling. I can tell it's mine because no one buys boxes of smart water for crew. Everyone now and then it gets tossed by an overzealous PA, but I just spend the two bucks for a fresh one.When you turn pro you'll replace them with empty coffee cupsI do the exact same thing. Only time I get into trouble is when I take it out to replace it with a redbull and can't find it laterI'd hate to be the last guy to get one at the end of a huge crew. "Okay... Swastika for you... Ball sack for you... And Calvin peeing on a Toyota for you"...I have no clue what that was supposed to be before it got auto corrected. Idiot maybe? Asshole? Anyway he didn't know what he was talking about.I had a bad time with home made Indian curry once.

Also when I went on the gomad diet.Dude it's not that hard. "Hey man don't be a stranger, let's get a beer sometime."

"For sure man, when are you free?"

"Augh, crazy busy right now, you know how it is, but I'll get ahold of you. You still got the same number?" (Like anyone ever switches numbers... And in the extremely rare event they did, they'd just tell you that)This is an interesting difference in culture. Everyone likes to say how Americans are so fake with their replies... That may be True for some, and that's sad for them, but I'll give you a genuine answer.

It'll just be a few words long. "Not bad, yourself?"

"I been good man, how you holding up?"

Or even "I been better, but that's how it goes. What's new with you?"My friend had a bit about life in college

You wake up, worst hang over ever, doing everything you can not to puke

"Oh god, I feel horrible, I'm never touching alcohol again, I can barely move... Hey bro we drinking tonight?"It's not like they're boldly standing up for the integrity of the story. They know that the fans of this comic are now adults (comics in general, really-- that's where the majority of the spending is), and that's where their target demo is.

If fans of this comic were kids, this would be pg-13 whether the story warranted an R or not.Needing to wake up at 4am isn't inherently indicative of bad life choices, just ones different from yours.No man i saw one once, it's just people get the description wrong. Really they're only big enough for one person and there's no room to sit, they're really just more of a board so you lay on it and swim yourself out a ways then when a big wave comes up you stand on it and ride the wave in.I don't think you plow roads. Fields. You're thinking of plowing fields. And after you plow them, you sow your seeds in them.My understanding of office environments is that this happens because 80% of your time is waiting on someone else to do their job so you can do your jobI always forget but always make sure I do it so I can honestly say I didn't break any promises. "Oh hey Tom says hi."

"You saw Tom? When?"

"Like a month ago."To be fair, things were looking pretty shitty, then they got demonstrably less shitty.There are so many factors at play here. What kind of shower is it? Single person booth? Big open space? Tub or flat? Shower heads on multiple sides or just one leaky one? What's your height ratio compared to your partner?

I'm gonna say for most typical people it's terrible. But for some it can be greatJoke's on you, I quit jobs all the timeI don't get it either (male). I suppose it's supposed to play into some male domination fantasy but mostly it's just weird and looks uncomfortable for everyone. I prefer porn where they have sex like normal people.Get drunk first.

Best case scenario, less anxiety.

Worst case scenario, you blame it on whiskey dick.Be prepared for a ton of eli5 replies with dumbed down explanations to the point of telling you nothing practical or useful. Reddit is great for explaining the concept of the stock market, not for how it works practically.I don't have a car but I always figured if I needed to know any of that stuff there's probably a plethora of step by step guides on YouTubeReddit's answer: no one ever knows what they're doing and literally everyone is faking it

Actual answer: a lot of it aren't faking it and are fully capable adults living adult lives, but it's okay if you don't feel that way.

By the way, a major part of being an adult is knowing it's okay to ask for help or admit you don't know or can't do something.

Being an adult doesn't mean knowing what to do all the time in every situation.It's tough for me too but it comes from practice, not ability. As others have said compare it to something you do know the distance of. Is something ten feet away or twenty? How tall are you, a little over five feet? If you were laying down could you fit two of you or four of you in that space?for you guys bitching about carell in foxcatcher:

it's not about how dramatic the character is or how much you like them, it's how much ability the actor showed in the role. and steve's part was *much* harder and required *much* more skill than gyllenhaal's. that's not to say gyllenhaal didn't nail it, or that he's not capable of something much more difficult... but that's not the role he played.I was surprised at how many shots actually landed from that distance. I wouldn't have even landed one (and I'm not great, but I'm not bad)bummerI'm convinced that, as much as people like to say celebrities get out of everything ever (and i'm sure a lot of them do), I'm also sure a lot get taken in for bullshit from bitter/jealous cops just looking to bag a celebrity.Oh god, I've done four and a few cups of coffee and could barely handle it. You must've been up for daysThere were tons of very successful comic movies before iron man. It was really more of a slow build from moderate success, to bigger success, to huge success, which isn't a path we've seen from video game movies so far. Instead, what we've seen is at best a few moderate successes which are all far outweighed by abysmal failures.

Not to mention comic books have die hard fans dating back decades, video games not so much.I guess that's a fair pointThe irony is that you're replying to a top comment, the comment Reddit feels is most worthwhile to the discussion, which is giving the woman the benefit of the doubt, or at least questioning it.you can have a preference for non-smokers, that's fine, but saying it's because they taste like an ashtray is bullshit. many considerate smokers know to brush their teeth or at least pop a breathmint before they make out with someone.

i've been a smoker, and i've been a non-smoker, and kissing smokers as a non-smoker as far as bad breath goes is no more risky than kissing anyone else&gt; Game Dev Story-Unbelievably addictive simgame where you build a gaming company from the ground up.

i downloaded this yesterday and no joke played it for 12 hours straight without even realizing it. addicting is an understatement.

that said i'm pretty sure i hit a wall where i've advanced as far as i can and have more resources than god, so it's kind of lost its appeal. some might find some replayability in trying out different games, but i only ever wanted to make the games i want to make anyway. i have no interest in seeing what the best sim/education/history/animal/art combo is.

still, i got WAY more than my two and a half bucks out of itI saw that todayI think you're thinking that production refused to pay him... I find it more likely that he took the job unpaid. So production probably did live up to its side of the agreement.

This is going to depend on exactly what the agreement was, and that's going to be tricky because I bet no one remembers it exactly. Without a signed contract, an agreement still exists but it might be verbal and totally unverifiable.

Op, I'd suggest you probably don't have enough on your side to try and get this movie shut down, if that's what you're trying to do. You might be able to, but it'd be a hell of a long battle if they choose to make it one and it will probably come down to who wants to fight the hardest. How expensive of a lawyer do you want to get?Come on. It's one thing when someone pre-orders a game and whine about how the game is terrible. But this guy literally did not receive the product he pre-ordered. That's different....it absolutely worked with snes and n64 cartridges. Maybe you never needed to, that's great, but i certainly had to blow on cartridges to get dust off them and they'd work fine.uh... if it's non drive-able... don't you kinda have to have it towed regardless?so, i'm unemployed. three days of nothing, carry the one...

i can speed as much as i want!!!I imagine you can already have it towed by whomever you want, the above guy just didn't have anyoneThere's clearly not enough info to make a judgment call here, why are you guys trying to be burger snobs?Fwiw, in all but the cheapest diners $9 for a burger in NYC gets you two buns with a beef patty inside, while anywhere else it'll get you a cheeseburger with lettuce tomato onion and fries. It's difficult to compare prices like that, you're looking at closer to twelve to fourteen for a "cheeseburger deluxe" in NYC, on average.You can call it a gimmick to mask the flavor if you want, but I'll take a BBQ bacon cheeseburger over a regular any day.When people who love origins don't understand why people hate it...


this shit is exactly why. WB Montreal just didn't put in the love or care, and it's a bunch of small things that ultimately wreck the tone.

In the rocksteady games, if they didn't want you to go somewhere they'd put an impassable gun system, or at the very worst batman would say something like "I need to solve this crime before I go anywhere." That's the same kind of invisible wall, they're both obviously just plot devices to keep you where the game wants you, but at least it's something Batman would actually do. Just a tiny bit more thought and care besides "Don't go here cuz we don't want you to."

Instead you just end up saying "Goddamnit Batman, it's fucking police tape. You can take down Solomon Grundy but the police tape is giving you trouble?"&gt; Though, if there was a negative health affect, it wouldn't be due to the lack of calories, water also has no calories.

well yeah, but these have negative calories while retaining flavor you'd expect some calories. so yeah, not ingest calories isn't directly unhealthy, but the reason it's zero calorie *might* be

though you're right, all of the extensive studies have proven there's no negative health effectsi dunno. i've never actually paid percentage of final bill after a discount, but there have been a few times i almost have (you look at the total, you calculate the tip) before stopping myself and remembering that's a discount price.

And I'm more aware/generous of tipping than most, so I could easily see someone doing it and not realizing they did something wrong. In fact, I'd say the majority think that's what you're supposed to do and just don't think it through that it's a dick move.&gt; your stupid social construct

If you don't want to involve yourself in social constructs, don't involve yourself in society.

Stay at home and cook for yourself if you're too cheap to pay a fair price that society *and the law* recognizes as a social custom. **If** we all did away with tipping as standard, then you'd be justified. But we haven't, and you're not. You're just cheap.Eh, kind of. It's no less valid than it was before. It's not quite the same as a reboot in comics, because it wasn't the official media anyway (even if it was recognized as canon)... and I totally wouldn't be surprised if at some point they continue that continuity parallel to disney's anywaySometimes being able to rationalize plotholes in my mind makes me enjoy a show/movie a lot more. Occasionally if I can't get past something I genuinely can't enjoy it from there (like 21 Jump Street being completely based off a ridiculous False premise).

So I get where they're coming from.

Sometimes though, I can just say fuck it and move on.I especially like how the youtuber lets everyone know who the footage actually belongs to, otherwise I may have gotten confused and thought Disney had transferred the four billion dollar rights to some guy with a youtube channel.

Also, isn't it neat how putting a disclaimer up about not owning the footage makes it totally legit and legal?

(fwiw i'm not saying this guy made any major transgressions, it's freaking youtube, but i'm poking fun at the fact that he thinks he needs to put a disclaimer up, and that that disclaimer somehow protects him from whatever retribution he's imagining)It sounds like they screwed you in a lot of ways, but this sentence is pretty telling:

&gt; I never signed anything acknowledging that program nor did I agree about the $1200. 

because the thing is, you're obviously leaving out some information and just giving relevant facts that you think protect your side. You didn't "sign" anything, which you seem to assume means you're covered, but you don't mention whether or not you actually downloaded it. You don't mention what you agreed to, you don't mention what you said to whom or what you were told, just that you didn't sign anything.

So, the problem now is that there's a high likelihood of you just looking for people to side with you without giving the whole story. I'd go talk to a lawyer, because they're going to be able to poke *all* the holes in your story and get to the bottom of what really happened and what you can do. When you're looking for advice, being one-sided for yourself isn't the best course of action.

for instance, you bring up mandatory overtime with no OT pay... oh no, those bastards!

But wait, are you on salary? Are you exempt from OT pay as a medical worker? Any other exceptions (there are *many* exceptions to getting OT pay)? I don't know. It's possible you don't know. But I find it likely you have a pretty good idea, but maybe don't want to look too far into it and would rather just paint these guys as the baddest guys out there. A lawyer would be able to pick up on all these bits and pieces of your story that have tons of exceptions you're not willing to admit or look into.oh, stop being elitist. it obviously existed back when this was made, otherwise *no one* would get the joke

but it wasn't nearly as prevalent as it is now. it was a joke on a rare occurrence back then, poking fun at the "weird" people, and now is much more accepted and commonplace. That's what makes it prophetic.

The worst part of this is (and this is where I get downvotes), you're just pointing out what everyone already knows to help yourself feel superior at everyone who's not getting what's obvious to the rest of us.

In other words, congratulations on your acute sense of recognizing the obvious.so what is it that's keeping you from making a move, the fact that *she* wants to take things slow because of her previous relationship, or the fact that she keeps going back to them?

because if it's the former, fair enough but then why even say the latter? and if it's the latter, that really has no bearing on whether you make a move or not.it's a gender-neutral insult, unless you're specifically talking about the person's dick hole. i could as easily call a guy or girl a dickhead.What do you want to study them for? What are you trying to learn? What's your end goal.

Pick a topic and seek out things which illustrate that topic. You can't just "study directors" and hope to unlock the secrets of film making. You need to know what you're looking for.Probably not, but I have no idea what your skills are. Most professionals with that title make five to ten times that amount.

But is it a fair wage for you? That depends on more factors than we know.

A good place to start though, is whether or not you're using your own gear. I'd bet that you're using your own gear... And I bet your total package would be at least if not more than $200/day to rent. So yeah, they're probably taking you for a ride based on the value of your equipment alone (this is super common for amateur and low budget projects... Can't afford gear, so hire an operator at less than the cost of the gear)

At the end of the day, whether it's fair or not, it really just matters whether you're happy with it.

Also, you probably won't have any luck negotiating a higher budget. They probably decided what amount they wanted to pay and found someone at that price (and can do so again) rather than finding someone they wanted and budgeting what they're worth.

e: apparently it's $200 flat, not per day. so... that changes things a bit... Wait. Your budget is $800 total?

Are you... Getting a flat $200 for two weeks of work? I thought it was $200/day.

Well, let's just say at that rate you must REALLY want to shoot this. From a monetary standpoint you're far better off searching for other jobs. Not even film jobs, even just washing dishes pays more.

So if you are getting two hundred flat... Yeah, I would make sure you REALLY want the job.

ps if this was me and i really wanted to do the gig but they were only offering $200 *flat*, i'd tell them to put it towards food or extra booze at the wrap party and i'd do the job as a favor. that's a pretty insulting number, and it's better to have a favor in your pocket anyway. plus, you get a little higher ground if someone starts giving you shit for anything. if you get stuck in traffic and are ten minutes late, no one can give you shit for it. you want to go smoke a cigarette but the producer tells you you need to move on, you tell them to go ahead and dock your pay. people are a lot more lenient when you're doing something as a favor than if you're doing it for pay, even if the pay is just $1.

~~but i may be misunderstanding you and you're getting $200/day.~~ saw your other comment. $200 flat for two weeks. ouch, man. if you're actually working two weeks straight, that's $14/day. if you're only working five days a week out of the two weeks, you get all the way up to $20/day. yeah if i wanted the gig that bad i would probably pass on the rate and just do it as a favor.If you're not cracking up in the first couple pages, it's probably just not for you.

Funniest book i've ever read, including the entire hitchhiker's trilogythe bummer is that because you grow your own in the country, they probably think you're the rare exceptionokay, well, where *should* I go in France, then?that's only True if you're in a place where it's easy to find. Go to most rural or suburban areas and you're gonna have a lot of trouble finding it.

Hell, in some places you're going to have trouble finding "cheese." That's it, no qualifiers, just food that is actually cheese and not velveeta or kraft cheese-flavored product.&gt; and then just give them back.

and then he sells them to someone elsethat relationship sounds super unhealthy.

not because he had a weird fetish, but because he kept trying to make you an unwilling participant in it.

that's fucked up.The best place to start is to go ahead and begin directing, writing and editing.

Then look at your stuff and figure out what it's lacking.

Now you know what to study, and you can go study it.

I promise, if you don't know what you're looking for, studying directors won't help at all.nintendo games were and are *riddled* with glitches, they just weren't as obvious in normal gameplay.

just go watch a speedrun vid of, like, any pre-2000 nintendo game. bugs/glitches galore.Here's what you can do:

Call the credit card company and the cops. Tell them he stole your credit card, present them with the evidence, and tell the credit card company you did not authorize those charges. They will seek to verify whether or not you authorized them, and when they find out you didn't, they will refund the money.

They will then track down your brother and attempt to get the money from him. This will probably mean he goes to jail for cc/identity fraud.

Your father will have to do the same.

If no one wants your brother to end up in jail, you probably just need to accept the fact that when he steals money from you, it's his money now. You can either use the law's protections to ensure justice, or not. You can't have it both ways.1) Learn not to be a bitch.

2) Tell everyone else your story so they don't repeat your spineless mistake and send a potentially innocent man to jail.Uh... what?

The idea of basic human rights is that every person deserves a certain amount of respect and benefits that can't be taken away. This is an opinion, in actuality no human "deserves" anything just for existing-- nature doesn't give a shit if you live or die. So "basic human rights" are whatever we decide they are.

In more developed countries, the government decides there are things like having access to food and shelter, maybe clothes, maybe (not always) health care, that kind of thing.

Other countries can not give those things without punishment because... there's no one to punish them. I don't really understand that part of the question.well that's not even a little bit True. we have tons of laws ensuring privacy-- it's kind of a big deal.

you may be mistaking it for not having *absolute privacy* everywhere you go.There's no such thing as an objective basic human right. Like I said, mother nature doesn't grant you any rights at all. Only *people* can grant rights, and they grant whichever rights they decide should be basic. They're just people with opinions, and not everyone has the same one.Corey and Shawn and I don't care if it's not a movieIt definitely was to me, but to be totally honest it's funny in a completely different way. It's more... Wordplay. I don't know how funny you'll find it that a guy named Major Major made it to the rank of Major, making him Major Major Major (technically his middle name is Major too, but calling him Major Major Major Major would be ridiculous) but I found it hilarious

But it's not played for laughs at all, it's completely serious. I mean, the author knows it's a joke, it's not like it's funny unintentionally.

Oh hell you'll see what I mean.My roommates gave me a ton of shit for this but in college I was extremely comfortable taking a long piece of cardboard, one of those foam egg crate mattress toppers, and laying a comforter over both and sleeping on that.

If you like firm beds it's extremely cost effective if you're not one to get embarrassed, and all those items can be found for cheap or free.

If you mean you want a frame, I can't help you except to say keep checking craigslistThat is almost never True.It seems unlikely any single person would get rich off this. They'd need way more research money than any single scientist could afford, meaning they're likely working for a corporation. Even if the corporation made millions off this, it would get divided up amongst the owners.You say it as a joke but marketing companies will buy high karma accounts.Keep going man, it's confusing intentionally and brings it together laterDude, shut up.Dunno. There are other factors though. Go Google it, I guessThey can still do that with an essentially limitless method of adding accessories, but everyone figured out the best way to make money is to keep releasing the same game every year with minor changes, relaxed qc and a shit ton of cosmetic dlcOkay. Now go think about which of us that makes the more responsible adult. The one who lived frugally yet comfortably in a time of financial struggle

Or the one that makes fun of someone for being poorYeah, that sounds totally hilarious. You're definitely hilarious. It's my fault for not understanding how hilarious you are.Creative. I like it! Keeping medical advancements from the public for personal profit, it's the American wayThat's one of the least creative hits ever. Imagine that pitch session.

"Guys, we're losing kids. We need something fresh, something new, for the pre school demographic. Something that really sells it, that no one else is doing. Johnson? What've you got?"

Johnson pulls his head out of his hands, annoyed that loud noises are coming at him. The coke has mostly worn off, but the alcohol is still taking its toll.

"Ugh. Uh. What about, like... A face."

"A face? Explain yourself, Johnson."

"Okay. Uh. Didn't expect you to take that seriously. So it's like, a face. It can be red. Or blue. Whatever, it's both."

"You mean it switches colors?"

"Sure, whatever. And it talks to kids before and after commercials. But it's, yknow, cute about it."

"Johnson, that's brilliant. And what do we call this face?"

"Uhhh....."Eh. Kind of. Not really.It's a lot easier when you're terrible. I'm gonna die immediately by someone, might as well pop a few shots off at the Hero before it happens.well, 1) jack *freed* the slaves. it's not that dark

2) that movie is literally about being enslaved on a pirate shipAnd every time someone brings this up, I feel compelled to say (at the risk of many downvotes),

**that is a fan theory with no direct evidence that that order was given before the falcon left the death star**

it's a good fan theory, it's one that explains a lot and which i enjoy

but it's not supported by the evidence in the movie

so stop declaring it as fact.

(by the way, the stormtroopers are *always* bad shots, not just on that death star encounter)actually it made zero sense.

we have a clear, documented history of the evolution of computers. or are we to believe that computers were following a linear progression but that current iteration of computers happened to be reverse engineered from alien tech, even though there was a clear logical progression taking us there any way?

or did alan turing actually reverse engineer them for the very first computer, and if so why was it so goddamn basic if it came from alien tech, and how did we manage to progress them parallel enough to the originals over the next *fifty* years to still be able to infect them? hell i can't even infect a mac with a pc.

yeah, this explanation just brings up more questions. it actually makes more sense to be like "uh, it was a special program that works with everything"...that was part of the story.&gt; Sauron was actually a lieutenant to a more powerful evil being, Morgoth

who's that guy and what happened to him? (I could wikipedia it but i'm looking for a layman explanation which i'm sure any site online wouldn't give)They invited Bill Goldman (the writer of the book and movie) to set one day.

Allegedly, during the scene where the princess gets her dress caught on fire, goldman freaked out and ran out to put the flames out.

Everyone stopped and was like "Dude, Bill, that's supposed to happen. Y'know... like how you wrote it."

He says oh, right and they reset the scene.

And he goddamn does it again.

They had to take him off set to finish shooting.alternately, allegedly the actors had to go to singer and tell him they couldn't act with del toro because they had no idea what he was saying. del toro had decided his character should speak with a very heavy slur.

singer thought about it, decided he liked it, and told them to just go with it. in the movie, you see a lot of the characters look at del toro's character in confusion right after he speaks, then just ignore him and move on. it's genuine.&gt; -The Wachowskis originally had it in the script that the humans were being used as a neural computer network instead of an energy source. Studio heads decided against this as they believed that audiences wouldn't understand it.

people bitch about this change a lot, and i understand why...

but no one knows if that movie would have been as successful if it had been neural network instead of battery. maybe those execs were right. we don't know if they made the right call or the wrong call, all we know is they made the call and the movie was insanely successful.One sided bias. He probably didn't say it like that and genuinely didn't consciously think that, but that's how the story teller saw it so that's how she told it

e: come on, you guys really think he went on the phone and said "No, I want you to stay my fuck buddy and not bang anyone else, wait for me to call you but sometimes i won't and will go fuck other people but you're not allowed to"? How naive is that?

Nah. More likely he said "Look, maybe we can work things out, let's take some time before you get in a relationship with someone else"

and OP said "Do you want to get back together?"

and the guy said "Well, no, but let's figure some things out first"

and OP mentally decided "Oh so you just want me as a fuckbuddy while you also fuck everyone else, but I can't be with anyone else"i dunno, they all sound kind of like selfish crybaby dicksto hear devs talk about it, apparently this mentality is super frustrating, because people complain about bugs, but devs don't know what the fuck bugs there are (or more specifically, what's causing them) because no one ever reports that shit

they just go online and complain about itshoot it to every festival that has no submission fee and doesn't mind non-exclusive premieres.Eh. It'll be limiting but you won't be dead in the water.

In order of preference, festivals like:

1) Being a world premiere

2) Being a regional premiere

3) Something that isn't available to the public

4) Something that isn't available to the public for free

You're better off waiting until you've done the festival circuitI'm not sure what you're asking. They have the footage and are selling it. It's public domain, so they're allowed to do that without having to get permission or pay licensing fees to anyone.Sure. But you don't have them.grow upthey didn't relight, so i'd suggest it's mostly a time saver and/or aesthetics. there's only two of them and you're not gonna get them confused, so there's no real reason to stick to the line. if they decide one shot would look better backlit, and the other would look better side lit, they can just change the angle. or if they want a profile shot but there's set dressing in the way, they can go to the other side. i'd say anyone looking for a thematic or tonal reason is *probably* looking too hard for depth. more likely it's just an instance where boyle knew he wasn't bound by the 180 line so didn't bother with it.

personally i'm not a fan, the scene does feel a little shakey to me which could be because of that, and not in a good way. but hey, maybe it'll make more sense in context of the movie.which brings up my final point: we're expected to believe that we developed computer hardware *and* software so closely parallel to alien technology in *fifty* years that we could upload a virus to it? Again, macs and PC's aren't even that compatible, and they were developed simultaneously by the same race.

Not to mention that alien tech had advanced fifty years as well. I can't even take a virus from ten years ago and infect a modern computer.

Trying to come up with this explanation raises even more questions than not having an explanation at all.Why do you think film school isn't for you? With your current plan, I think you'll find you never quite have the free time (or drive) to progress as you need to as a professional on set. There are a couple options, but the best "bide my time while I work on getting into the industry" plan is film school. You get to learn, you get to practice, you get to make connections and you get four whole years to work on your craft before you get thrown out into having to get a job.Depends on which budget you're talking about/who's looking at it. It's included in what a studio is going to look at when deciding if a film is profitable or not, for sure. It's not part of the production budget though, because it's not part of the production.What's your experience? What position are you going for? What's your portfolio look like? What's your cover letter look like? Which jobs are you going out for? What kinds of connections do you have? And how long have you been trying?I'm convinced the bubble is going to pop sometime soon. I heard the same stuff in Michigan, in Boston, in... Was it Oregon? Maybe Georgia? Anyway, everyone was convinced they were the next new York/LA, until it all dried up. Maybe Atlanta will be smarter and keep it going, but I'm not convinced.my take on it when people say they *need* to work for free or insulting wages to get a portfolio is...

just go shoot your own stuff. You might as well if you're providing all the gear anyway. Get a basic concept together, something simple, grab a few friends to be actors and go shoot it (if you don't have a friend/equipment to run sound, make it a silent film). You'll not only get material for a portfolio, but you'll get material that you can specifically design to show off your skills. And you don't have to worry about what will undoubtedly be an inexperienced director/producer tying your hands.

the only reason i'd recommend someone go with someone else's project for portfolio reasons is if they're doing something really cool you can't do yourself, which probably means a lot of money, which means a big budget, which means... not the kind of projects that pay you $200.&gt; what will you be able to do with the fact that you have DP'd a feature in the future?

in this day? nothing. people can and do make horrible, shit movies that technically run for eighty minutes, being able to put "feature" on your credits list means nothing by itself these days.a little copy/pasting, a little clever editing, a few look-alikes, some good make-up, a few bald guys not facing the camera aaaaaand what looks like one guy who might even be in a mask or prosthetics.take a long time in the bathroom when there's a line.

the whole time up there, "come on buddy, fuck this guy, doesn't he know there's people out here? so fucking inconsiderate, what's his problem"

then you get in there and it's like "my turn now, bitches! I waited for it, I earned it, I get all the time I want"&gt; more often than not.

...that's not really a standard of quality that fills me with confidenceyou don't get to *not* take the helicopter ride if you're stuck on a mountain during a fire or whatever. it's like the er: no one's going to deny it to you based on your financial situation, but if you have any money, you probably won't afterwards.this stopped being funny the tenth time i saw it on facebook.&gt; throw more men at it strategery is effective

doesn't china win at that strategy?so make a bridge theni don't need or want to see a mental health physician. if i did, i could pay for it. since i don't, i'm not paying for it.

others, however, are paying for it either way.sure, but when you hit the "report a bug" button, it doesn't just tell the devs "hey, something fucked up!"

it tells them exactly what fucked up and how, and what the program was doing before and leading up to and during the fuck-up, and, i assume, loads of other things like software version, maybe what OS, whether any other programs were interacting with it...

whereas online people just say "Hey the thing fucked up, it sucks!"sounds a lot like braidi like how in #2 the artist has clearly spent *tons* of time learning how to draw amazing, nearly photo-realistic (though exaggerated) boobs and body shape

and then you get to the toes and it's like "fuck it"i think there are a few times they heavily imply the parents smoke but don't actually show it... just like with the main castthe very first spin-off was *fine,* in a tbs saturday morning movie of the week kind of way (except if it was actually on tbs it'd be edited for content, which means it'd be twenty minutes of a guy trying to learn how to play the flute)I'm a lot more brazen knowing I'm judgment proof.

"Hey, you signed this contract which says you have to do this thing or we'll sue you!"

"Go for it, bitches. Good luck getting nothin' from my nothin'."i never quite believed this. i'm sure there will be *some* people who try to mooch, but they'll probably be pretty see-through, and if they aren't who cares because you're apparently having fun.

i have plenty of friends, and there's a few very rich people in the group, and we never hang out with them for their money at all. we hang out with them because we like hanging out with them. if they offer to pay for stuff, awesome. it lets us do cool/fun things together we otherwise wouldn't. if they don't, that's cool too.most of them, in my experience, automatically log that stuff and you just hit the buttonyeah that's the oneno, i hate not being able to drive. i love driving. so much. it's so relaxing, it's so convenient. anytime anyone starts getting cabin fever in nyc, i'm convinced it's because they can't drive.

that said, i do love a lot of things about our public transportation system. it is convenient, it is cheap, it's nice not worrying about whether i'm too drunk to drive, the subway gets me anywhere in the city for a couple bucks, etc.

i just really miss driving.dude, what's the one word you can always use to describe sonic, no matter what video game, tv show, comic, or any other form of media?


**fast.**

sonic needs to be fast.

he's not strong, he doesn't have any range

you need to beat on your opponent often, and do it fast. get in, get out.

you seem to be trying to play more mindgames, reading, trying to get in to punish bad moves.

do that shit with a different character, because sonic is all about getting the other guy before he hits you. before he even knows what's going on.yeah, i loved that book.well if i want to talk a day trip an hour outside of the city, sure. but if i want to go to DC or Connecticut for the weekend or something the cost is huge.yeah, exactly.nope, but i've seen this kind of stuff happen enough that no one in real life would say the things op claimed he said, but people often twist their ex's words into what they inferred them to mean (and may even be right, but that's not the point). that may have well been the situation op ended up in had she gotten back with the guy, but i'm positive he wasn't that blunt about it. and not just to not be a dick-- people simply aren't that self-aware.so build a tunnel thenYep, he sure does. After the space dogfight. Nowhere is it mentioned the plan extends to them on the deathstar. There's every reason to believe that vader would have wanted to keep the princess if he *already had* the princess, but changed orders once she escaped

or that vader never gave the actual command to the stormtroopers, but knew they'd get away if he didn't go after them himself.

i guess the annoying thing is, there's always someone that brings up tarkin's line, which shows how much people want to cling to this despite there being no evidence: they point out the line even after i've stated that there's no reason to believe it applies to the stormtroopers **on** the death star.&gt; It depends on who I send it to. Do you want me to send it?

Sure, you can send it.

Sounds like you're in a tough spot. As others have said, Dallas just isn't quite the place to do what you're trying to do.

That said, it sounds like your major problems are diffusion of skill sets and lack of experience (I know, it's fucking frustrating as hell that you need a job to get a job).

What I'd do is one of two things:

1) Lower your standards for being a PA and focus just on getting work as a PA. Check craigslist every day and go for every PA gig that comes up.

2) Get your friends together and start making movies. Make your own stuff to increase your portfolio and learn. Then you can start reaching out to friends or friends of friends and start shooting concerts and weddings, maybe local art shows, that kind of thing. Offer to do it for severely reduced prices, write up a great proposal about how you're looking for experience and willing to shoot their concert for fifty bucks or something.

That's at least a start.a lens, a battery, a memory card is the bare minimum to get it to record.

after that i would get a tripod, then i would get better/more lenses, batteries, memory cards.

after that i would tailor things to the kind of shooting i'm doing.ebay's also pretty good about buyer protectionhow many?you're just describing a typical movie structure.

one main protagonist who's flawed and in nearly every scene. that's how most movies are, or strive to be.No matter how much testing a company does they're never going to find everythingMy dad has the same kind of thing where he always says the same joke that we've heard thousands of times. Watching a big flashy sci Fi movie, just when something crazy happens like the heroes blow up the huge starship or whatever...

"You know, this is based on a True story."

Eventually I started beating him to it. This is why dad jokes never die.I find it likely you're not "recoiling" in the same way, but rather moving away/pushing him away. Recoiling is a reflex, not a conscious decision for a reason.

If you're genuinely recoiling as a reflex, it would indicate you don't want to be kissed/touched by him in general, not just because of the setting/circumstances. A more appropriate word may be "flinch." If someone flinches when you try to kiss them, it's not because they're doing the dishes.I'm a few hours late and don't have an interesting story, but you asked, so...

when my girlfriend made plans to be away for work for several months without even discussing it with me, i knew it was time for a talk. We had always been on the precipice of "Will things last?" because there were several barriers, and that was the time I knew that no, things aren't moving forward in the relationship and they aren't going to.

It's not that I was mad she was leaving, I would have supported her, but not even being a factor in that decision or her even talking to me about it first was a pretty clear sign. We talked about it and ended it amicably, we both knew it meant we weren't moving forward.Nah, George would find out the SO was never sneak-moving-in at all, he had jumped the gun because she had to leave some clothes at his place because her cleaners closed for a few weeks, and all of a sudden she comes home and he's moving his couch into her apartment while she was supposed to be at work.

"George, if you had a problem with my clothes at your place you could've just said something."

"Ohhhh ho ho no, that's just what you *want* me to do! I talk to you about your clothes and you convince me to let you move in, and then it's not 'my' apartment, it's 'our' apartment. Well you can have it!"I had a high school friend who this happened to once, except instead of a teen pregnancy it was a *fake* pregnancy she came up with to get him to support her... so he goes off to the armed forces (think it might have been navy) to support his family, sends her money, comes back and finds out there's no kids and she's been banging everything that moves.

Really feel for that guy.yeah, but does she have to practice on other guys? i mean, what one of us here would turn down extra practice sessions?it's early for a typical relationship. usually two to three years is most common.

of course, some do it in six months. hell, some do it in a few weeks, and i bet we can find someone that did it day of.

and then some who don't do it even after ten years. there's the whole spectrum, but yeah, typical is two to three years. and that's of people who have moved in at all, many date for several years without ever moving in and usually end it (imo, the reason they never moved in is because they knew in some form it wasn't going to be a permanent relationship)eh, academic integrity aside simply doing the essay for her isn't that big a deal, it shouldn't be outrageous that a married couple share the workload based on who can do what when

it's the specifics surrounding it that made it suck.it boggles my mind how terrible some people can be. like, a total lack of human decency. when i hear about some people's ex's, i'm amazed they were with them at all. i know what self-delusional can do, but still... boggles my mind.

even if i gave zero fucks about someone i wouldn't *laugh* when they cry. i'd at least feign comfort, and i'd expect any normal person to do the same.what counts as a long trip? My last SO and I did a four-day vacation, had a blast. The one before did about a week and had a ton of fun. I know it's not a perfect indicator, you can still go on trips with someone who's not right for you, but do you think it needs to be more like two weeks? or just a couple days?good point, we should probably make it a bridge insteadrum and coke is the nectar of the godsi have a friend who apparently doesn't understand how notifications work.

i'll get:

two calls in a row

texts "hey whats up"

"hey"

"?"

"hey whats up"

"dude where r u"

"hey"

followed by another phone call

no matter how many times i try to explain it to him, he still does it. there are only two options here: either i am unable to respond, or am unwilling. either way, texting me *more* isn't helping the situation! one is just fine!also, like it or not, there are some people that would have a huge problem living with a bi or gay person, so best to just let them know up front so they can decline the apartment, rather than them finding out two weeks in when one of the dudes brings a dude home, and the new roommate flips their shiti have a friend who will kick into that mode occasionally, and it's really frustrating. 90% of the time he's an awesome dude and one of my best friends, but for some reason every now and then he needs to be top dog and just shits on someone (he usually picks one person too, whoever's the easiest target. I'm convinced he doesn't realize he's doing it, something in him just wants attention and he does things that get it)oh for sure, your particular scenario is total bullshit. i'm just saying, it's not bullshit because you were doing the work, it's bullshit because of the situation around it.&gt; I mean is it really any different that any other blood?

No. Do you expect us to be totally cool with getting covered in, or shown in the toilet, any other kind of blood?

Besides a few exceptions, *most* bodily fluids are pretty gross. They're natural, they're healthy... they're still gross.&gt; The more time I spend on reddit, the more I realize how many girls have crazy expectations for men's genitalia.

I mean, that's the thing. Sure, there are other ways to get a girl off but *some* really prefer the dick, and after a guy comes there's not a lot of incentive there for him to get it back up, so she's going down furiously to get it back up and keep going and I'm just kinda like "ehhh that's... probably not gonna happen"so, real talk, how often do you masturbate and how often do you have sex?

i noticed it got *way* easier for me to orgasm during sex when i completely stopped masturbating. if i still do occasionally, it's much more difficult for me to orgasm during sex.

something to think about.you bastards are the reason i have to stand eight feet away from public urinals to take a leakugh, i don't get how people can do this. it's so fucking uncomfortable.&gt; cockholes

uh, that's not... uh..i've had it happen veeeeery few times (and, by the way, it's not a measure of how good the sex was, so don't start thinking if your man hasn't done it you didn't do a good enough job or something)

but i've done it to plenty of women, so i assume it is in fact far more common with them. maybe something about stronger/more orgasms?apparently scientists (look how specific i am) have concluded that the pain factor of a male passing kidney stones is higher than that of child birthit's really funny watching tv shows that span this period, the early episodes are all "Ugh, where is this person, I wish I could find them but they're not where they said they'd be"

and then halfway through season 5 or whatever it's just "Oh I'm going to text Jake on his cell to tell him what movie times I just looked up on my phone" basically out of nowhere. They're not there, then they're there.eh, people keep saying this... but i greatly prefer my dslr. my phone can't do manual controls and the zoom is terrible. maybe other phones have better control/quality, but i'm on a fairly modern one (droid razr maxx)well, but he doesn't though. he uses the laws of nature in improbably ways, not impossible ways.

except when he does it in impossible ways.

but he didn't that time.if any part of the world wasn't submerged, it's kind of missing the whole point. in other words, god woulda dun goofed.okay, but there's a huge difference between "some major floods happened!" and "the entire world was literally covered in water while exactly two of *every single animal* were all put on one big boat for forty days to repopulate the earth"

with the first one, y'know, okay that makes sense.

with the second one it's like... where do I even *start* explaining how impossible and illogical that is?no it wasn't. it was released in 2014, but had most of its run in 2015.okay, i figured out why this sounded so off.

it's actually listed as the highest grossing movie of *2014*, because it was technically released on christmas of 2014 (i knew there was no way in hell it beat avengers).

this makes it a bit trickier, because in that list it's competing against movies it didn't actually compete with. 2014 was way more relaxed in terms of the big franchises, because all the other huge tentpole franchises were gearing up for big releases in 2015.

also, this is domestic only, not counting foreign box office

e: but yes your point stands that it's very surprising that a movie with that subject matter made that much money&gt; I can't believe someone thinks this is good PR for Jesus.

i'm pretty convinced at that point they're not saying it for you, they're saying it for themselves.That's less funny and more just douchey.A good server will ask if they're ready for it first, so they will have indeed ordered the check.

Note: technically proper etiquette is to ask if there's anything else you can get them, or if the restaurant is pushy about upselling ask if they want dessert, and if the answer is no it's strongly implied the customer should ask for the check. Either way bad move to just bring it unasked.... What are YOU looking at? Because that shows the release in 2014

E: the first line of the article even says it's a 2014 movieIt's never been that hard for me to understand (I'm a non-believer). Someone loses their daughter, you don't think it's easy to believe they're literally in a better place and you'll get to be with them again someday?

Someone is going through a crisis and has no idea what to do with their life, you don't think it's easy to believe someone has a plan for them and will put them on the right path?

Someone experiences huge personal tragedy, you don't think it's easy to believe something made it happen for the greater good?

I can't bring myself to believe it, but I completely understand those who do.

I was working a mentalist/speaker of the dead show once, and it was 100% exactly what you'd expect with the guy using what was overheard before hand and general intuitiveness to make vague guesses about people's relationships. Completely see-through from an objective viewpoint.

"I'm seeing a name that starts with an H... anyone here have someone that starts with an H?"

"Yes, I do."

"I'm seeing a close relative... a brother? A father?"

"No, my roommate's sister."

"Ah, must not be you then. Anyone else? A relative that starts with H?"

"My step-father's name was Henry."

"Yes! It must be you! He says he misses you and loves you."

"Oh that means so much to me."

that kind of thing. (somewhat more in depth, the guy was super skilled at it, but that's the basic idea)

And yet all these people believed it 100%, simply because they wanted to. It was comforting to them to believe that their loved ones were at peace and still existed in some form and still cared about them.

ps and there were a few times when it didn't work, of course. the guy would say "I'm getting a Frederick... any Fredericks? No? No one with a Frederick? That person must've gotten lost on the way here!" "hahahaha." and they kept right on believing itThere's a corner on 42nd street in manhattan i can stand on and see three starbucks.i think the difference is they maybe don't *want* it as much as men, but *enjoy* it as much as men (generalizing, of course)

sounds like a semantics difference but i think it explains why some men go to absurd, and occasionally disgusting or pathetic attempts to get it, while women usually don't.i honestly don't know what in the holy hell has convinced you it was released in 2015. literally nothing anywhere is saying that, even the wikipedia article you gave says it's a 2014 movie, released *to theaters* on dec. 25th 2014.

i mean... that's as definitive as it gets.this tends to lessen significantly after high school, then college. it still exists, but most normal people recognize those people are scumbags.ayup. you can tell the difference between complaining and bragging from 1) who brings it up first (if you mention you got little sleep and they one-up you, that's bragging) and 2) when it gets into the realm of impossibility. want to complain you only got three hours last night, okay, that sucks. want to "complain" that you've only had five hours of sleep for the past 72 hours? No, I don't believe you and I'm not impressed (unless you are a doctor working in the ER or something)no, you can definitely manage it, there's something mental that's holding you back.

wake-up call.

(by the way, there's nothing wrong with not sleeping with chicks, and there's definitely nothing wrong with not sleeping with shitty chicks... but it's certainly not impossible)having a massive tolerance sucks

1) you have to spend way more money to get drunk (freaking annoying when my date wants to go to an expensive bar, to her it's twelve bucks for a drink that gets her drunk, for me it's twelve bucks to not even start feeling a buzz)

2) it's a lot harder to hit the line between "drunk" and "too drunk," so you often end up either buzzed but not drunk, or falling down hammered.it *was* released in 2014. I honestly don't know what you're getting at. Yes, let's look at where it says "Release dates". Quoted directly from your source:

&gt; Release dates
November 11, 2014 (AFI Fest)


&gt;December 25, 2014 (United States)

Both of those are 2014. Neither is 2015. Nowhere does it say it was released in 2015.

And i'm not arguing with the other guy, I'm arguing with *you*, who said it was released in 2015. It was not. I honestly don't get why you're still going on about this, besides that you must be the worst troll ever.&gt; nearly as deadly

point of contention, something is either deadly or it isn't. if it's "nearly" as deadly, it's not deadly.Anytime I get the heroes I always manage to die before I kill anyone. I don't know what the fuck I'm doing in this game.that's a difficult situation. it's easy to say after the fact, but in the moment you're the guy who's being a pain in the ass, everyone else is just going with it, and the dude's not *wrong,* you are using his services which no one forced you into, it's just a dick move of him to wait until you're in the car to say anything.

in other words, easier said than done. do you *really* want to start a fight with your friend's dad, and probably your friend, which may ruin the night when you're just looking to have a good time?

e: okay, i guess you're all a bunch of total badasses who absolutely would have raised hell as a pressured 16-year old against a grown man who's completely in control of you and could drop you on the side of the road because the guy was being kind of a dickbag. you're all very, very cool.&gt; Unless the captain refunded each player pro rata to each player (about $2/player?), we can assume he pocketed the money.

there's a small chance the captain refunded the $10 to the player who couldn't make itthat doesn't matter. you don't get to call in what someone "owes" you when you "owe" them more for the exact same thing. That's not how owing someone works.

If the father had been in desperate financial straits, the proper thing to do would be to explain the situation and ask for some help.

Or, as others suggested, tell them they need to eat before hand or on their own.I'm not disagreeing, I'm just saying it's a lot harder to say no when you're a teenager in that situation&gt; it is entirely wrong for that man to demand payment.

i'm not disagreeing at all. what i'm disagreeing with is all the people saying they definitely wouldn't have paid.

you very likely would have, as would nearly all of us.if they *hadn't* died in that accident

but you had found out they were driving under the influence

would you be okay with personally killing them? Would you be willing to walk up to each of them with a gun and shooting them in the head?

Probably not, because condemning someone to death for a stupid, immature mistake is not what we want to do.

And yet somehow, you're doing it anyway.I don't understand the point these videos are trying to make.

1) A huge amount of new yorkers are just going to say "No" to get you to leave them alone because they think you're trying to scam them out of something. They won't even really look at the guy

and 2) ask enough people *any* question, even the most obvious ones, and you're going to get some who don't give the right answer. They freeze up, they forget, or they just don't know. I'm positive this video isn't an accurate representation of all the people they askedSeems like a lot of it has to do with exactly where he's aiming though. Doesn't kill my believability if a trained gunsman stands a foot away from the lock, knows exactly where to shoot it and fires, especially if it's a bit of an older lock.believe what you want, but it's not an impossibility for anyone&gt; An editor is not there to service a director.

Yes, they are, just like everyone else on set. We're all there to put on screen the director's vision as faithfully as possible. Editing is quite literally a service you are providing.

That doesn't mean you should take abuse, it doesn't mean you need to be a loyal lapdog who gets barked commands and obeys them

but you'll be a lot happier when you realize your job, and your only job, is to get what the director wants on screen. And if that means doing what the director wants instead of what you want, that's the gig. (In fact, it should probably *not* be the gig because it probably means you're the wrong guy for the project, if you're in frequent major disagreements)

the only time you *aren't* "servicing the director" is when the producers tell you to do something different. in which case, time for a talk...The most important thing is do what you're told and do *only* what you're told.

For your first day, just do that.

After that, you can start being a *little* more assertive, asking if you can get anything for anyone, what you can help do, that kind of thing.

And remember, if you don't know something ask. **Do not** try to figure it out on your own. You might break something, you might hurt someone, or worst of all you might look really stupid. No one's going to blame you for asking questions.Be honest

is every clip here from a project you've worked on? Are these all from videos online somewhere I can go watch? It seems like a lot of these are just you playing/messing around, testing out your camera, and maybe even a few that you just got for your reel.

Build up your portfolio first, and then take your shots from that.

You'll understand why once you've done it.nope, i was one of the failures who decided i didn't want to anymore.If I had work that I couldn't get done but she was capable of doing, absolutely. In fact it's very common for someone to ask their spouse to go in and file papers or something for them if they're unable to do so. Hell, I've helped my parents out even at their work."I'm not dealing with this shit" man.

"We need to keep our identities secret! Have you come up with an alter ego for yourself?"

"No, Batman. I'm not dealing with this shit. Let's just go punch some bad guys."man, you know what offends me? you have *bill freaking nye* on your show and you waste like thirty seconds on whether or not he was making a dick joke. you don't have anything better to talk to him about?

e: i paused too early. they went on for like a solid minute. "Ohhh DICK jokes! Hahaha" SHUT UP AND LET THE MAN TALK ABOUT LIFE ON MARS GODDAMNIT.i totally understand why they thought this would be a good idea. it sounds like a good idea. let's have one of the leading scientists on to talk about and explain these recent revelations, then let's have common people to represent, well, all the viewers to see how bill nye can explain to them why the common people should care about this.

the problem was these specific people were like "Man I don't care bout none of that shit!"

Personally I would *love* to be asking Bill Nye why this is important... because I don't really know. He did a fair job of explaining it, but he had to spend more time just convincing them not to be morons.i believe that was the jokewell, here we run into a problem. racist/sexist jokes are okay as long as *you specifically* find them funny? why do you get to be the decider on what's allowed to be racist/sexist?

a better way of putting it would be racist/sexist jokes are fine so long as they're *jokes.* As in, an actual joke that's not just someone being racist or sexist. Even if I don't find it funny, I at least appreciate that it's done for the art of comedy.

But if someone's like "Man, I hate when those lazy black people get into the group, they never get any work done."

"Dude..."

"Come on, it's just a joke!"i am 100% behind this so long as it means i get a refund on the taxes i pay for the city street cleaners.you know what's worse than that? the people who, when you do hit your turn signal ahead of time, speed up like a madman to prevent you from changing lanes in front of them.

*that is not why I turned on my signal.*i think that's more a middle class thing, really. when you're *poor* you go bargain hunting on craigslist. i suppose that might just be a factor of changing times and having the internet as a resource.said by people with good money to spendis... does lemonade not mean what i think it means in this context?not quite the same, but apparently they had a way different direction in mind for the character until LeBlanc came on and they saw what he was doing with JoeyI'm almost sure they had special bras with nipples built in or somethingthere was a whole episode about it...

what gets me though isn't just that they were rich, it's that to be "I can afford a two bedroom apartment *in the village* on my salary" rich, you have to be *rich.*

And they don't act *rich.* I know people making crazy amounts of money and they still need a roommate for their 2-bedroom in the east village.

There are certainly rich people at that age out there, and it could probably be from someone in the jobs those guys held...

but 1) that's definitely not the attitude they took and more importantly

2) it's supposed to be a show about typical 20-somethings in new york, not the extremely rare outlier

so yeah, you can technically handwave it away, but that's a lot of mental gymnastics to excuse what's obviously a logical oversight for the sake of good television.unless he was the director of the museum, he's probably not going to be able to afford that apartment. he was living in (in today's money) what would be around $4k/month. It's suggested you spend 1/4 of your income on rent, meaning he'd need to be making around $192,000/year at the museum.

Even if it's very well funded, he's probably not making that much for just a regular position at the museum. (Although he might if he had supplemental income, I can't remember was he working at the museum and as a professor at the same time?)episodes went off the rails with the latest season. first season was great, second was good but not as good, but it got progressively worse.

how they ended it i only have the faintest bit of curiosity. the big "problem" at the end makes zero sense. none at all. that's not even a little bit how that works (frustratingly, for being a show written by such a prolific writer, *about* writers, it gets a lot wrong about how being a writer works... and not small stuff, but series-changing stuff)yeah schwimmer tried to go the directing route but no one really gave a shit. i'm sure it's been keeping him busy though and he'll be able to guest-direct episodes of television pretty much any time he wants to.maybe tom selleck? i'm not, y'know, willing to go look it up or anything but my guess would be that or monica's/ross's dad.well, i don't know how it worked back then but it's possible they got some kind of advance or somethinghe would have definitely been paid for the pilot, which definitely would have been catered.it's pretty difficult to *ever* nail down "how much money someone has"

were they including debt? were they including credit cards? were they including liquid assets? what was in his bank account?

they may have just been including what was literally in his pocket that day and not mentioned the fact that he had a $10,000 check in the mail that he got the next day.

take it with a grain of salt. the point is he was pretty poor, and that's probably relatively True, but he likely wasn't sleeping in a gutter trying to decide if his last $11 should be spent repairing the hole in his shoe or buying himself food for the first time this week.he should play a montage of all the clips he was supposed to show on conan but never did. like a two minute mash-up of every trailer.You can always quit. Nothing can ever legally keep you in any job.

In very rare instances, there will be a clause in a signed contract stating that damages/penalties must be paid if the employee terminates the contract early.

If you don't have this clause in a signed contract-- if you don't have a signed contract at all-- you can walk away and never have any repercussions.

(besides the obvious technically they can sue you even if they don't have any grounds, which could be annoying)sure, if you can prove they were lying.

but can you prove they weren't just mistaken? can you **prove** they knowingly told a lie, instead of just mis-remembered, or mis-heard, or some other form of not totally understanding the situation and were simply speaking to the best of their abilities, even though their statement was incorrect?

also, keep in mind it's not perjury if you go on stand and correct your statements. so everyone who switched their stories is cleared, it's not perjury if you switch your story.it sounds like they were all friends of the woman, and she was abusing her power knowing that the bartender and bouncer would have her back.

the cop was probably just mistaken, though he could have *really really thought* OP was guilty and stretched the truth to make it more convincing (it's more frequent than we'd like to admit)Shit gets lost in the mail, dude. It sounds like a lame excuse but it really does happen....guys, is it really that important we nail down an exact analogy? the thing's super rare. got it.That's a pretty shitty thing of him to do, though. The idea is that he's covering it so no one, even the owner, will realize it's gone, right? How is that any different from taking it out of someone's wallet when they're not looking?

Also, just because it's on the ground doesn't mean it's up for grabs. The law backs me up on this.I used to be addicted to hokey pokey.

Eventually though I managed to turn myself around

(I just came from the dad jokes thread)I'm not sure what you're reacting to, but it's not resolution. By definition, if you're looking at something, you can't resolve it any better than you can resolve anything else. Your eyes don't get sharper just because you're looking at a thing on a tv screen.

You may be noticing stronger backlight, or just an increased sharpness from other screens. You may be noticing higher color contrast (which adds to perceived resolution) or post-sharpening processes which can also increase perceived resolution.

But you can't naturally resolve a tv screen any more than you can resolve anything else.From my very poor understanding of "infinite," if something is truly infinite and possible, the thing will absolutely exist at some point within the infinity.

This means if there are a truly infinite number of universes, inter-dimensional travel must not be possible.There are two possibilities and anything anyone else says is wrong.

The first is that there aren't a truly infinite number of alternate realities.

The second is that inter-dimensional travel isn't possible.

In a truly infinite amount of realities, by definition, if inter-dimensional travel were possible it *will* absolutely have been invented and one of the dimensions *will* absolutely have contacted us. That's, like, the definition of the word infinite.But where did the half come from?&gt; SO multiple generations had to have been a shitty flightless form that was less efficient then both the future animal and the previous version.

I don't think that's how it works. Evolution doesn't look long-term. It looks for right now. It picks the features that make the animal best able to survive right now, given the minimal changes it can make. So on its path to become a flying animal, each iteration would have had to be more efficient for survival than the iteration before. That means each single step it took towards flight had to leave the animal better off than it was before.buuuut isn't evolution actually more concerned with reproducing than survival? And aren't we still reproducing? Meaning we're still *evolving* traits that are most likely to get us to reproduce, even if "intelligence" keeps us from dying.

So it seems to me, and granted this is a very short term thing that may not stick around long enough for evolution to do its thing-- but it seems to me what we're actually evolving towards are people either uneducated about birth control and/or those with very high sex drives.

In other words if we're evolving into anything, it's a bunch of horny dumbasses.THEN WHAT GOOD ARE YOU&gt; There are many things "truly infinite", but not many of them are all encopassing. Think about it. If you gathered every possible real number, you'd have a truly infinite amount of numbers. If you decided to take the half of that True infinity, you'd still have a True infinity (inf/2 = inf). Even if you took an infinitely small part of that True infinity, you could still have a True infinity.

Yes, I agree.

&gt; Simply saying that there is an infinite amount of universes does not mean there is every possible universe, 

No, that's incorrect.

In your first scenario, you're specifically limiting the infinite space to a pre-determined set. Thus, it's "impossible" to achieve a number that's irrational. Your analogy does not hold True.

In an infinite set of random events, it is 100% True that every possible event will happen.

I'm not going to pretend to understand it. I don't. But people a whole lot smarter than me have verified this. It doesn't *seem* like it should make sense, but it's True nonetheless.I know. That has no bearing on my statement."I can show you the world..."Yep. Most major credit cards have great fraud protection. That's not to say that there's no chance of your numbers getting stolen, it's possible but rare and usually not much hassle to deal with. You can the cc company, they cancel the charges, cancel your card and send you a new one.A raise. You get a normal raise, awesome! Congratulations! But a tiny, worthless token raise is just insulting and highlights how little the company values you......aaaaaaannnddd tagged.That's a pretty big mistake to have that as a policy, and you're now finding out why.Listen man.

You can't put a title like "REPOSTING THIS AS IT MYSTERIOUSLY GOT DELETED"

and then come into the comments and say "You guys the mods aren't the bad guys!"

You're clearly inciting against the mods in the title then backpedaling in the comments. I agree witch hunts and mod abuse shouldn't be going on. But don't play both sides. That's lame.I enjoy it. I like smoking and I like taking breaks to go smoke (not just from work, but whatever).

I know there are health risks but there are health risks in everything. I'll quit when I have a kid. Until then I'm gonna keep smoking.Nope. I've never had someone do it particularly painfully, that's the only time I'd bring it up.

But if they're just not especially good at it, well it's still kinda fun as foreplay then after a while you just stop them and move on to something else. You don't have to say they were bad at it, just make it clear you're ready to go.

I'll only mention she's good at it if she actually is though. It's pretty rare.You need work experience to get a job. You need a job to get work experience.

I'm convinced everyone just flat out lies on their resumes.Ones where I feel like I lost because of the mechanics or ai rather than a mistake I made. Arkham origins was terrible about this.FireflyThat I've got everything under control.

If everyone believes it it usually works out.Money.

I'm not even saying women leech off me or anything, in fact most of them are understanding and willing to do cheap things, but you just have fewer obligations to go out and do stuff if you're single.Driving. Not like, being a stunt driver, but just regular old driving from point a to point b. I'm great at it. You get in the car with me and I guarantee, barring some freak accident that is literally unavoidable, you are going to get to your destination in a safe and timely manner. I've got great awareness of my surroundings, I know how to pass cars and when to let them do their thing, I've got an eye on that swervy guy over there who I'm *pretty sure* is about to change lanes without signaling and-- yup, he does, and I'm already on top of it.Ask him the fuck out. If he says no you'll move on a lot faster. If he says yes, congrats!I've shot a lot of weddings and the best ones have these involved (these are for standard weddings-- it's encouraged, if it fits you, to ignore all these and do something totally off the wall that you'd love)

1) Cocktail hour before the ceremony

2) Not just inviting people who want to see you get married, but inviting people that are fun at a party. It sucks watching a whole reception of just people sitting around at the tables talking and an empty dance floor. Invite lots of young people, and invite people who get along well.

3) A host who knows how to be a host/dj. A good host will have lots of fun stuff planned throughout the night, and really be able to get people up and dancing and having a good time. It's more than just saying "I want everyone up on the dance floor!" It's a whole skill set that's difficult to find. Ask your friends for recommendations.

I'll check back in if I think of more.

Some tips to remember:

You are absolutely going to run late. **Absolutely.** Expect it, tell everyone else to expect it, and oh yeah if you have a photographer or videographer you want there to capture events late in the evening, book them for extra time because they will pack their shit up and bounce out when their time is up. 

Keep a handkerchief for when your SO starts crying. 

Have an open bar, but wine and beer only; drunk people are fun, hammered-falling-over people are annoying. 

It's more fun to have fun food than classy food.

Keep the ceremony meaningful, but short. Half the people there are going to be bored to tears by your hour long religious ceremony with its fifth sermon and blessing ceremony with five people each getting up to read some dumbass poem no one's paying attention to.

I promise, while the day is about you, you are going to have more fun if your guests are having more fun.

Anyways, tip your vendors and congratulations!&gt; ridiculous over-the-top huge affair

&gt; cost nearly $30,000

something is not adding up here.I've always wondered-- if you can have endless orgasms, why do you ever stop? Once you're all turned on and ready to go, why don't you just keep going for that next orgasm?

For guys, you orgasm, and generally you lose most of your sex drive. You might want to keep going (but that's unusual), or if your lady friend wants to keep going you might go for it for the sake of having fun, but you're not still reaching for that orgasm anymore.although, not always...This is not a binary issue. You aren't limited to just "wholly support your employees" or "throw them under the bus."I'd listen to this guy, he's a mod.admitting you were mistaken is one thing, op is just backpedaling.Well, maybe just post that as a comment and admit your mistake. Right now it sounds like you're passing judgment from on high.the thing is, in an infinite system, we are 100% guaranteed for every possibility to happen, and that includes the possibility that some world has contacted us specifically (if contacting us specifically was possible).

In an infinite set, anything that is possible will happen. Not *really really* likely, but 100% guaranteed to happen. Weird, I know, but that's how infinity works (infinity is a very strange concept)&gt; There's not much middle ground.

Of course there is. There's "investigating the situation." At the very least, there's "listening to both sides of the story."

This is pretty basic stuff.i didn't say anything about time travel. that doesn't have anything to do with anything.Okay, but that doesn't change the fact that if it's not possible for them to communicate with us, it's not possible for them to communicate with us.I didn't make a mistake and I'm not backpedaling. I'm standing by what I said, even if you guys want to downvote me.I know. I don't care. My judgment was accurate based on the events that happened.https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Infinite_monkey_theorem#Direct_proof

Essentially, given an amount of universes with randomized possibilities, the chance of something possible NOT happening approaches zero as the amount grows. If the amount is infinite, the chance of a possibility not happening is zero.You know, you can't really pull the "Reddit is serious business, people are getting offended!" Card without it being turned right back around on you.I try.And I'm laughing back at you. It's Reddit, calm your tits.I don't deal with actors' releases much so I can't get into specifics, but yes you'll want to have something in writing laying out the terms of... well, everything really. Permission to use their image, in what ways you're allowed to use it (all of them, but you'll want to specify), how much they're getting paid, what happens if they bail, what happens if you bail, how long they'll be working, their expected shoot dates and hours and what happens if you go over, etc.Yes, make-up is a thing, yes your movie's production quality will increase with a make-up artist. No, it's not necessary for a good movie, but it's strongly recommended. Make-up artists can and will help your actors look good under all conditions, they'll be able to cover up any blemishes, particularly ones that show up halfway through shooting (zits or sunburns), they'll be able to take some of the shine off while remaining consistent, all that good stuff.

And if you're going to get one, it's worth getting a good one because a bad make-up artist can really screw things up for you. Most actors will be able to do some basic make-up on themselves, but like anything, you'll want someone who specializes in it to really do a good job.He's using the verb "be" to mean "exist."

So he's saying we're gone (meaning, the being that we call ourself no longer exists) but our parts continue to exist.basically, she appears to just be a personal publicist.&gt; eat sushi with chopsticks.

yeah, those losers. i eat sushi with a fork. *that* makes me cultured, right?but would she understand that those specific words in that combination imply a sexual subtext?well, he straight up admitted he made a mistake when he posted the title, sooo....

do you not see how his title is contradictory to his post?&gt; Tipping fucks over more people than it helps anyway.

No it doesn't.

&gt; It's rather fucking far from me "being cheap" that I advocate against the tipping culture.

The more you say it the more I'm convinced it's True. Take a good look at yourself and question whether you really are a noble freedom fighter, refusing to tip for these people's own good (I'm sure they all really appreciate your sacrifice), or whether you're just rationalizing a reason to keep a few extra bucks in your pocket.man, did you see that video with the blood in the bowl and they drop in snake venom and the blood straight up turns to jell-o in seconds?

that's some fucked up shityep, it's correct, just a kind of bizarre usageno, i got it. people who eat sushi with chopsticks are assholes who should burn in hell. everyone else is an enlightened cultured human being.makes senseAre you serious?Yes, it is.I think it's because the defaults are meant to appeal to too many demographics. You show up and you see a couple things you're interested in but it's completely riddled with tons of stuff you aren't, and might even confuse the hell out of you. So it's hard to navigate until you get in the habit of just ignoring the shit you don't care about, or pruning out those subs.I love sushi but my problem with it is it costs as much as a full meal but is only as filling as half an appetizer.I share this outlook. I don't need to drink to have fun, but drinking makes a lot of things more fun. I enjoy a nice day at the beach. I enjoy it more with a couple beers. I don't always drink at the beach and I still have fun, but sometimes I do drink at the beach and that's fun too.What I liked most about that was that he actually wasn't judging the guy, he straight up said order it however you prefer it... But objectively, you're not going to be able to discern any quality from it so if you like your steak without any quality then don't complain to me about itWhat is that in freedom units?after reading the trenches ([webcomic](http://trenchescomic.com/)) there's no way in hell i would ever work in qaYeah. I wasn't reacting to the situation, I was reacting to the guy's hypothetical that the airline should automatically side with its employee and not bother conducting any investigation until/unless they absolutely have to.have you read the webcomic? apparently it's one of the worst jobs out there, has absolutely nothing to do with actually working in the game industry, offers no room for advancement, and frequently has you ending up hating games.

not always, but a vast majority of the time this seems to be the case. just suggesting, if you want to get into game design a qa gig may not be the way to go.Well, first of all the ten minute snooze isn't making you more tired than if you just woke up before the snooze. You're just feeling it more because after the snooze, well, you have to actually get up.

But the reason you still feel tired versus a ten minute nap helping you feel refreshed has to deal with your sleep cycle. It's likely when you wake up in the morning you're in the middle of "deep" sleep (REM or one of the surrounding cycles) whereas with a nap, you're still at the higher stage of the cycle and haven't drifted into deeper sleep yet.

By the way, you can get apps on your phone that will monitor your sleep cycle and set off an alarm when you're out of a cycle instead of in REM sleep. Even though you get a little less sleep you wake up feeling a lot more energized and feel better throughout the day.They can shoot in higher frame rates, and occasionally have tried it, but audiences don't like it.

I just said a whole lot of things in that sentence that I'm going to explain now.

First, it's not really about what frame rates they shoot at, it's about what they project at. We frequently shoot at 60fps, 120fps, 200fps or higher, but we project at 24fps regardless (for movies. TV is 30 in the US and 25 in the UK)

Now, they actually did try and shoot at a higher frame rate *and* project at a higher frame rate recently-- the first hobbit movie did exactly that. It was a whole big experiment.

And most of the audience *hated* it. Some said they got used to it, but pretty much everyone said they hated it.

Why? Well there are two theories. One is that 24fps has a slower "dream like" quality that we prefer in film-- film is an escapist fantasy realm, and removing it from reality just a bit with slower frame rates helps our enjoyment of it.

The second theory is simply that that's what we're used to. For reasons that aren't worth getting into, that's the frame rate we ended up at and we've all grown accustomed to for the past century or so. Sure, we *could* all give higher frame rates a go for a few years and see if we end up liking it any better, but...

why would we? What do we have to gain? We enjoy watching movies just fine right now. Why go through the grand experiment of upping the frame rate just to see if we can tolerate it? And why would any film companies take the risk? You seem to be thinking that since we have "better" technology we should be increasing the frame rate, but there's no real gain from doing that (and we've had the technology for decades, it's not like we've been unable to do it)

And film companies themselves couldn't choose to do it for just their movie--

Also, and this is a big of a minor point but adds even more to the "why would we?" thing-- more frames means more data which means more media storage which means more money.

So, to sum everything up and succinctly answer your question:

We shoot at 24fps because it's standard and we don't switch to higher frame rate projection because audiences don't like it.

ps one final thing: funny enough we actually do show movies at 48fps, it's just that every frame is doubled, so a single frame is shown twice for 1/48 of a second each. There are still 24 unique frames per second but technically we're seeing 48 frames a second.i guarantee you if you take a poll of any random sampling of 20-something post-grads about their quality of life, the number one biggest issue will be getting a job where they make enough to lead a decent life.

that is *the* number one issue on everyone's minds, and it's almost entirely because of the baby boomer generation, and *you are in a thread about the differences between the current generation entering the workforce and the baby boomers*

so like

...what'd you expect, dude?how much is an emergency fund?

i'm not asking specifics, i don't even make enough to cover my living situation as it is, i'm just curiousDieting, and by that I mean "dieting," as in fad diets or worse, crash diets. Too many people think dieting means eating basically nothing. There are tons of reasons why this is a terrible idea, but people do it anyway.

The really sad part is they're putting in a ton of effort and sacrifice on it. I feel bad for them, if only they'd put in *half* as much effort in doing some actual research they'd see real results. But they don't know any better.

(anyone out there on a fad or crash diet, please browse through /r/fitness for a little while. Do yourself a favor and get the results you want and yes I realize how much that sounds like an infomercial)things that say "100% juice on it!" are a lot better than things that say "JUICE DRINK!" on them. Or even "Made from concentrate."

always try to stay away from "juice drink" or "made from concentrate" unless you don't care about health and basically just want fruit punch or whatevergetting them quicker doesn't really have a lot of benefitgeorge carlin said a lot of bullshit that wasn't True in the name of humor.

you have to do some *serious* sunbathing to have any significant increase in risk of skin cancer. the kind that most people do isn't really that bad for youa gram of fat is 9 calories, a gram of sugar is 4 calories. so yeah, a little over twice as much by weightyou really sound like someone who wants to defend the hell out of crossfit but knows they're going to get a bunch of shit if they doI took the interview a different way. He actually did say they should have told the staff there, and I really admire the guy for not ripping into the interviewer and making him look like an idiot. He's portrayed as a hothead, but it's clear he's a pretty classy guy. He just said no, this is ridiculous, I'm out.

E: and like I said, I didn't get the feeling he was making fun of the guy for his taste at all. He said order it however you want, that's up to you, but just objectively you can't discern quality at that point so why are you complaining?It's my understanding that the original cross fit program is actually fine, but it's been coopted and modified so much most of the ones today are all pretty terrible and mostly money grabsThat was actually not useful at alltell that to my kneeswell, i specifically know, because my knees only completely fall apart after i've run four miles.&gt; How can a QA gig at EA be bad on my CV?

because no one values QA work experience.

I'm not speaking from an insider in the industry, just from what i've heard. but it's not an entry-level position. it doesn't lead anywhere, and no one seems to value the experience in different departments in the industry.

that said, just a suggestion.It's not injured. It only happens when running. Besides that it's totally fine and healthy. *And doctors have confirmed this.*

I don't get why you guys are so incredibly resistant to the idea that running can be bad for some people's knees. Like, I'm not fucking around or mistaken, you guys are just refusing to accept it as a possibility.&gt; Actually they found that the thing about putting all the weight back on once your crash diet ends is a myth

next month they'll find out it's not a myth. two months after that they'll find out it's a myth again. that's the way it goes.Well, you did manage to pick up a random phrase that lead to its own wikipedia page, but that's not really relevant here.

OP asked for an infinite number of universes, all with alternate realities. What you're referring to is the probability of patterns occurring. But in our scenario, the universes are not independent from each other, they are *distinct* from each other in at least some way.

So no, I'm not saying it's impossible for infinite set universes not to have a certain universe.

I'm saying it's impossible for an infinite set of *alternate* universes not to have a certain universe.to be fair, you don't sound like you have a lot of experience or training to compare it to...&gt; is it possible to only drink 40's and take nutrition supplements and still have a healthy diet?

ha. tell your buddies it depends on what you consider "healthy." you can do that and survive off of it, but you won't be what most people would consider healthy.it's definitely a fad diet

though i should be fair and say that some fad diets actually can work, but they sort of work by accident, and imo since the people on them don't understand the underlying principles it's not very likely to last long-term.

&gt; All I know is I'm not eating carbs, and I'm losing weight.

and that's the problem. carbs aren't bad. carbs are good. your not eating carbs isn't what's losing you weight, your reduction of calories is what's losing you weight. this is an example of the fad diet working on accident-- because you can't eat carbs, you're probably eating less food overall. which, naturally, is going to cause you to lose weight.

and, chances are, at some point you're going to go off the keto diet, or get tired of it, or whatever, and you're going to put the weight back on, because unfortunately you're not really understanding why it's working or making the lifestyle change that's likely to work long-term.

i really urge you to roll over to /r/fitness and read the wiki, and if you have any questions i'd love to help.

also: 

&gt; I'm pretty much doing it to lose weight, but once I reach my goal I will return to a more typical healthy diet.

this is very telling. you're going to immediately rebound and be back to where you started. if all you wanted was to drop 5-10lbs for a wedding or something, i guess that's fine but there are better ways of doing it. but wouldn't it be much better to just make lifestyle changes that always keep you at that weight? dieting really is a new way of looking at how and what you eat, it's not just a temporary thing to get your weight down for a little while that people think it isi think what they meant is it can help you lose weight, but it won't necessarily lose you the weight you want to lose

similarly, if my only goal is to lose weight i can cut off an arm and blam! i'm twenty pounds lighter. but that's kind of missing the point, because i don't really want to lose "weight," i want to lose fat.

similarly, the "eat anything you want" diet is probably losing you muscle, and not much fat, so it's not doing you as much good as just buckling down and eating better would do.&gt; anything over 4 minutes is doing damage

so you're saying any time i walk outside for four minutes i have cancer now?

you are grossly misunderstanding me. maybe you're misunderstanding me on purpose.

my quote was

&gt; you have to do some serious sunbathing to have any significant increase in risk of skin cancer.

&gt; **significant increase**go to the sub, look at the sidebar, click the "unsubscribe" buttoni don't believe that, do you have a source somewhere that says they were fraudulently switching out cuts of beef from what was ordered to a cheaper cut because they assumed the customer wouldn't notice?I know. I believe you. I've only ever said *mine* specifically.That wasn't in the interview, if you found that information somewhere else I'd like to see it and would be very surprised since it's flat out fraudYes, if you limit the possibilities then it is not possible to have a number occur in the set you've limited against it being a possibility. As I said, only possible options will occur.

And since you've decided to be condescending as hell instead of having a proper discussion (or even trying to understand what I'm saying), I believe I'm done with this conversation.man, you're really eating it in this thread. i thought the first time was enough, but people just keep it going.i have never seen a lol or dota post. ever. how are they coming up for you?i... didn't say anything about exercise?to be fair to the director, it's really, really hard figuring out what's going to work with an audience and what won't. maybe they were going for a Knight's Tale kinda thing-- pretty much the exact same deal, taking megahits of the modern age and throwing them into the past waaayyyy out of context. But for that movie it was awesome, for this movie it didn't work. Why? No one can say (and if you want to get all film student on me and try to come up with some pretentious analysis about it, I'm going to ignore you. The only answer, as Bill Goldman said, is no one knows anything)my god, this thread is astounding.

the daily mail reported the news. they didn't commit slander (or libel or any other kind of defamation... and neither did any of the other news sites reporting it).

no one has to sue their family as a recourse for insurance not covering it. if she is, that's fraud.

there is definitely something more to this story but we don't know what it is yet.yes. daily mail did nothing wrong.but i'm pretty sure it doesn't cover negligence, which seems to be the whole basis for her lawsuithell, i don't like their mistreatment of *customers.* i've been boycotting that place for ages except in dire emergencies. they refuse to help anyone who doesn't look like they're going to spend big money.

which is amusing, because the only people who are going to spend big money are the people who used to spend little money. there's plenty of other places to go, it's a big city.&gt;  it's for existing B&amp;H customers to pressure the company into genuine reform.

the only way to do this that they'll care about is to start shopping somewhere else until they get the message&gt; I've purchased $500K worth of products

well there ya go. they care very much about the big spenders.film tools is great

also, there are plenty of other camera stores even right here in nyc. the benefit of b&amp;h is that they're huge and have all the stuff in one place. that's pretty much it. everything else can be found from other nyc shops, but you might have to go to multiple shops.

if you're ordering online i say go with filmtoolsdiet is everyone's problem. exercise as a measure of weight loss is close to meaningless for most people. it's not exactly meaningless, but it might as well be.i'd be surprised if they did not know who you are between accountsit's advice about the law, sure. but it's just a guy's opinion. legal advice has a technical definition and that ain't it.&gt; Is it really that hard?

Yes. Like I said, if knight's tale were terrible we'd all be saying how obviously stupid it was to put queen in a period piece. It really is extremely hard in the middle of creating something to know what's going to work.Call and find any kind of listing they might have of grads local to your area. When I was looking at schools I invited a few grads to coffee and got their experiences. And of course, go visit the school.

There's really no way to know, it's just a gut feeling. And remember, ultimately it's not going to matter that much. There's no wrong answer, just lots of different ones.Depends on what kind of discussions you're looking to haveSome of those are mics and some are recorders. It's a bit too complex to explain for the level of knowledge you're at, I'd suggest doing more research.1) no 2) film school.

Annoying, right? The thing is you get connections wherever you get them, there's a ton of different ways. Film school is a great place to make connections, but it's not the only place. It's not necessary but it can help.&gt; a new world open on my eyes

shining, shimmering, splendid....


but seriously for anyone reading what happened with the dog is what's supposed to happen, it has a "knot" that connects and expands once inside so the dog stays there until it's finished.

i know this because, uh...

hell, i know this because i spend too much time on reddit.everyone says this, but i have 100% never attempted itpeople should really chillax about it. look, it sucks when someone pisses all over your stuff, but it's just a drunk person doing drunk stuff. if you're both getting drunk it could as easily be you that's doing the drunk person thing. just make sure they clean it up and replace everything and move on. and now you get a funny embarrassing story about them.

it annoys me when people get super drunk but give other people shit for doing super drunk stuff. it's not like he was trying to hurt anyone or ruining christmas dinner or anything, he was just being a drunk idiot.i really miss collegewe were having a party at my apartment one time, the cops get called for noise and they go knock on the door to my room where a bunch of people (myself not included) were getting high, very obviously, no chance of hiding it. the people inside know it's the cops, my roommate tells them all to shut the fuck up, strips down to his boxers, turns off the lights and opens the door and says "I'm, uhh... kinda busy, y'know?"

the officer says "Sorry to bother you" closes the door and leaves.i don't believe that, even a little bit. tsa agents would have no problem moving a dildo aside. i'm willing to bet it's just wishful thinking on her part.it kinda boggles my mind you were a legit prostitute and still sometimes had trouble paying rent. complete honesty-- were you blowing your money on other stuff?when i was young i couldn't figure out/didn't know there was a difference between exotic and erotic

it was a very confusing time for me

(it didn't help that no one would actually explain what erotic meant/what the difference was, in that way that adults are like "oh no he's a child we'd better get super awkward and pretend sex doesn't exist!")sure, but it doesn't need to be "awkward," and it definitely doesn't need to be one of those "i'm never talking to you again" things.

you just laugh at the person, or if you're really classy you just don't mention it again. (but being classy isn't always as fun)how would they know the drift of the chip if they don't know where it was originally implanted?

also i'm fairly certain there are *many* factors which can influence scarring/healingNah man. Commit a murder in America and send the body part to Ireland, all that happens is the cops call up interpol (it's interpol right?) and say "Hey, mind shipping over that bodypart?"

and they're all "Sure laddie i'll get right on that"

problem solved.

But if you do it to neighboring counties with equal claims to jurisdiction, all of a sudden you got a pissing contest on your handsas far as happy meals go, you'd be surprised. mcdonald's marketing has done amazing jobs convincing people much of their food is healthy.

the ice cream, yeah, people may know that's not "healthy" but there are a lot of people out there who think dessert with every meal is "normal" and thus doesn't count in some way.

what i'm getting at is there are people who are *shockingly* uneducated and simply live their life by falling into eating habits they never question.What does "always worked" mean exactly?How would she know?I have no idea if my voice qualifies but I've been told I should do voice over work and I've got some microphones so what the hell. Shoot me the script and any directorial noteswe're talking airport security though, not the cruise staff. if it's a checked bag airport security doesn't care about booze in your bags. if it's a carry-on, they're gonna *know* there's banned liquid in the bag and a dildo won't stop them from removing itno problemo, hope it works out for youi dunno, depends on the age maybe. from the people i've talked to a lot of kids just think that's normal and don't realize that the parents are "unhappy," at least not in a way that's an alternative to being happy.

if that makes sense.I think all November babies have at some point done the math and figured it outThe stress comes from *potentially* being able to do something but not knowing what.

Which your second point helps with, and which I've managed to incorporate and used to deal with stress, but a lot of people can't get past the "but if I do the wrong thing it will blow up in my face!" part.for fuck's sake, chill out guys. this is starting to look like /r/relationships 

you all get in the real world this would be a joke and most people at the table would laugh, probably the wife included, and if she didn't she would be annoyed by it for about three minutes before moving on from her husband's dumb joke?well, yeah, technically the recorder has internal mics on it but it's not even close to the kind of thing you'd use for recording dialogue. your camera (probably) has an internal mic on it too, but you don't consider that an option for the same reason.

the zoom devices are meant to be used as recorders, not microphones.I find it hard to believe everything is in top working order at that price. It may be usable but keep a close eye on it, things could start going awry pretty quickly.Yeah, here's my tip

Don't try to stand out. It's a losing battle. Set out to fail. Do stuff you know you're not capable of for the sake of learning how to do it and trying to experiment. If everything goes smoothly and you accomplish what you set out to do, what did you really learn? Use this opportunity to fuck up, because you're going to fuck up at some point and it's better to do it now.

The heroes in film school stay heroes in film school. Those that recognize it's just a learning experience will do far better outside of school. Don't bother trying to impress anyone. At least not yet. Maybe later on in your school career.I'm just saying, keep an eye on it. You may not notice anything right away, but eventually see that some connections are loose or some of the mechanics occasionally wiggle out of place. Hopefully it's all fine and at worst just needs minor repairs, but I find it likely it's not going to last perfectly smoothly very long.Like I said, they have mics built in and the higher end ones can be used in very specific scenarios, but not for narrative film.

E: as a quick analogy, imagine you're hired to DJ a party. Your laptop has all your music on it, and it has built in speakers. Would you show up to the party with just your laptop and play music from that? Of course not, you would use your laptop to run the music but you would connect actual speakers to it. Your laptop alone might be fine for a couple friends in your apartment, but not an actual party.

Similarly, the zoom recorders technically have microphones built in but you wouldn't use them as microphones to record narratives, you would connect real microphones to themBullseye!I did the same with my mother but I did it by choice because I was as deluded as she was (she was supportive of any decision I chose). I eventually learned better and have no lasting effects from it but it gave me a lot of insight as to why people do fad diets... And how a lot of times they give False positives which just encourage them.

Sorry you had some troubles with it, glad to hear you're putting it behind youHeh. My birthday is nine months and five days after my older sisters. I'm fairly positive my parents realized how cute their toddler daughters were on their second birthday and decided to go for a third.The point of cah though isn't too find something that applies, it's too find what applies the best in any given situation.There was totally a demon spider in there, dude.Sure, but that was kind of the whole point of the book. It's even in the title. He was never really the Hero, just the protagonist (though if you ask me, the "new form of life" were being dickbags so I'm not all that upset they were hunted out of self preservation)Well, not really. There's three options in a scan. Contraband, no contraband, or inconclusive. If it's the second one, no problem and no search. If it's the first or last, a dildo definitely won't stop them from finding what's in there. They really do take that kinda thing seriously, and they're not going to be embarrassed out of it. (Also, I don't really believe a TSA agent would be embarrassed by a dildo, but that's beside the point)I'm happy to be a part of this revelation with you.Give me a shout when you solve that mysteryEh. Never that painful for me. Was I planned? Was I not planned? Doesn't matter now, I'm here!The problem is absolutely with lack of research out there. Yes, there's bad and False information out there. Adequate research will prove that wrong.

Inadequate research leads you to believing the bad information that's pushed in front of you. It's easy and you accept it.

Adequate research can help show you why that's wrong.

Also, super awesome you've got a great plan for your students, major props.Welcome to the world of revelations. At least now if you ever need ammunition against your sister you can point out how you were clearly planned (even if you weren't, just go with it) and your sister was a Valentine's day babyIs there a question somewhere in there?Throw it on vimeo with a password.Hm. No hot lights? You're greatly limiting yourself there. Your only real options given that constraint are LEDs or kino's, both of which are out of your budget, I suspect.

So you may need to compromise. Can you increase your budget? Or can you relax on your no hot lights requirement?Yep.Y2k?

You just blew my mind.

I remember y2k parties, and now you're conversing with me....


Hang on, I need a minute. Am I old? Shit, I think I'm old.Right on! Kinda neat to discover, yeah?Bullseye!Real talk.

(I assume that comment wasn't aimed at me)Congrats! Well done on your progress!Congrats! Well done on your progress!Heh. Apparently I'm blowing a lot of people's minds today....*out of* your pants? do you keep a brewery in there or something?The first time I encountered it was at initiation for my frat. They had me smell it, then told me I needed to drink the liquid from it. I said sure, I'm up for that, but I guarantee I will absolutely 100% puke everywhere.

They decided I didn't need to drink it.Well, learn how to not blow circuits I guess? Basic safety information isn't tough to figure out if you're doing simple stuff. Take the wattage of each light plugged in on a circuit, divide by one hundred and that's how many amps it's pulling.

Go look at your circuit breaker and it'll list how many amps on each circuit. Probably fifteen or twenty on most residential places.

If you blow a circuit, unplug one of your lights and go flip the switch in the circuit breaker. No harm done.

You can go with leds or kinos if you really want, but they tend to be like $1k+ for a single light, whereas I've gotten quality tungsten lights used for a hundred a pop. Tungsten (hot lights) also tend to be more durable and have more light output. You really have to spend some cash to get a good kit of "cold" lights.I've got five days left... need to start hitting the rising /r/askreddit threads with amusing yet obvious jokes to keep it going!bro, it's 2015. bring a tablet and watch your own entertainment instead of shitty failed pilots.yeah but that's comic con.if i walked out and saw this i would laugh my ass off right before telling them no way in hell am i paying for that. through fits of laughter.the most annoying shit about this, and most "you had one job!" posts, is that the people involved clearly had *several* jobs, they just fucked up one thing.good oneget a mobile battery. hell, get two, it'd still be cheaper than any in-flight entertainment.Bill them separate from your regular job, like any freelancer. Don't look at it in connection with your status as an employee at all. If you bill for anything less than fair rates you're in danger of being taken advantage of, a lot, and you're susceptible to scope creep without being able to say "sure I'll make those changes you want, at the agreed upon price for revisions."Depends on your experience level and the details of the project, but to get your rate and the rate of two others for three days, all students, I would say somewhere between two to five grand. Really I would say five grand at least for fair payment, but if you really just want the job for experience or whatever I would go as low as two, no lower. Per video.An author dies every time you misuse a semicolon.Or

One, three, one

works/u/awildsketchappeared get in herereally? because in your above post you were just guessing at what happened, now you seem pretty damn sure when you got called out on itSerious question here

I've lived in new York for eight years. I've taken advantage of new York resident programs (mostly college tuition breaks for residents). However, it's annoyingly frustrating getting a new York driver's license, it's way easier in my home state, so I renew there. And have signed a paper stating I'm a resident there.

Do I need to vote absentee in my home state, or can I go ahead and get registered in NY and just assume the two states won't talk to each other or care?You monsterI can see that. It's a subconscious "and that's all there is to say." Definitive end and what notI loved that movie when it was a comedy/super hero parody, but by the end it took itself too seriously and got weird. I still really enjoyed it, but I'd have enjoyed it more if it was the movie u thought I was going to see.

That might be a marketing issue though.You gotta at least tell me a little about it and why I should watch it. Why did you like it?I've been trying to work through the afi top 100 the past couple years, and regarding old classic movies I've come to this conclusion: they're either absolutely brilliant and fantastic

Or they're boring pieces of shit that were probably ground breaking at the time but don't hold up at all

12 Angry Men is definitely in the former categoryIt's just a little old at this point, but it gets referenced constantly. Off hand I know both king of the hill and family guy (probably the Simpsons because come on) have done parody/reference episodes of it, and the situation does get brought up a lot and referenced in modern culture.

Basically any time a group of people are stuck in a room trying to make a decision, you're gonna see a 12 angry men reference, even if most people don't get it. To me that's a testament to how good the movie is-- the concepts are so strong they work completely on their own without needing to spell out that you're referencing a movie.&gt; If he'd hit her to get out of what was happening to him?

How do you know he didn't?

From the information given there is absolutely no reason to think he was clear of any and all danger from this woman. All we know is she tied him up, drugged him, tortured him and raped him. There is absolutely no reason to believe she said "okay, we're all done now and I super duper promise I won't continue this act of torture." 

"After the fact" is an assumption you're making. You, and he, had no way of knowing he was safe just because he regained the use of his limbs, and every reason to believe she was going to continue on assaulting or torturing him.

If someone ties you up and tortures you, then undoes your ties enough for you to escape, you don't say "well gee thanks for letting me go now." You incapacitate them to a point where you are sure you can actually escape.

That's self defense. If you don't believe me look it up. Pay special attention to the part where you're permitted to use force to prevent assault.Thank god you're not a lawyer, because you don't understand the law at all.remember that death of the family one-shot tie-in? where joker essentially drives a guy insane by being his "friend"? that was some fucked up stuff.They gotta fucking figure out what they want to do with Kory's romantic life and her romantic personality

I mean, she completely forgot about Dick-- literally-- then banged his "brother," then banged his brother's friend, then dated his brother's friend, then just kinda disappeared even though she's totally still in love with roy, and now is back to making out with Dick?Hate to destroy your theory, but the key piece of information being left out here is:

A private citizen can only do it *of their own accord.* Any suggestion or request from the police makes that person acting as an "agent of the law" and is still bound by the 4th amendment.

Acting as an agent of the law gets you protection for things like carrying drugs. You know how they have people wear a wire then try to go buy/sell drugs? That person's acting as an agent of the law, and the cops can't charge him for buying/selling the drugs. But that also means he's restricted in evidence gathering the same way cops are.Everyone's saying he's reverse flash from the show... maybe, i don't watch the show


but he really really looks like the black racer to me.

[This guy](http://media.comicbook.com/2015/10/black-racer-153886.jpg)!RemindMe 4 daysisn't this usually recognized as, like, a sign of mental issues? like major stress or depression or something?no joke, if i were your SO and found out i'd be extremely pissed.

I don't know how demanding he was in getting to that rule, i don't know how shitty it is of him to do that, but it sounds like it's something that's important to him and you agreed to, and are doing anyway.

if i find out, my first reaction would be "you should have talked to me if it was that major of an issue, instead of lying to me and undermining something important to me that we agreed on."

i dunno. i guess what it says to me is "I don't care what you think is a big deal, i don't think it's a big deal so i'm going to lie to you and do it anyway." I mean, what else do you just decide on your own isn't a big deal so you're allowed to do it even though we agreed otherwise?

maybe i'm a shittier person than your SO, maybe he's shittier than me, I don't know, but I'd be extremely upset to find out this was happening.What's the harm? You said they're dead, right?"Hey dad, if someone obtains evidence for police that would otherwise constitute an illegal search if a cop did it, can that evidence be used in court?"

"Yes, unless that person was asked or directed by the police in any way, in which case they're acting as an agent of the law and have the same restrictions the police do."

--My dad, a criminal defense lawyer for forty years

and i'm gonna take his word for it over whatever interpretation you've made up about a random case you found on the internetSure, but I'd make sure to sell it as dashcam footage, not as an a-cam or anything.If I were you I'd do the first couple for free, to build a portfolio and get the word out. When you've got some good stuff and people start asking you, I'd try and get whatever I can, but I'd make my goal to get to $1k for a day of filming and editing. That seems like a good place for you to be for this kind of thing.That one coffee mug that looks like a lens.Benefits of working for free:

Build your portfolio

Make connections

Refine your skills/gain experience

---

Detriments to working for free:

Your portfolio is going to suck, because it's all going to be low-budget garbage from amateurs who don't know what they're doing

Your connections will be worthless, because you're not a professional in the eyes of your connections-- you're an amateur, or a hobbyist

Can't pay rent or buy groceries

Difficult to respect yourself as a professional

Lower quality jobs means way more headaches and less fulfilling work

---

If you absolutely, positively have nothing to show anyone, then even a bad portfolio is better than no portfolio, so it may be worthwhile to do *some* things for free, maybe.

But let me pose an alternative: If you're not getting paid, why not work on your own passion projects instead? This can still help fill out your portfolio, and will do even better because you've got full creative control, *and* you can create something that really shows off your talent, instead of serving someone else's vision.

I do want to note, though, that I at least make a distinction between working for free, and doing favors (or doing a gig for fun). There are lots of good reasons to do favors, but I always make it clear that I'm not "working for free," I'm doing a favor (and, I'm also not in "work mode." There's a level of professionalism that gives way to me having fun and being creative when I'm doing a favor)

One last thing: I don't *really* buy into the idea of "you undercut everyone else," because I do believe that skilled people aren't competing against those working for free... but I do want to make mention of the fact that you are starting to harm a professional community of which you will be, or are, a part. We shouldn't all be in this to screw over the other guy to get ahead, we should all be helping each other, and by driving prices down, even indirectly, you're making it difficult for them *and you*, eventually, to get fair rates. That's not really your problem, but it also kind of is. Just something to think about.Cool man. You do you.I see like three different composers posting on here daily about offering to score for free. I guess you could check that out?

Besides that, if you want more of a soundtrack, I'd look into contacting local/indie bands, a lot of them will be happy to give you the rights for ~$100 or so, because they're not making money off it anyway and the exposure might be fun/cool. Also because a lot of them are actually pretty cool people. I've done that a few times and had great experiences.

Every now and then, of course, you'll get some guy who's like "$5k or nothing," just say thanks but no thanks and move on. Usually that happens when someone directs you to their representation.&gt; We've had 15yo folk volunteer on set and all we needed was clear written permission from a parent (including all the liability/insurance signatures).

Labor laws for kids will still apply to volunteers. Written permission is the minimum needed, but the real problem is to have a minor actual do PA work, a typical shooting schedule is going to be breaking some laws about how long they're allowed to work.

So it's going to be difficult to find people willing to hire someone who can only work, like, half the day. Not impossible, but I imagine most productions just aren't going to want the headache unless there's a personal connectionI can't speak to that-- I don't know whether directing the private citizen to open it would affect the legalities of it in any way. Off hand I'd say the citizen still chose to open it, knowing the risks, but I really have nothing to base that guess on.The problem is in the secret part of it. If not snuggling dogs is wrong, don't agree to not do it. Like I said, if it's an issue, I would want my SO to talk to me about it and tell me how it's an issue. I know it sounds silly because it's such a mundane thing, but I would be very upset that our agreements were being undermined simply because the SO felt like it was a dumb agreement. Personally, I don't feel like pets on the bed is a mundane thing, so were I in this situation, something important to me has been undermined because my SO decided it wasn't important to *her*.

I know this is a bit of a leap, but in my mind at least, now I'm wondering-- we agreed not to make out with other people, is she going to decide that's a dumb agreement too? We agreed not to talk to our flirty exes who keep trying to get back together with us-- is she going to decide that's a dumb agreement too? etc. etc.

Point being, it's not fair for one person in a relationship to decide that their SO's concerns are unimportant and don't need to be respected.

it's not really about the action, it's about dismissing the so's concerns because you don't like them-- but still agreed to them. It's shitty to make an agreement with your SO you intend on breaking just because you don't like it-- instead of being honest about it and working to a compromise.

You may think all of this is silly and over reacting. That's fine, that's your opinion. But I'm giving a viewpoint from the other side-- it's something to think about. If the SO is anything like me, you should stop to think about how upset he's going to be that you're undermining your agreements because you don't feel his viewpoint is important.Hm. Well you've certainly piqued my curiosity. I'll keep it in mind for next time. Thanks for the write up!Uh... Yeah, he definitely did.Not only this but I've been told many times it can be a headache in post if the entire file structure isn't intact.Dunno, I just shoot. That's what the post guys have told me. I think the structure makes it easier to import.

It really doesn't take up much extra space, just pull it all in. We're talking, maybe a few megabytes, and if you can't spare that you've got bigger problems.He's messing with you&gt; NASA has since changed the rules and will not allow married astronauts on the same flight

Wasn't their whole thing that they did it in secret so NASA *couldn't* bar them from the flight? Couldn't someone else just do the same thing?This is a stupid rule. Talk about what you want, as much as you want, so long as it's appropriate.

There's no reason to hold back info just for the sake of holding it back.Well the shaft was probably involved tootoday you, tomorrow me&gt; I'm honestly surprised I made it out of that alive.

I would *guess* that they wouldn't want to add murder to their potential charges, and get a bigger investigation, for no reason.

In all likelihood it was something more along the lines of "Should we have this guy wait around for us to drive us somewhere else in an hour?"

"Nah man just let him go home, he already did what you asked."I don't know about Texas, but *most* places are going to require you to go get an eviction order from a judge before they do anything. Basically you have to sue the person to prove to the courts that they're staying there illegally and it is in fact your house (and give them an opportunity to defend themselves). Which sounds unfair until you think about it from the tenant's side: what if they are legitimately renting the place, and had a lease? It'd suck if your landlord could have the police just show up and kick you out when you can't even defend yourself.

This can be done via lawyer, but you're gonna have to pay the lawyer (which, it sounds, is what OP is doing)&gt; and has changed the locks.

dunno about Texas but in most states the landlord changing the locks without an eviction notice is a *huge* no-no.Personally, I find them dirty, smelly and slobbery. I like my bed, and my house, very neat.

Now, it's fine if you disagree-- I totally get that. I respect that, and I would hope that others can respect my opinion as well, even if they disagree with it or don't think it's a big deal. Most people would say I'm "overreacting," but I think I'm entitled to my opinion as much as anyone.that's... exactly what I'm saying?Most times this happens, it's because-- and I suspect is what happened with you, but your paraphrasing is made to work in your favor-- people don't really understand what constitutes consent when drunk. You can be drunk and consent. You can be *very* drunk and consent. You can be blackout drunk, and still legally consent.

However, if you *can not* physically consent, then that's rape. I just wonder what your definition of "physically consent" was. If someone is literally unable to say yes or no, then sure, that's rape. If somebody is just stumbly-drunk, then they can still legally consent.&gt; Which if they had a lease would also be a big no-no and grounds for termination of the lease.

That might just be for Texas, most places I've seen totally allow it, you just have to inform the owner and give them a copy of the key. But you don't need permission (this is so you can do things like, if you lock yourself out, have a midnight locksmith come by instead of sleeping on the street... my roommate did that once, i came home to him with the locksmith just finishing up the new lock)

but yeah texas might be different, i dunno&gt; 
&gt; 

I remember that CMV. OP absolutely refused to change his mind even after facts and arguments clearly destroyed his reasoning.The problem I have with Clinton is I don't know *what* she's going to decide she wants to get done... and she has the power to get it done.

With Bernie, maybe he doesn't have the power to get it done, but he wants to get the *right* things done. So at the very least, he's not going to fuck things up worse. I can't confidently say that about any of the other candidates.

ps if we vote in sanders because he's the best... that sends a pretty important message to politicians about who we want to vote for.A recurring theme in the show is the higher-ups telling Michael "You're such a fuck up... but your numbers are amazing."I think that was part of the joke of the series. He only ever got real acting work by being on a soap that didn't seem to care much if he remembered the lines or not.This isn't that common though. Most wrestlers are all just there to do a job. Sure, every now and then there will be some vengeance-type deal, especially back in the day before *everything* was the WWE/F, and some wrestlers (or bookers) would hold grudges for someone switching territories

but even that was pretty rare. people would get pissed, but understand that it was just business.

most injuries are legitimate accidents, especially because some popular wrestlers really aren't all that good at wrestling-- they're just popular, so they keep working&gt; I was slightly amused at how disgusted everyone was at the elbow drop guy for the rest of the night who seemed to have made an honest mistake but was still catching flack for it lol.

Even in a mosh pit, you shouldn't be dropping elbows. Moshing is for fun, not for hurting people.Well, it hit the guy, so I think we can assume it was a real oneIt's really difficult to know what happened from a one sided story. If everything you said happened just as you said, Joe is being wildly irrational and unreasonable.

Here's the thing though. It doesn't sound like ANYONE else had a problem with it. Maybe they all just ignored it, maybe Joe is too young/socially inexperienced to know how messed up it was... But I gotta say, the simplest answer seems to be that you missed something, misunderstood something or misread the situation. Maybe there's more to it than you know, I dunno, but I'd say that's more likely, with everyone else acting completely normal, than your boyfriend going completely bonkers for no reason and Joe acting totally weird about how it wasn't a big deal.

Just something to think about.I've found, barring extreme psychological issues, any couple can work on their sexual chemistry to the point where it is at least adequate for the relationship. If there had been a legitimate problem in her sexual satisfaction, she would have brought it up long ago.

I strongly suspect, given that, that it's YOU she is not attracted to. Your personality. Not your sexual chemistry. Maybe she wants something new and exciting, maybe you're just not the right guy for her.

There's nothing wrong with that, though it is a huge bummer for you. Go to counseling, do your thing, but I suspect in the long run you're just not right for each other.I'm a man, and I'm unmarried, but if I were married and didn't wear my ring without a good reason, I'd expect my wife to have a problem with it. I don't know where you're getting your information about how no one cares if a man doesn't wear it, but that's not been my experienceI have literally never heard of that. Engagement ring, sure, but not wedding ringwho the hell produced this video? the interview is great but the production is awful. what even?the whole production value is fucking awful, they need to immediately fire whoever's in charge of post. i frequently hear audio clips in and out at the edges of soundbites as well.well, i guess it's only fair we ask him a few real questions, too&gt; Grants for low performing schools identified by the state

is this not the opposite of what we're doing now? Am I reading that right?

It's my understanding that currently, underperforming schools get less funding. This means that they'll get more, right?

Which is neat, but doesn't this also incentivize students to make students' grades *lower*? (or, more likely, make tests harder or teach worse)I'm not sure how I feel about this. Doesn't this mean that kids from less fortunate backgrounds will be given leniency? I understand the thinking behind it, but it seems to be students should be evaluated objectively on whether or not they know the material. At the end of the day, all that really matters is whether they've learned anything or not.

Now, if it's to provide benefits to those from lower incomes, that's different, but then I don't understand how grades has an affect on it at all.He probably came from an aristocratic background. They all have to wear monocles, you know.&gt; to assess the movement of clouds in front of the sun.

I just use my sunglasses."Where did you fall behind in schedule, where did you run ahead, how did that affect the final product?""Which shots cost the most money and how worthwhile were they to the final product? How could they have been achieved more cheaply?""Which PA's had the hottest makeout session that you walked in on when they were on fire watch?"I'm like, 40% sure he just made that up and got everyone to play along. Even Google.Absolutely.

But keep in mind, Captain America *wouldn't say it.* That's why what he says holds more weight-- you trust him, you know what he says is True.&gt; my belief is that we must argue for what we believe without turning to violence.

Eh. The problem with that is, if our forefathers believed that we'd all still be British tax-monkeys.The problem is neither side thought they were wrong. It's like asking why armies can't fight in wastelands-- because they both think they have claim to whatever city.

So basically, you have Captain America saying "I'm not doing anything wrong, I'm going to keep heroing in New York and save people"

and Iron Man says "I'm not doing anything wrong, I'm going to keep heroing in New York and-- shit, that's Captain America! He's breaking the law, we gotta nab him!"

Iron Man could have said "Let's move to Wyoming," but... obviously, Cap would have said "No, you move." Because he believed he had a right to be there.Iron Man's quote kinda blows. He was basically saying, in my mind, "You should give up because if you don't everything's gonna suck for all of us."

That's not a good reason for anyone to give up. If Tony really believed that, why didn't *he* give up?I really, really want to be on Cap's side, but Pro Reg seems like the legitimately most sensible, safest solution for everyone.

We don't let cops fight in masks, why should we let supers?

edit: I want to retract my statement about masks, because apparently it's caused a lot of confusion. What I meant to imply with that is that we don't let cops fight anonymously, without authorities/the government/their bosses knowing who they are. In fact, they have to go through a rigorous training program sponsored by the state/city.We'll all have to wait and watch the movie. I wouldn't try to guess at complex motivations from a trailer.RemindMe! Ten years&gt; You wouldn't have register clerks, you would have salespeople that were thoroughly trained in their departments (think Apple Geniuses for the Men's department)

This sounds absurdly expensive for JC Penney's customers, especially with a price drop.

Unless you meant typical department-store training, which is basically none at all and your average customer probably knows more about the product than they do. But legit, good training? For every employee in every department across the nation?

Expensive as fuck.

(I imagine Apple gets away with it, because they can have a standardized training process for all their products for everyone, because they have far fewer people in their stores, and because they're selling $2000 laptops, not $15 shirts)They probably can't beat wal-mart's prices though. Wal-mart sells crap for cheap, Penney's at least sells usable stuff.&gt; the time to acquire new customers is longer and stockholders couldn't be patient.

ah, the problems with needing quarterly profit reportsi'm guessing he means he has thanksgiving on a different day (or no thanksgiving), so black friday isn't the "everyone has the day off from work and it's the first day with no more holidays until christmas" scenario we have in america. which is why black friday is a thing in the first place.

but yes, having black friday sales on black friday pretty much makes it black friday.but how long does it have to be at the original price? can't they just mark it up for, like, a single day, then go into a six-month sale on it?i buy from amazon because they're the cheapest, or tied for cheapest, on pretty much everything

i never really pay attention to the sales or whatever. although it does make it annoying if i'm trying to price match something

"Amazon has this for $20!"

"Yeah but that's a sale so it doesn't count"

"yeah but i mean not really come on"i totally get the pointlessness of that

on the other hand, when my parents die, i am going to have a *lot* of trouble throwing out her knife set or whatever. the knife set i learned to cook with, that she had for forty years.

i'm sure i'll be rational and realize it's useless, but still man...how often do you actually see amazing deals, though? stores very, very rarely decide "You know what, I don't really like money, so I'm going to sell this thing at *way* below its value."

Sure, sometimes you'll see something that's a loss-leader and actually get a good deal on it, but that's pretty rare-- and is almost never an "amazing" deal. If you ever see something that's an amazing deal, it's probably just a piece of garbage.Woo! But legit, at least we get to use those taxes on American stuff.&gt; They protect their identity against the kind of criminals who would come after their families.

But not from the government. "Masks" was a euphemism for anonymously, even to the authorities.Hey man, that all looks cool, but here's the thing with frame grabs:

we have absolutely no context for them. It's impossible to discuss the cinematography of them, because cinematography is inherently about matching tone and context in moving images.

While I totally appreciate you contributing to the sub, does anyone else think it might be good if we actually ban frame grabs? I can't see how they can be turned into a discussion on cinematography. If you want to post a clip or something, awesome, go for it.&gt; He wants their families to be safe, too.

It'd be a lot easier to protect families if the super hero community, and the cops, all knew who to protect. How many capes actually manage to keep their secret identity a secret? Every single one of them has, at some point, spilled the beans to a supervillain. And gotten their family in trouble. That's an inevitability.

Seems like it'd be a lot easier if we could train some supers to keep an eye on families as part of their shift rotation. Hell, we could make an app. 

"Hey Black Bolt, it's Murdock. Bullseye's been fucking around with me and I see you're in the area of my office while I have to be away-- think you can keep an eye on Karen for me?"

"Yes, and also it is neat how I can communicate with text which has apparently never occurred to me before."I dunno man. I think I'd be okay with ads, so long as they kept them out of the game story.

Better yet, this game is insanely popular-- do they sell merch? Can they start?&gt; You don't always have to be pedantic Reddit.

but sometimes is alright, right?

...please?Aww, it's so cute the way he tried to eat that guy.As I said elsewhere there, pretty much every hero has at one point or another given up their secret identity to at least one enemy

so that's pretty much going to happen either way. And it seems to me, making families' information publicly available would actually make it easier for the superhero community to protect them. Instead of just being high-profile targets that no one knows about except the hero's arch-nemesis who learned his secret identity... now they're high-profile targets that *everyone knows* is a high profile target and can help watch out for.I know I'm late to the game, and you've probably gotten similar advice, but in case not, here's how I would approach the situation:

Recognize his concerns about his living space are valid. But also, of course, so are your feelings towards your dog. So if you want to be together, you're going to have to work out a way to alleviate his concerns.

His only real concern *seems* to be the hair. So how do we fix that?

I would lay out a solid plan for how to minimize the hair problem. I don't know your dog, but figure out how often he'll need to go to the groomer's to keep the shedding to a minimum. Lay out a promise-- and keep it! That you'll brush him every day. Or every other day, whatever. Make certain you have a plan for vacuuming specifically for your pet-- maybe every day, maybe every week, whatever you need to do. *You* need to do this, not your BF (although it would be great if he did eventually join in on this. Perhaps a conversation for another time). Make a point of *always* having lint rollers on hand.

I would come up with firm details on those things for what's needed to keep the apartment clean and relatively hair-free, then present that plan to your BF and see what his reaction's like.

Good luck.Oh, best buy level of training? So, like I said, typical department-store training where the average customer knows more than the employee. Got it.

Seriously the level of knowledge of best buy employees is a joke, and if you think differently then... I don't know what to tell you mean.neat. they should sell it... better, because i had no idea.&gt; With people like the Green Goblin, Doctor Doom, and Bullseye running around how could any of them be confident their loved ones are safe? They couldn't.

Exactly. Green Goblin and Bullseye both *already killed* loved ones of supers who had secret identities.

So we already know that doesn't work.

You skipped over my point entirely just to reiterate yours-- since secret identities already get found out by villains, it would be more helpful to clue in the super community too, for additional help for high-profile targets.Why are you even questioning this? She doesn't want to be with you anymore, she wants other people. That sucks, it's not your fault, but it's the way it is.

End it and move on. Shit happens, better luck on the next one.You're not to blame for infidelity. If she had a problem with your lax in self-maintenance, she should have discussed it with you. Not decided to go bang other guys.

(she almost definitely banged other guys. come on)If he's worked in the company so many years why would he not have the company's phone number?&gt; You're cluing in everybody!

So? You haven't mentioned why this is a bad thing, except that villains would know it, which I pointed out they already do.

Politicians and corporations already have access to high-profile family members. No one took Obama's daughters hostage, ever. In large part because people knew who his daughters *were*, so they knew who to protect.bullshit. people don't have to be alone to work on themselves.&gt; Anything I can do or work on to get over this?

Yeah, fucking dump her. I know that's the cliche thing to say around here, but that's my advice. She cheated on you because she was mad at you-- it was revenge, and it'll probably happen again.

If you choose not to take my advice then get yourself into some therapy so a qualified professional can tell you how to fix your unfixable relationship.Yep. How my roommate handles his relationships is none of my business.what a selfish piece of shitwtf are you talking about. there's no way you look at that picture and don't recognize who that is.carol ferris?except hitler was full of shit. they didn't trust hitler because he was *right,* they trusted him because-- well it's a whole host of issues, too complicated to get into but you should do some reading on it some time, it's fascinating.if you want to take his money in exchange for taking his abuse, that's up to you

but that's fucking pathetic. get a job, get some loans, many, many people have made their own way without their parents' help.I knew a *super* attractive couple-- like, model attractive-- that went to a halloween party wearing only "CENSORED" signs over their naughty bits.Cat.I don't know why it sounds familiar, it's certainly not even similar to the trust you'd have in captain America.Yes. Which is not what Cap would do. Big difference.Ah well then. Fair play.I think this is gonna be one of those threads I'm gonna have to browse by most controversial to get any real answersIME these kinds of big holiday dates usually mean huge tips. I'm sure there are plenty of d-bags out there thinking "I already spent so much goddamn money already, and she's never gonna see what tip I leave anyway"

but-- maybe I've just gotten lucky-- most of my clientele seems to be the "This is so great, I'm in love, I'm so happy and generous here is a SHIT TON OF MONEY KID!"who the hell has dinner for 3 hours? if you're there for a date-- an actual date-- i get that

but in this (scumbaggery) hypothetical, if you're *just* there for the food, you show up, eat, and leave.

also-- this is still scumbaggery, but again for the hypothetical-- you can still have fun and enjoy yourself and just bail after dinner if you have no intentions of actually dating the person.well, in fairness, on the front page of askreddit is a post *asking* if this is True, not asserting it. someone out there is trying to give women a fair shot and see if this is really common or just a bad stereotype.i could never date someone with a 12-date rule. "When I'm ready" is fine, and if that happens to take 12 dates... well... if they're really good dates, I might be on board (though very cautious... I've found it difficult to have a passionate relationship if it doesn't start out with a... well, a bang)

but as a rule? that just seems stupid. and/or manipulative-- sounds to me like she's using sex as a reward/weaponprops on use of conscience and not conscious. kids today, i tell ya.sounds like a misguided PUA. A lot of them hear the advice that persistence is key, and take it the wrong way.

Actually, there's really no right way to take that advice. That is bad advice. If she says no, respect that. At best, all you'll be doing is wearing her down to the point of her relenting into sleeping with you. Is that really that fun?Here's the advice I give to guys who are stuck in the "guys should always pay for everything" mindset, but are getting taken advantage of and know it--

Agree to pay for one thing if she pays for something else. You don't have to do it in an official "we're drawing up a contract" way, just "Hey, how about I get _____ and you get _____?" Never had it go over poorly.

And here's trick, which helps guys stuck in the guys-should-pay mindset-- you offer to pay for the more expensive thing.

So maybe it's "Hey, how about you get the coffee and I'll get the movie tickets?"

or "How about I take care of dinner and you can grab the movie tickets?" (I like going to the movies, sue me)

This way, you're not entering into a totally one-sided relationship, no one feels taken advantage of, everyone feels like they're contributing to the date

**but** the guy can still feel good about being the "gentleman" and covering the real big ticket thing.

Now, ideally, guys would just get over that shit and everyone would pay equally-- or what I like to do, sometimes I treat, sometimes she treats, especially if one of us is having a rough week with money. But not all guys can quite shake that.tbf she didn't say it was eight different people. maybe it was just one guy that liked to pay for her.gotcha, thanks for the infothat's essentially how i felt about it, yeaha friend of mine is getting married next spring to a chick he met on tinder

you're right, for sure-- the primary use is hooking up. but it's not the only legitimate reason to use it.i dunno. feels good?ahh, i've had that happen. i never get sucked in. i might offer to pay for a date, but too many times i've had someone show up, ask for a drink, then bail when i say "nah"i know a lot of women that say they pay half their tab

i've rarely seen them do it. (occasionally, they'll, like, pay for dinner 1/10 times or pay for coffee after a guy picks up the $100 dinner or drinks tab)

e: i don't care if you guys don't like it, these are real women who actually do this. don't get pissed at me for their shitty behavior&gt; she's never going to sleep with you out of a sense of obligation or gratitude for the free food/drinks.

plenty do. it's sad, but it's real. and the kicker is this just encourages the behavior. even if only one out of every ten chicks do it, that just means that that's "how you get girls" and the rest of them were "bitches"i strongly disagree with this. a lot of guys will pay because they're told that's what guys are supposed to do. it's naive, for sure, but some guys get it stuck in their head and can't get it out.

and a lot of women are just manipulating that. even if the guy isn't really trying to just get laid.

in fact, think of the guy who *wouldn't* want to get laid on the first date. who would refuse, because that's too fast and he wants to take it slow. a really... y'know, *nice* guy. now think about it-- this is exactly the kind of guy who would offer to pay for dinner, too, right?&gt; it's culturally understood that unless a guy pays for her meal he's unlikely to get a second date

I disagree. I almost never pay the full tab for a date, and the only time I've not gotten a second date was when it was mutual.by your logic the woman should also be paying the tab, because any relationship must start with her also being sexually attracted to the guy

and, under your logic, sexual attraction = you pay for drinksit's not really a "deal" so much as it is manipulation and fraud.

yep, fraud, because you're on a dating site indicating you're out with someone because you have an interest in them, when actually you're just interested in what's in their wallet.[Best I could find](http://newyork.craigslist.org/mnh/msg/5343810800.html)One apartment

Half the rentyou forgot to mention that community does parody or theme episodes

and this was their "invasions of the bodysnatchers" parody episode. they didn't just randomly do it.it's been pretty well established (though not officially confirmed) that xena and gabrielle were lovers. they were well regarded in the gay community as being... i don't know, role models?Rosa! From Brooklyn Nine-Nine.&gt; These threads all end the same with lack of actual tips and more vague information.

A symptom of two issues:

1) The upvote system. People upvote the stuff that sounds the best, not what is necessarily the best.

2) Everyone is different, so the only real instruction on how to flirt is "do whatever she's into." If you can't read a person and know how to adapt, all you can really get are some loose guidelines which basically boil down to "don't be a jerk and hope she likes you"There's a right way and a wrong way to do it.

I'm *great* at getting people to open up, share their motivations, tell me about themselves, etc.

I use lots of phrases like-- legit stuff you think of cheesy tv psychologists saying-- "How'd you feel about that?" "What was your reaction?" "You couldn't have been too happy about that."

The trick is: get them talking about themselves... *in a conversation.* Follow up. React to what they said. You can still keep it about them, about the story they're telling or whatever, but most people just go through questions like they're on a list.

"What do you do for a living?"

"I'm a nurse."

"oh that must be good. Where are you from?"

"A small town an hour from here."

"Oh, cool."

etc.

follow up, man (and don't just do bland boring obvious questions, unless you really have to-- don't ask "So how'd you like it?" that's a dumbass question with very little room for conversational response). 

Ask her questions about her answers, then ask questions about *those* answers, then ask question about *those* answers, then go back and ask questions from the previous answer, then more from the answer before that, then more from before that

and pretty soon you've just had a wonderful two hour conversation where you really got to know someone.

(hopefully they're good enough at conversation to have you talk about yourself, too-- it's not wrong to want to talk about yourself a little, too)I've always heard it as Batman. If you have the option, always be Batman.I feel like we're about to get into a recursive loop hereYeah but wasn't dbz always just about fighting each other, not staking a claim somewhere? Cell ultimately wanted to destroy everyone, but really his immediate goal was just too fight the strongest heroes.Keep your phone on. Many distributors call up the filmmakers who got in to see what else they're working on.

Source: used to intern at a distributor, it was my job to online stalk everyone who got in to major festivals to find your contact information if you didn't make it easily available. Sometimes the call was just "hey, give us a ring if you've got anything else cool!" Sometimes it was straight up "we're really interested in this, please send us a screener" though the latter was more for features.

I wouldn't be surprised if agents work the same way.

PS that job made me feel like such a creep. Sometimes I was literally pulling phone numbers from a high school math team contact list some school left up from fifteen years ago. Seriously make a web site or something with easy to find contact info so interns don't have to feel like creeps! That is also how I learned I have amazing Google-fu, and that nearly everyone has doxxed themselves at some point that anyone who wants it bad enough can find.&gt; Captain America and Stark for instance could have just declared New York an "Open City."[1]

Except, as I said before, neither was willing to do that because they both thought they had a right to be there. Tony's whole thing was that any unregistered supers were fugitives, and had to be taken in on sight. The unregistered supers didn't recognize Tony's authority at declaring them fugitives, and thus were unwilling to surrender anything.

As I mentioned, even if Tony had said "Let's take this fight somewhere else," Cap would've said "No, I have every right to stay here."

And if Cap had said "Don't arrest me while I'm in New York," Tony would've said "I'm gonna arrest you wherever I goddamn see you."EXCELLENT CONVERSATION. GOOD DAY TO YOU AS WELL.This was the first time I realized itI think I saw it in English on one of the "I'm fucking tired and hungover, we're watching a movie" days.well then the question is why did anyone find *you* guilty of the damage? clearly (well, not that clearly, i don't know any of the details but still) you should've been found not guilty and the homeowners should've gone after the guys who assaulted youMaybe, maybe not. But that's kind of the whole thing they were fighting over-- Cap's right to stay in the city, since he didn't recognize himself as a fugitive. If he leaves the city the whole fight is moot anyway.

And besides, Tony might not have agreed to it anyway.I fucking love driving. I have a 14 hr. road trip coming up for the holidays. I can't say I'll exactly enjoy 14 hours straight, but I think I'll hate it a lot less than most people.happy cakeday bruhIf you legitimately only use it for emergencies, it's worthwhile. It helps prevent that... whatever the boot theory thing is that basically says it's more expensive to be poor than rich.

Like the guy said, if your car breaks down-- you don't have the money to fix it. But if you don't fix it, you'll lose even *more* money by not going to work than if you went into debt.Should I also learn how to fix my fucked up leg, or operate on my tumor?

(I don't actually have either of these problems, but they're examples of unexpected medical costs)you know, if you see her boobies, you have to show her your peepee.&gt; Also, if you think I can't see you looking down all sly at your phone, you're wrong, I can. You're the only kid in the room looking at your crotch. It stands out.

Everytime, teachers on these threads like to say this like they're fucking sherlock holmes in a room full of morons.

Think about this though:

**Every single kid** in that class is using a cell phone during class. All of them. Every one.

You're only picking out the ones who are *really really bad* about it.

There is absolutely no way you can tell when a kid reaches into his backpack whether he's texting. When a kid grabs a book out from his desk. When a kid drops his pencil and bends to pick it up.

Or when they're just not so stupid as to do it when you're watching. It's really easy to tell when you're looking at us, and when you're turned around writing on the board.You may think it's detrimental, but to me it sounds useful as fuck.for reals though silent work is bullshit. school is for teaching, home is for doing. the classes that i always thought were the absolute best were when the teacher would just give us a lecture the whole class, then assign us some work to do on our own.

edit: i understand how this may not apply to younger grades, this was for high school and most of middle school&gt; *[God damnit](https://www.reddit.com/r/AskReddit/comments/2j0zdu/whats_something_your_parents_always_believed_in/cl7d9js)*When you're riding the train at 3am-5am on a weekday morning I like to play "Drunk or just off work"

Sometimes it's both!Well, they can't break any laws, but they have access to any public information, same as anyone else.

Private investigating is really just knowing where and how to look for stuff. The same way that your grandma doesn't know how to google for something, even though it's available to her, but you know how to google for it.

It's not illegal to follow someone to a hotel and see if they meet with anyone. They can't, however, go into the hotel room (legally). But most times, just getting a picture of a spouse meeting someone at a hotel is enough "evidence" to show what's going on.what if you could jump really good thoughso you're saying there's a chance&gt; The last time they were all in one place Damian issued a challenge to them.

well, there was that time with the joker...&gt; if he knows him and that he was Robin he should really know that Bruce is/was Batman.

**everyone** should know that. I don't fucking get it, and DC ignoring it doesn't make it better. Duke got it right, how does everyone else not get it? Nightwing is adult Robin. Nightwing is Dick Grayson. *Dick Grayson is Bruce Wayne's son.* Robin is Batman's partner.

Come on.they heavily implied Bruce won't be back as Bats until at least issue #50, and I imagine it's going to be a bit after that as well.

I'm mostly thinking Bruce is gonna take up as Batman again right around when the movie hits.IMO I'd say Bruce's ability to be Batman is gone, but the knowledge that he *was* Batman can be recovered (and is what Bruce is hiding from).

And then at some point he's going to have to retrain, or find a new way to reboot his memories or whatever. It's Batman, there's no reason to believe he doesn't have a back-up brain somewhere or some shit like that.i want so bad to believe that this is real[Wikipedia says](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spoliation_of_evidence) you pulled that out of your ass

&gt; The spoliation inference is a negative evidentiary inference that a finder of fact can draw from a party's destruction of a document or thing that is relevant to an ongoing or **reasonably foreseeable** civil or criminal proceedingIn one of the tie ins he literally just snapped his fingers and remade reality. I think it was one of the inhuman ones where Medusa was an outlaw and like, beat the system or something. And Doom was like "interesting. Let's see how the same scenario plays out with black bolt as the outlaw" and recreates reality.

So, granted the writing may just be a little sloppy, but doom basically has infinite power.are you gonna go back and start from the 3-year avengers run? i've been thinking about doing that, especially because i really didn't understand what happened during all of iti've given up trying to remember when secret wars issues are coming out. i guess 9 is pushed back to january now? whatever, i just stop expecting them and it's a fun surprise when they show up&gt; Petition for an unworthy Thor and Herc team up 2K15.

wait do we know if Thor is still unworthy? Right before Battleworld, he became worthy again, and since secret wars hasn't wrapped up we don't know at what point the 616 started up again.&gt; Thors had [Ultimate Thors Doom-made axe-hammer thrown so hard it broke out of Battleworld and landed in 616 Old Asgard, to be continued maybe in Mighty Thor] (/spoiler)

I still don't really get this. Didn't 616 *not exist* at the time?is anyone still reading this? i loved the concept but couldn't keep going after issue 2 when the app marketing became *so* freaking blatantmaybe, but they probably saw the writing on the wall same as everyone else&gt; "we never had a plan B" means "we never wanted to do Plan B"

well, it probably just means "we hoped we wouldn't have to come up with a plan b, and it turns out we didn't."

they probably legitimately never had an actual, set idea to go if spidey couldn't show up, but i'm sure they could have figured something out if they had to.that is not a mcguffin.

but i think what you're saying is pretty possible.It's all in the writing. If someone good is writing her, she's like this sassy, independent woman who don't take no shit and is a lot of fun to read.

If someone bad is writing her she's just like a bland b-superhero that can kinda fight sometimes...what link is missing here for you, because that proves the point perfectly and doesn't "disagree" with people saying this was destruction of evidence at all.

it verifies that it was, in fact, destruction of evidence.You are projecting. OP did not indicate in any way the he didn't think it happened, nor should anyone be claiming or assuming OP actually wants to do that.

Sorry you went through that, but your experience doesn't apply here.Geeze. Lot of closed-minded people here telling you how worried they'd be that you want it for real. It's like, everyone understands a kink's just a kink when it's *their* kink, but as soon as they hear about someone else's, **that** person is all kinds of fucked up!

Nah man. I get it. So here's the thing:

Ease into it slow. It took you *four years* just to get this far. Enjoy what you have, for at least a while, then very slowly bring up maybe pushing the boundaries just a little bit. Hell, maybe she'll put them a little herself for you. Don't run at it full throttle.The reasonably foreseeable prosecution was for possession of illegal drugs.

I don't care if you agree with me, judges and lawyers do and you'd do well to accept that.

Besides, others have gone over whether you have to *know what the evidence is* for a destruction of evidence charge (you don't). I was only pointing out that the guy who said charges have to already have been filed is incorrect. Your whole thing is irrelevant here.Get a partner who understands and cares enough to work through it with you. And do your best to work through it with them. And recognize that, like any sexual... difficulties, it's going to take some actual work together and may not ever be perfect but you can help each other find a way to lessen it and be okay with it.it would be cause for questioning, but if they were just holding hands, i don't see a problem with itShame.

She didn't want you to find out because she'd be ashamed of herself. She knew you'd be disappointed in her. So she hid it from you. She hid it in the laundry room so she'd be able to get away with drinking without you knowing. She probably thought it'd be too obvious if she tried to transport the empties to the garbage without you seeing.

And the thing is, you're not going to be able to convince her not to hide it from you out of shame. She's going to have to get legitimate help to quit. At least, that's been my experience with the situation.Words like cheating lose their meaning when you start applying them to everything.

She's lying to him, she's betraying his trust. That's all very bad.

It's not cheating. Stop throwing that word around like it applies to any time someone lies. If she had said she was going to the park but instead went to her mother's, would you say she's cheating on him with her mother?Maybe, maybe not. Maybe the girlfriend once mentioned six months ago she liked the shoes, and the friend has mentioned it once a week every single time they passed the store.i don't know but i just signed up for dollar shave clubWhat the fuck man are you even aware of your own comments?Important to point out pronouns here

The driver would be held at fault if it was the driver's fault. Uber wouldn't be at fault, unless they were found to have played a part in negligent business practices like recommending all their drivers run red lights to get their passengers dropped off faster.It wasn't a question. You are not understanding what a mcguffin is. *Everything* is a plot device. A mcguffin is something the protagonists specifically require as goal, which moves the story forward but is otherwise inherently worthless and only exists as a goal for the protagonists to move the story forward.


The death star plans are a mcguffin. A character who helps the other characters realize the error of their ways is not.What? I didn't follow that but planting a bug and wearing a wire are two different thingsDunno about cross country, but the way it works across states is whichever state has the stricter rules usually takes precedence. I imagine the same is True of countries.I went to film school. Survived off student loans, gave me enough "protection" from the real world while I built my portfolio. Enough to make a meager living when I got out and built it from there.

Do what you gotta do and don't give up, but I've found it very difficult to hold down any kind of steady job and freelance seriously. It makes for some tough times but that's how it goes. But then, you have different skill sets than I did. There are certainly survival jobs out there that can be conducive to continuing a film career, coding may be one of them.The only reason not to sign for it is if you're planning on dodging the legal system. In general, that's not a very noble reason.You have proof *someone* refused it. That's the whole problem. The same person who is not your intended recipient could refuse the certified mail and ignore the regular letter.As a current cinematographer, I love most of the people I work with. Once you get to a certain level, most (not all) of the people stop being assholes. You have to be really, really good at what you do too be an asshole and keep steady work.Not every place will do that.I think the best way to handle this would be to figure out your relative hourly, when they ask for a price for something simple let them know your hourly and tell them you'll bill any additional work at that rate

And if it ends up being simple either don't charge them for it on the invoice, or charge it and zero it out as a comp

If it adds up, then you're justified in billing for it, and won't be resentful at all the small additional things.There is absolutely no reason for your attitude. The guy runs a church, and while away one of his employees fucked up. Now the guy is offering to complete the religious ceremony by the standard rules that apply to everyone else who gets married there, or offering to annul his part in it.

It's a shitty situation but the pastor is being reasonable as per his religious beliefs. You know, regarding the religious ceremony he performed in a religious place of worship.

E: and I bet every dollar in my pocket that he's not trying to get it anNoneed legally, just his part in it&gt;  If it violated any rules of the church or congregation he wouldn't have done it.

That's obviously not True at all. It's been clearly stated that the ceremony violated many core rules of the church. The replacement screwed up.

&gt; he wants the couple to re-do it at their own expense after they're already legally married.

1) They don't have to legally re-do anything. Religiously, they can re-do it or not

2) They can spend as much or as little on it as they want

3) They can follow the steps to make it official in the church

Those are all options. They're not good options, the replacement definitely screwed up here, but they are options available to the couple to satisfy the needs of the church (which they're allowed to impose) and which you're neglecting.

&gt; they should fight any effort on his part to annul anything out of principle.

They can fight all they want, but the church can annul any religious ceremony it wants, and the pastor has no ability to annul it legally, so there's nothing the couple can do anyway.

e: forcing the church to recognize a marriage that goes against its faith is not only illegal, it's immoral. that's what you're suggesting, and it's pretty fucked up. Bummer that the replacement pastor screwed things up so badly, but that doesn't mean we have to ignore religious tolerance on a technicality. That's not how that works.You're just removing frames. There's no reason you need to compromise the quality of the image.I was trying to wrap up on set once and all the cast and crew were busy taking pictures with the celebrities. So that was annoying.Where/when is the panel?Also sunshine theater and Angelicka play movies in limited release. Saw some great films there I wouldn't have otherwise gotten to seeThe investigation also ruled out road rage (just adding more info for anyone reading)you're not the only family who decided to see a scorsese movie starring leonardo dicaprio on christmas.you're gonna have to narrow it downthe thing i'll always remember about that opening is how many fake intros it had.

river as a kid

nope it was a memory! river being tortured.

nope it was a video! operative reviewing the rescue.

THEN opening credits, and finally we get to the ship.you're mistaken, and if you watch it carefully frame by frame you can spot the cut. if memory serves it's right when they get up the stairs, the camera swings around to face the wall which is where they do the cutyou're not wrong, but it can be a bit embarrassing on the second date. when you forget your best friend's name, he thinks it's funny. when you forget your date's name the second time out, it *suggests* you just weren't paying attention or didn't care very much.you don't have to keep secrets, but no one wants to hear about their new romantic interest's past romances on the first couple dates.

it may come up in conversation or be relevant at some other time, but for a little while it's a topic to be avoided.

ps you should be up front about it before they come hang out, obviously

and also, if they're coming to hang out, you didn't really go your separate ways...are you guys playing a joke on me?You know how when you're drawing or writing or whatever, you can press normally, but you can also press lighter and get lighter drawings/text? Well, that's two sensitivities of pressre. This stylus gives you that, but... way more.that sounds depressing as hell&gt; peeing wherever whenever easily.

you may think that but my public urination tickets say otherwisethe only thing stopping a girl from orgasming is herself

a guy can help her along, or not help her, but he's not the one stopping her

(i'm not putting blame anywhere just letting women know they have it in themselves to achieve orgasm and should seek that out if they want to)bitchy rumors in school are going to get started no matter what you do&gt; It's legal, though, and must be recognized.

Not within the church. The church has every single right to not perform any gay marriages. If the church performs a gay marriage mistakenly, it can discredit the marriage within the church.

The legality has nothing to do with it.It's very unlikely to and would require active deception. I didn't choose gay marriage as the analogy.It's a religious ceremony. I've said this many times.&gt; You realize this convo is all about the legality right?

It isn't. I've stated so very plainly.

&gt; No one cares if the church refuses to recognize the marriage internally after the fact

Apparently the pastor, OP, and everyone heavily downvoting me does.&gt; Shooting at faster frame rate will give less time for each frame, reducing the amount of motion blur per frame. 

So modify the shutter speed if you're not happy with it

&gt; Dropping frames will lose the image "quality" that you would otherwise retain by merging the frames together 

Why would you merge frames together

There is nothing inherent about conforming 60fps to 24fps that requires a quality loss in image.I'm not advocating for any legal remedy, which is often the case with this sub and someone mistakenly thinks they have a legal issue but don't. I refer you back to my declaration that the couple can do anything if the church wants to religiously annul the ceremony within their church, and the pastor can't legally annul it in the eyes of the state, so there's no legal action for anyone here to take.In all fairness if you pick up anything and just assume right away that half the inputs are irrelevant/useless, that's on you.Not much, he's just a little young to be filling many of the roles he has, so he appears to be immature. He's no less mature than others in those rolesYou'll have to check your state laws on possession, if you're wondering for yourself. Most states have some qualifier that possession is legal if the subject can reasonably pass for 18. (Production and distribution are much stricter and are bound by federal laws, not states)

If you're not intentionally seeking out underage subjects, and you can be reasonably sure they appear to be 18, you're probably fine.

But I'm not a lawyer and this is a serious subject, so your best bet is to not take my word for it but stay away from these sites altogether.It's far more likely that OP is mistaken than that the pastor thinks he can annul the ceremony legally.

What's the use in supporting the far more unlikely assumption when a much more likely one is present?

And even if I am incorrect, I've stated plainly that my stance is for the scenario I've stated.

People are going off the rails to bash this guy without understanding what's going on. Do we really think a pastor is threatening to annul a marriage *legally* and have them go somewhere else? That doesn't even make sense. That means the pastor would be lying (about his ability to annul), and mistaken (about his purpose in the ceremony), and nonsensical (since on top of those malicious acts he's still giving them options to confirm their marriage within his church or elsewhere), **and** OP would be mistaken on top of all that.

So, as I've said before, what's actually going on instead of that ridiculous situation that you've apparently all decided is 100% fact is that the pastor is refusing to recognize the religious aspect of the marriage within his own church. That's perfectly legal, OP can do nothing about it, and is absolutely not call for harsh treatment against the pastor.

I thought we all realized the pastor obviously wasn't trying to annul legally. Take a step back and let's think this through.

e: or join the hivemind and the religion bashing by throwing on more waves of downvotes. I'm not religious myself, but I'm not trying to force private religion to conform to my ideas of religion, as many of you seem to want. If the pastor doesn't want to recognize their marriage, he has no obligation to do so.So long as an employer is meeting mandatory minimum wage requirements (and providing any necessary overtime/breaks/etc) they're not breaking any labor wage laws.

The only thing that can save someone like this is an agreement to pay a certain wage for a certain time period. In other words, a contract.

No contract, no deal. The employer can lower his wage all the way down to minimum wage if they want.how dare lawyers charge money for their services they spent years of difficult and expensive schooling to be able to perform

crooks, all of 'emGo over to /r/freelance and tell this story to everyone that tries to justify their working for free.

**Never work for free.**

You won't suddenly become their best friend guy they want to pay all the money to

You are and will always be "the guy that works for free." They're big time now, why would they want an amateur like you? They want a *professional.*

It doesn't matter how good your work is, in their mind you're the guy that works for free and that's it.

You've learned a lesson. Don't work for free and get everything in writing.

No, you have no legal case here. Sorry bud.

(as others have stated you can try contacting the wage board for back pay, but if you don't have anything in writing it'll be difficult to have any progress with that)&gt; He/She wrote into /r/legaladvice.

and while everyone else said "fuck that pastor!"

i'm the only one who said "there's no legal action for either of you to take, and thinking that's what he's referring to is a mistake, you are misunderstanding the situation."&gt; I trusted these people

We've all been there. Try not to make the same mistake again.

&gt; Then, it all fucked up once the CEO had a change of heart.

Of course he did. As I mentioned, you're the guy that works for free. They may have every intention of hiring you at full pay at the beginning, but once they got real money they decided to rethink whether they really wanted *the guy who works for free.* Everything you've said indicates exactly this line of logic.

Remember: Anyone can make promises, almost everyone will reconsider when it's time to write the check.

Anyway, good luck. Sorry you got screwed, but there's probably not much you can do.I flaired it, dude. What are the flairs for if not to tag it?Technically, DLC is any content that is (or can be) downloaded for the game.

An expansion pack is an addition to the main game.

Thus an expansion pack *can* be DLC, however a lot of DLC isn't necessarily an expansion pack.

Traditionally, the terms have just changed based on distribution. Expansion packs were big in the 90's and early 2000's, they were physical media you'd go to the store and buy and install and would add to the main game (we're talking about video game expansion packs here, though the same logic applies to other games like M:TG or board games or whatever). The expansion packs would have a TON of new content, often almost enough to be a new game in itself (not always... but usually).

Then DLC came along, offering some minor additional content. An extra map or two, some extra weapons. Really, this started from the users creating their own additional content and passing it around independently, then the publishers realized they could do the same thing and charge for it.

Eventually DLC just became the standard model, and any additional game content was offered through download. Meaning all expansion packs are now DLC.&gt; Since annulment is a legal procedure

No it isn't. It is a word meaning to dissolve/make it never have happened. That can easily apply to religious ceremonies.&gt; if your house catches on fire, a team of people will come hose it off and rescue you

i feel like it's important i always point this out, even if it's largely irrelevant and inapplicable:

they'll only do that if they feel like it. they're under no obligation to.

that's mind-boggling, but important to remember in a discussion about the benefits we receive in exchange for taxes.&gt; The short version is that not all calories are exactly equal.

All calories are equal as far as weight gain is concerned. If this were a discussion about fat gain/loss, it'd be different.

The answer to OP's question is that it doesn't. The only thing that affects your weight loss is how many calories you consume versus how many calories you expend (including any drug alterations, and for temporary periods how much water/food you're retaining)

e: reddit is really being annoying today. calories out &gt; calories in = weight loss. end of story.If someone offers to pay you what you're owed, I can't see how it's groveling to accept it

but hey man you do youLet's try this a different way. What exactly do you think it is about your situation that makes their advice irrelevant?

Because both myself, the guy above me, and the guy above him think that charing $0 for the service on the invoice is good advice for you.Nope. He was never tried, never convicted.

Mostly due to statute of limitations. Still, while I would never want to be around him, I find it hard to bring myself to definitively declare him guilty when a jury of his peers in a court of law has yet to do so. It kind of sucks everyone else has condemned him so steadfastly.&gt; his new /u/UnidanX[1]  account doesn't seem to post the same way or get acknowledged in the same fashion.

there could be any number of reasons for this

but i'm fairly convinced it's just proof that even very mild vote rigging has huge results, and the reddit hivemind can take over quicklyI'm willing to bet it's more about the mentally handicapped thing

but hey i don't know denmark&gt; rolled tacos

is that not just a burrito?why wouldn't you just do outcall at a hotel? i thought that's what people didno one has been telling you not to. you should know how much you charge. whether you actually end up charging for it is different.[Here's](http://www.in.gov/children/files/IC-35-42-4-4.pdf) Indiana's laws on it

&gt; (c) A person who knowingly or intentionally possesses:
 
&gt;(1) a picture;

&gt; (2) a drawing;

&gt; (3) a photograph;

&gt; (4) a negative image;

&gt; (5) undeveloped film;

&gt; (6) a motion picture;

&gt; (7) a videotape;

&gt; (8) a digitized image; or

&gt; (9) any pictorial representation;

&gt; that depicts or describes sexual conduct by a child who the person **knows is less than eighteen (18) years of age or who appears to be less than eighteen (18) years of age**, and
that lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value commits possession of child
pornography, a Level 6 felony.

The legal precedent set for the interpretation of that is whether someone can "reasonably pass for" 18.

Maybe you were doubting the other part of that qualification, which I thought I made clear but may not have: you also have to not know that the subject is specifically under 18. I'm assuming OP doesn't know the women personally since they're anonymous blogs, but yeah even if like your daughter's friend can pass for 18, if you know she's 16 that's illegal.

But if you don't know the subject's age, and they can pass for 18, it's legal to possess. In Indiana at least, and other states have similar qualifiers.No, I have all of it. The factors that cause you to eat more or less are *many* and may or may not be a result of what you eat (you have the option to eat or not eat more or fewer calories, regardless of any cravings)

If you want to get into a result of how fat can affect your appetite, sure. That's fair. But that's not the discussion we're having. I was very specifically referring to the fact that the calories themselves can vary in whether they cause you to lose or gain weight.&gt; Is that established in caselaw somewhere?

Yes, feel free to look it up.

&gt; In fact, the statute says "...or who appears to be less than eighteen (18) years of age."

Six of one half dozen of the other. I'm not sure what you're getting at. The law restricts viewing women who appear to be less than 18 years old. If they don't appear to be less than 18, meaning they appear to be at least 18, then it's legal.yep, you're right but i believe even in hiding scores, reddit still puts higher scoring comments at the top and lower scoring ones at the bottom (and often collapses them)

so a comment at 5 upvotes is going to rocket to the top of a list of comments when all the other are at -5 and potentially collapsed (indicating strong downvotes)Fine, but none of that is inherent to the process of converting 60fps to 24fps. If you want a higher bit rate, shoot with a camera that offers a higher bit rate. If you want a traditional shutter, shoot at 180 degrees. If you want a different shutter angle, change it. There's nothing inherent about converting 60fps to 24fps that damages quality, though there may be limitations in how you specifically shoot it.

And it certainly has nothing to do with the idea that simply removing frames compromises the quality of the image, which is an idea that's been floating through this thread.It was interesting to me too. Though it goes against common belief, I do think it makes a lot of sense. It's pretty much geared for OP's situation, where you're protected if you're looking at women you think are 18, look like they're 18, have no way to know they aren't 18, then somehow find out they're 17 and get your life ruined.

As I said, distribution and production (where *knowing* the women are 18 is a much bigger deal as you're involved in the creation, and are able to find that information out and not mistakenly come across it) have different rules.

Also interesting to note is that there are federal laws for possession if the material crosses state lines, but i'm not sure how that applies to material found on the internet. (federal laws for distribution/creation apply whether the material crosses state lines or not)&gt; You will not find a single camera under 4000 dollars that can shoot at high fps without compromising its data rate.

Budget is not a part of this discussion. If you don't have a camera that can do what you want it to do, then you can't do that thing.

&gt; If you don't mind the fact that your footage will look super choppy, then that's cool.

Nor are the merits of what you set your shutter speed at or its limitations against higher frame rates. If you don't like the shutter speed options at 60fps, then don't shoot at 60fps, that's up to you.

I'm trying to discuss and give information about whether converting 60fps to 24fps damages the image, and whether removing frames damages the image, and for some reason something about merging frames.

Seriously, are you guys playing a joke or something?mine tooIt's starting to appear that way. Major tragedy.All words are invented, but they still have meanings.Probably a good callI agree with what you're saying, I just don't think it's relevant to the discussion I'm trying to have.

If you don't like the shutter speed at 60fps, don't shoot at it. If you don't like the bitrate at 60fps, don't shoot at it (or get a camera that can handle it, there's nothing intrinsic about 60fps that dictates bitrate, it's just relative to what your camera can give you). If you have 60fps and convert to 24fps, you're not going to lose any image quality simply by converting one to the other.

Similarly, if you don't like the shutter speed options at 24fps, shoot at 12fps. I don't think your end result is going to look how most people will want it, but that's not the frame rate's fault. I'm not telling anyone they should or shouldn't shoot at any particular frame rate, that's up to them, but there's no inherent loss of quality (unless your camera can't handle it, but that's True of anything), though there is a difference in aesthetic. Pick whichever aesthetic you like best.

I'm just talking about having footage at one frame rate and converting it to another (which is just strategically dropping frames) not causing any loss in image quality.&gt; This is not helping OP with his original question

You're right. I wasn't responding to OP. I was responding to the guy that said if you have 60fps footage and convert it to 24fps you'll lose image quality. I truly didn't think this conversation would go this far down the rabbit hole.

Other people, you amongst them, adequately answered OP's question.

&gt; The second problem in this specific scenario is that he would in fact be sacrificing a whole lot of image quality if he went the route described above

Again, I agree with you. I think he should get a camera that is capable of shooting at whatever his desired bit rate is at whatever his desired frame rate is, and if he's stuck with a particular camera that could be a problem. But again, irrelevant to the conversation I'm trying to have, is all I'm saying.

There are many potential problems. 60fps will take up more space. It might cause a drop in resolution. It'll cause longer turnaround times. There are plenty of reasons he shouldn't be shooting everything at 60fps (and a few he should be, depending on the situation). That's just not the conversation I'm trying to have, because you and others have covered it. There's nothing intrinsic about 60fps that causes a loss in quality, unless/until you start applying constraints like using a camera that can't give you the bit rate you want or the resolution you want or whatever.honestly i was trying to keep out of it myself, i seemed to just keep digging myself in deeper. i thought i was getting at my point pretty clearly but it seems i wasn't.but do we actually know the plot of the movie? The Assassin's Creed movie is based of Assassin's Creed but is apparently just taking the ideas of it and crafting all new stories. So who knows what the adaptation's going to do story wise.and it's looking like AC is going to be terrible.Yes. This friday.ah hahaha this is my favoriteWe're on marshmallow now? Huh. I'm still on KitKat. Is there any major improvements, or just under the hood stuff?I hear that saying a lot but even where my info/services are being used for profit by the company, i've never felt like a product.

I get something, they get something. Seems fair to me. Why am I the product in that relationship? Why not duolingo, or as is commonly used, facebook or google? They're just as much the "product" as I am.paid translators are going to be a lot better at it than people practicing from duolingo. the people buying translations from duolingo are probably doing it for relatively cheap, knowing it's going to be adequate but not great.well what they do is take many samples, find the most common answer, while tossing out all the rare/uncommon answers. so you can type whatever you want but it'll get chucked, they're not going to directly take your answer and put it into print.it is the *longest* point until the weekend, and people are usually coming off their weekend fun

i'm not a fan of tuesdays myself, mondays are fine because i'm relaxed/refreshed from the weekend but i understand why people hate itit's a great show, but it dips a bit occasionally. it never has a bad run but for the first several years it's solid gold, by the end it's a little hit or miss.If I was working a cash register and someone tried to order in literally anything other than English I would be frustrated to no end. Of course broken English is going to be tough too, but at least we're getting somewhere.

The point, before you all try to correct me, is that these aren't comparable situations.Freshman year of college in NYC, I remember all the southerners who had never seen snow before irl.

"Look, it's snowing."

"No, that's rain."

"Oh.

...


NOW it's snowing!"

"Still rain."

"... Now?"

"Yeah I guess that's technically some light flurries of snow."

"OH ARE WE GONNA HAVE A SNOW DAY?"

"...no."&gt; the pastor can disapprove of the marriage internally within the church

That's called anNoneing it. The word annulment exists outside just the legal definition.

&gt; since they're not a legal matter. 

Nothing involved in this post is a legal matter, as is very often the case with these posts. So the legal advice to OP is don't do anything, because this is not a legal matter. The issue seems to be that everyone *thinks* it is.

e: and don't kid yourself, i'm being downvoted because reddit likes to ride the wave and pile on what's already there.I love doing this, what's annoying is when the person you're with makes you out to be an asshole for not following the rules, so you explain their policy is to check your bags, that doesn't mean you have to let them, and then you're arguing in the middle of a store and it's just easier to go stand in line.I never, ever use the YouTube app. I always find it amusing when my browser asks if I want to use chrome or the app, I choose chrome and click every time. Then it asks me if I'm sure and gives me specific instructions on how to revert it.

Which is all pointless because no matter what it's going to ask again next timeI may be a drain but I am still a profit. They do want my business, they'd just prefer I pay in cash. Joke's on them, I won't be buying at all.what do you think my comment said? because you seem to be replying to something entirely different.and it takes ten minutes to fight with someone who wants to go stand in line. what's your point?fair enoughI think the gaming the system part was when he returned the warranty. The salesman didn't knock the price down so he could get it for cheaper, he did it so the guy could buy the warrantyMy dad loves to tell the story of when he was in school and would go to the local diner. He realized ordering all of the items individually was cheaper than their combined meal. "I'll have coffee, hash browns, an egg, and another egg"

"Okay, two eggs--"

"No no, an egg, then another egg."

That story may sound boring, but imagine hearing it a thousand times growing up. I'm visiting his old school with him this weekend so I'm sure I'll get it a couple dozen more times.Well... what's she interested in?

The problem we have with giving advice is the exact problem you have with picking somewhere: there is *everything* you can do in this city, so it can be overwhelming. If you narrow it down a bit to her interests or what kinds of things she'd enjoy seeing, we can help.

Also, estimated budget would be great.

Until then, I'd just say go see a broadway show, go to one of the museums (I like MoMA and museum of moving image, but you do you) and tourists often like birdland (jazz club). It's not crazy cold so walking the highline or through central park might be fun as wellThis rumor gets tossed around a lot that the bond actors are never allowed to wear tuxedos again.

They're just not allowed to wear them during the course of their Bond contract, *maybe* a short time afterwards, and it obviously only applies to movies they're in.Did it film while he was bond? Was it actually a tuxedo?

E: actually looks like that was probably before they made that clause in the contractsI'm from an hour north of Indy! I know tons of people from Indiana in the industry.

We all moved to new York.If you've read five cinematography books and not one discussed the shutter, you're reading the wrong books.

E: maybe you're reading specialty books. Keep in mind if you're a beginner and looking for general knowledge, it doesn't help to read an entire book on the mechanics of digital sensors. You want a beginner's book for general knowledge.It's two measurements of the same thing. They're not interchangeable but they measure the same thing, in the way that feet and meters aren't interchangeable but they both measure distance.

The shutter angle is the angle of the opening in the shutter. This is useful if you want to keep a consistent angle (usually one eighty degrees) regardless of your frame rate. Shutter speed is the amount of time the shutter is open. So it's basically just the shutter angle after factoring in the frame rate. This is useful because it's an unchanging measurement, good for things like calculating exposure, but also in case you need a particular shutter speed to reduce flicker or somethingImagine the shutter is a circle rotating around the gate, blocking light from hitting the film. It rotates at the same speed as the film moves.

If that circle is open one eighty degrees, then as it rotates around the gate it will let light in half the time the film is there. If your frame rate is 24fps, that means the shutter is letting light in for half that time, eg 1/48 of a second.

You can have your shutter angle be anything, but most common and most aesthetically pleasing is generally accepted to be one eighty degrees.In order of likelihood to solve the problem:

Turn it off and on again

Reconnect your media

Restore from a backup

Start from scratch and learn your lesson about back ups

Good luckSure. But they'd be paying me one hell of a lot of money to do it.

And they'd be paying up front.

E: and let's be clear, there's a difference between despising someone and just not liking them or not agreeing with them. You're absolutely going to find yourself working with people you're not particularly fond of or don't agree with, that's showbiz. Hell, that's probably every biz. But you learn that personal and professional relationships can (and maybe should, to a degree) be separate.Yeah, good analogyI (male) grabbed my sister's cross necklace one day on my way to work as a server in the bible belt.

Easily doubled my tips. Never went to work without it again.that's because that comment is mostly incorrect. you don't tip to keep semen out of your food-- that's just ridiculous.

and you don't tip to hope for good service, you tip *for* good service. this encourages good service, but you should receive good service anyway. in reality, it's more the lack of tipping as retribution for poor service. poor service isn't really that common, but when it is you don't have a lot of recourse-- except, in essence, "docking" their pay. You can call a manager over, but that's not really a good solution, especially in a cab or something.

And if they did an exceptional job, you give a little extra. Or if the job was particularly difficult-- a delivery guy braving a snowstorm and five flights to bring you your food, for instance.

e: and the most important thing to remember is **no one** wants to get rid of tipping except for social justice warriors. waiters don't want to get rid of it because they make way more money than they otherwise would (and make it in cash, but that's a different story), and because they have more control over their wage than just show up, do the job, get paycheck, go home.

managers/employers don't want to get rid of it because, well, it's cheaper for them.

customers don't want to get rid of it because they'll be forced into paying the tip anyway in the form of higher food prices, and they also give up any control over encouragement/retribution for good or bad service.

the only people that actually want to get rid of it are the people crying "I don't want to tip and I shouldn't have to! Just pay them a fair wage!" (completely ignoring the fact that servers *are* guaranteed minimum wage, and with tipping they make well above a fair wage, which you are expected to do and are socially obligated to do by having lower food prices)In that situation, if they don't have a tip jar don't tip. Most credit card machines add a line for tip by rote, and it's unlikely the tip would actually go to the workers anyway-- if they're not tipped positions, the manager would probably just charge the total amount to the card. Free money!

However, normally at a pizza place like that you *would* tip, at least a buck, so it's a little odd they don't have a tip jar. Maybe look around extra hard, it might be hidden somewhere?Amusing, but just in case you're serious, I was clarifying that they're not obligated to not wear tux's outside of movies. So they can still wear one to an awards show or wedding or something.The prices are lower, on the food. The tip isn't part of the price.I think the contract stipulation may have started with brosnanThat's kind of my point. What are you getting at?Not that those aren't useful things to read about, but if you're unaware of the function of the shutter and that it's common to set it to one eighty degrees, I'd classify you as a beginner and recommend beginner books. Sometimes even if you've been shooting for a while there can be holes in your knowledge so it's good to go back and read basics/fundamentals until you're positive you've got it all down.

All the theory in the world doesn't help you if you don't know the basics on how to implement it.

E: in your defense I have noticed there's not many good general knowledge cinematography books out there. My theory is that a) there's not a market for them and b) the people writing them want to sell books, not teach. So you end up with lots of stuff like "The Amazing Framing of Tarantino Movies" and very little "How Do I Expose for Middle Gray?" books. I think you'll have more luck reading beginner's/general knowledge blogs and online articles, where no one's really in it to make a profit, just share what they know.If public opinion on this ever changes, by all means do it. I have faith that we're always going to want a free internet, but this shit keeps coming anyway.Shitty childhoods can definitely fuck you up, sorry about that. But you're an adult now and you get to realize that you are your own person, *you* make your own decisions, and **only you** define how you react to and interact with other people. Not your parents, not your childhood friends, not your childhood experiences. Just you. If you want to not be afraid of people anymore, that's up to you to decide.

I would strongly recommend you see a therapist, they can help a lot in overcoming this kind of thing.that's such a dumb kids joke that has lasted so long.

think about it, a bunch of adult males sitting around the writer's table.

"How do we close this out? What do kids like?"

"They're fucking kids, let's bring in dancing lobsters."

"Why?"

"That's the kind of shit kids like. Dancing lobsters."

"Yeah, alright."If it's an acting subtlety, that's the director. Lucas didn't put it there, and I doubt the 12 parsecs thing was intended to be recognized as this extremely subtle thing-- who in the audience would have even caught that, except if the movie somehow because a cultural phenomenon and nerds still argued over it forty years later?

Nah, in all likelihood lucas just wrote something science fiction-y that didn't hold up to actual science.

I like the explanation as a fan theory, but let's not try to pretend it was there all along.FWIW the entire crew could absolutely know what a parsec is and professionalism dictates (for good reason) they not say anything. It can occasionally make things go awry, but the idea of "you're not the writer, don't do the writer's job" is there for a good reason.

(not to say NO ONE should give advice to ANYONE, but crewmembers on set is neither the time nor the place to go about correcting the script to the director)Also, I don't think threepio even once talks to a cyborg, he's really a human-droid protocol semi-android machine.that is the other fan-theory explanation. they're both solid fan theories; in reality lucas just fucked upthe bounty was massive because of how elusive he was-- good smuggler.

the bounty existed because he dropped the cargo instead of getting found out by the imperials (resulting in not only him getting arrested but likely leading the imperials back to jabba to destroy his whole operation)-- great smuggler.

not everything can go perfectly all the time, it's how you handle the bad situations that defines how good you are. (remember how recently harrison ford got into a plane wreck, and everyone was joking about how bad of a pilot he must have been? by all accounts, any half-decent pilot would have died in that same scenario, it was only because ford was an awesome pilot he made it out alive)not anymore he wasn'tthat's True during the movies, but it's no leap of the imagination that immediately after the second death star, luke would be famous for being the guy who brought down the emperor and vader.

it's possible he could avoid that and lie about what happened, but he's also become pretty public about being a jedi at that point, so it'd be hard to keep all of it a secret.that one poor sap clearly saw the grenade and was the only one to bail

and not even he could make it out in timeimportant to note, since it hasn't been said yet:

they are not buying your testimony, they are paying for your accurate assessment. In other words, you can't pay someone to come in and say whatever you want them to say, that's obviously illegal.

However, they will question you first and if you aren't going to say what they want you to say, they won't pay to bring you in. This *can* lead to the occasional... smudging of the truth in order to ensure you're paid all that money to come in and testify.Sure, and that could and should have fallen on many people. None of them are the crew. The grip's job is to set up the gel frame, not tell George his script sucks.

E: and I do remember many creatives telling George his ideas in the prequels wouldn't work. But he wouldn't listen and didn't have toWhat? I didn't follow that but planting a bug and wearing a wire are two different thingsDunno about cross country, but the way it works across states is whichever state has the stricter rules usually takes precedence. I imagine the same is True of countries.I went to film school. Survived off student loans, gave me enough "protection" from the real world while I built my portfolio. Enough to make a meager living when I got out and built it from there.

Do what you gotta do and don't give up, but I've found it very difficult to hold down any kind of steady job and freelance seriously. It makes for some tough times but that's how it goes. But then, you have different skill sets than I did. There are certainly survival jobs out there that can be conducive to continuing a film career, coding may be one of them.The only reason not to sign for it is if you're planning on dodging the legal system. In general, that's not a very noble reason.You have proof *someone* refused it. That's the whole problem. The same person who is not your intended recipient could refuse the certified mail and ignore the regular letter.As a current cinematographer, I love most of the people I work with. Once you get to a certain level, most (not all) of the people stop being assholes. You have to be really, really good at what you do too be an asshole and keep steady work.Not every place will do that.I think the best way to handle this would be to figure out your relative hourly, when they ask for a price for something simple let them know your hourly and tell them you'll bill any additional work at that rate

And if it ends up being simple either don't charge them for it on the invoice, or charge it and zero it out as a comp

If it adds up, then you're justified in billing for it, and won't be resentful at all the small additional things.There is absolutely no reason for your attitude. The guy runs a church, and while away one of his employees fucked up. Now the guy is offering to complete the religious ceremony by the standard rules that apply to everyone else who gets married there, or offering to annul his part in it.

It's a shitty situation but the pastor is being reasonable as per his religious beliefs. You know, regarding the religious ceremony he performed in a religious place of worship.

E: and I bet every dollar in my pocket that he's not trying to get it anNoneed legally, just his part in it&gt;  If it violated any rules of the church or congregation he wouldn't have done it.

That's obviously not True at all. It's been clearly stated that the ceremony violated many core rules of the church. The replacement screwed up.

&gt; he wants the couple to re-do it at their own expense after they're already legally married.

1) They don't have to legally re-do anything. Religiously, they can re-do it or not

2) They can spend as much or as little on it as they want

3) They can follow the steps to make it official in the church

Those are all options. They're not good options, the replacement definitely screwed up here, but they are options available to the couple to satisfy the needs of the church (which they're allowed to impose) and which you're neglecting.

&gt; they should fight any effort on his part to annul anything out of principle.

They can fight all they want, but the church can annul any religious ceremony it wants, and the pastor has no ability to annul it legally, so there's nothing the couple can do anyway.

e: forcing the church to recognize a marriage that goes against its faith is not only illegal, it's immoral. that's what you're suggesting, and it's pretty fucked up. Bummer that the replacement pastor screwed things up so badly, but that doesn't mean we have to ignore religious tolerance on a technicality. That's not how that works.You're just removing frames. There's no reason you need to compromise the quality of the image.I was trying to wrap up on set once and all the cast and crew were busy taking pictures with the celebrities. So that was annoying.Where/when is the panel?Also sunshine theater and Angelicka play movies in limited release. Saw some great films there I wouldn't have otherwise gotten to seeThe investigation also ruled out road rage (just adding more info for anyone reading)you're not the only family who decided to see a scorsese movie starring leonardo dicaprio on christmas.you're gonna have to narrow it downthe thing i'll always remember about that opening is how many fake intros it had.

river as a kid

nope it was a memory! river being tortured.

nope it was a video! operative reviewing the rescue.

THEN opening credits, and finally we get to the ship.you're mistaken, and if you watch it carefully frame by frame you can spot the cut. if memory serves it's right when they get up the stairs, the camera swings around to face the wall which is where they do the cutyou're not wrong, but it can be a bit embarrassing on the second date. when you forget your best friend's name, he thinks it's funny. when you forget your date's name the second time out, it *suggests* you just weren't paying attention or didn't care very much.you don't have to keep secrets, but no one wants to hear about their new romantic interest's past romances on the first couple dates.

it may come up in conversation or be relevant at some other time, but for a little while it's a topic to be avoided.

ps you should be up front about it before they come hang out, obviously

and also, if they're coming to hang out, you didn't really go your separate ways...are you guys playing a joke on me?You know how when you're drawing or writing or whatever, you can press normally, but you can also press lighter and get lighter drawings/text? Well, that's two sensitivities of pressre. This stylus gives you that, but... way more.that sounds depressing as hell&gt; peeing wherever whenever easily.

you may think that but my public urination tickets say otherwisethe only thing stopping a girl from orgasming is herself

a guy can help her along, or not help her, but he's not the one stopping her

(i'm not putting blame anywhere just letting women know they have it in themselves to achieve orgasm and should seek that out if they want to)bitchy rumors in school are going to get started no matter what you do&gt; It's legal, though, and must be recognized.

Not within the church. The church has every single right to not perform any gay marriages. If the church performs a gay marriage mistakenly, it can discredit the marriage within the church.

The legality has nothing to do with it.It's very unlikely to and would require active deception. I didn't choose gay marriage as the analogy.It's a religious ceremony. I've said this many times.&gt; You realize this convo is all about the legality right?

It isn't. I've stated so very plainly.

&gt; No one cares if the church refuses to recognize the marriage internally after the fact

Apparently the pastor, OP, and everyone heavily downvoting me does.&gt; Shooting at faster frame rate will give less time for each frame, reducing the amount of motion blur per frame. 

So modify the shutter speed if you're not happy with it

&gt; Dropping frames will lose the image "quality" that you would otherwise retain by merging the frames together 

Why would you merge frames together

There is nothing inherent about conforming 60fps to 24fps that requires a quality loss in image.I'm not advocating for any legal remedy, which is often the case with this sub and someone mistakenly thinks they have a legal issue but don't. I refer you back to my declaration that the couple can do anything if the church wants to religiously annul the ceremony within their church, and the pastor can't legally annul it in the eyes of the state, so there's no legal action for anyone here to take.In all fairness if you pick up anything and just assume right away that half the inputs are irrelevant/useless, that's on you.Not much, he's just a little young to be filling many of the roles he has, so he appears to be immature. He's no less mature than others in those rolesYou'll have to check your state laws on possession, if you're wondering for yourself. Most states have some qualifier that possession is legal if the subject can reasonably pass for 18. (Production and distribution are much stricter and are bound by federal laws, not states)

If you're not intentionally seeking out underage subjects, and you can be reasonably sure they appear to be 18, you're probably fine.

But I'm not a lawyer and this is a serious subject, so your best bet is to not take my word for it but stay away from these sites altogether.It's far more likely that OP is mistaken than that the pastor thinks he can annul the ceremony legally.

What's the use in supporting the far more unlikely assumption when a much more likely one is present?

And even if I am incorrect, I've stated plainly that my stance is for the scenario I've stated.

People are going off the rails to bash this guy without understanding what's going on. Do we really think a pastor is threatening to annul a marriage *legally* and have them go somewhere else? That doesn't even make sense. That means the pastor would be lying (about his ability to annul), and mistaken (about his purpose in the ceremony), and nonsensical (since on top of those malicious acts he's still giving them options to confirm their marriage within his church or elsewhere), **and** OP would be mistaken on top of all that.

So, as I've said before, what's actually going on instead of that ridiculous situation that you've apparently all decided is 100% fact is that the pastor is refusing to recognize the religious aspect of the marriage within his own church. That's perfectly legal, OP can do nothing about it, and is absolutely not call for harsh treatment against the pastor.

I thought we all realized the pastor obviously wasn't trying to annul legally. Take a step back and let's think this through.

e: or join the hivemind and the religion bashing by throwing on more waves of downvotes. I'm not religious myself, but I'm not trying to force private religion to conform to my ideas of religion, as many of you seem to want. If the pastor doesn't want to recognize their marriage, he has no obligation to do so.So long as an employer is meeting mandatory minimum wage requirements (and providing any necessary overtime/breaks/etc) they're not breaking any labor wage laws.

The only thing that can save someone like this is an agreement to pay a certain wage for a certain time period. In other words, a contract.

No contract, no deal. The employer can lower his wage all the way down to minimum wage if they want.how dare lawyers charge money for their services they spent years of difficult and expensive schooling to be able to perform

crooks, all of 'emGo over to /r/freelance and tell this story to everyone that tries to justify their working for free.

**Never work for free.**

You won't suddenly become their best friend guy they want to pay all the money to

You are and will always be "the guy that works for free." They're big time now, why would they want an amateur like you? They want a *professional.*

It doesn't matter how good your work is, in their mind you're the guy that works for free and that's it.

You've learned a lesson. Don't work for free and get everything in writing.

No, you have no legal case here. Sorry bud.

(as others have stated you can try contacting the wage board for back pay, but if you don't have anything in writing it'll be difficult to have any progress with that)&gt; He/She wrote into /r/legaladvice.

and while everyone else said "fuck that pastor!"

i'm the only one who said "there's no legal action for either of you to take, and thinking that's what he's referring to is a mistake, you are misunderstanding the situation."&gt; I trusted these people

We've all been there. Try not to make the same mistake again.

&gt; Then, it all fucked up once the CEO had a change of heart.

Of course he did. As I mentioned, you're the guy that works for free. They may have every intention of hiring you at full pay at the beginning, but once they got real money they decided to rethink whether they really wanted *the guy who works for free.* Everything you've said indicates exactly this line of logic.

Remember: Anyone can make promises, almost everyone will reconsider when it's time to write the check.

Anyway, good luck. Sorry you got screwed, but there's probably not much you can do.I flaired it, dude. What are the flairs for if not to tag it?Technically, DLC is any content that is (or can be) downloaded for the game.

An expansion pack is an addition to the main game.

Thus an expansion pack *can* be DLC, however a lot of DLC isn't necessarily an expansion pack.

Traditionally, the terms have just changed based on distribution. Expansion packs were big in the 90's and early 2000's, they were physical media you'd go to the store and buy and install and would add to the main game (we're talking about video game expansion packs here, though the same logic applies to other games like M:TG or board games or whatever). The expansion packs would have a TON of new content, often almost enough to be a new game in itself (not always... but usually).

Then DLC came along, offering some minor additional content. An extra map or two, some extra weapons. Really, this started from the users creating their own additional content and passing it around independently, then the publishers realized they could do the same thing and charge for it.

Eventually DLC just became the standard model, and any additional game content was offered through download. Meaning all expansion packs are now DLC.&gt; Since annulment is a legal procedure

No it isn't. It is a word meaning to dissolve/make it never have happened. That can easily apply to religious ceremonies.&gt; if your house catches on fire, a team of people will come hose it off and rescue you

i feel like it's important i always point this out, even if it's largely irrelevant and inapplicable:

they'll only do that if they feel like it. they're under no obligation to.

that's mind-boggling, but important to remember in a discussion about the benefits we receive in exchange for taxes.&gt; The short version is that not all calories are exactly equal.

All calories are equal as far as weight gain is concerned. If this were a discussion about fat gain/loss, it'd be different.

The answer to OP's question is that it doesn't. The only thing that affects your weight loss is how many calories you consume versus how many calories you expend (including any drug alterations, and for temporary periods how much water/food you're retaining)

e: reddit is really being annoying today. calories out &gt; calories in = weight loss. end of story.If someone offers to pay you what you're owed, I can't see how it's groveling to accept it

but hey man you do youLet's try this a different way. What exactly do you think it is about your situation that makes their advice irrelevant?

Because both myself, the guy above me, and the guy above him think that charing $0 for the service on the invoice is good advice for you.Nope. He was never tried, never convicted.

Mostly due to statute of limitations. Still, while I would never want to be around him, I find it hard to bring myself to definitively declare him guilty when a jury of his peers in a court of law has yet to do so. It kind of sucks everyone else has condemned him so steadfastly.&gt; his new /u/UnidanX[1]  account doesn't seem to post the same way or get acknowledged in the same fashion.

there could be any number of reasons for this

but i'm fairly convinced it's just proof that even very mild vote rigging has huge results, and the reddit hivemind can take over quicklyI'm willing to bet it's more about the mentally handicapped thing

but hey i don't know denmark&gt; rolled tacos

is that not just a burrito?why wouldn't you just do outcall at a hotel? i thought that's what people didno one has been telling you not to. you should know how much you charge. whether you actually end up charging for it is different.[Here's](http://www.in.gov/children/files/IC-35-42-4-4.pdf) Indiana's laws on it

&gt; (c) A person who knowingly or intentionally possesses:
 
&gt;(1) a picture;

&gt; (2) a drawing;

&gt; (3) a photograph;

&gt; (4) a negative image;

&gt; (5) undeveloped film;

&gt; (6) a motion picture;

&gt; (7) a videotape;

&gt; (8) a digitized image; or

&gt; (9) any pictorial representation;

&gt; that depicts or describes sexual conduct by a child who the person **knows is less than eighteen (18) years of age or who appears to be less than eighteen (18) years of age**, and
that lacks serious literary, artistic, political, or scientific value commits possession of child
pornography, a Level 6 felony.

The legal precedent set for the interpretation of that is whether someone can "reasonably pass for" 18.

Maybe you were doubting the other part of that qualification, which I thought I made clear but may not have: you also have to not know that the subject is specifically under 18. I'm assuming OP doesn't know the women personally since they're anonymous blogs, but yeah even if like your daughter's friend can pass for 18, if you know she's 16 that's illegal.

But if you don't know the subject's age, and they can pass for 18, it's legal to possess. In Indiana at least, and other states have similar qualifiers.No, I have all of it. The factors that cause you to eat more or less are *many* and may or may not be a result of what you eat (you have the option to eat or not eat more or fewer calories, regardless of any cravings)

If you want to get into a result of how fat can affect your appetite, sure. That's fair. But that's not the discussion we're having. I was very specifically referring to the fact that the calories themselves can vary in whether they cause you to lose or gain weight.&gt; Is that established in caselaw somewhere?

Yes, feel free to look it up.

&gt; In fact, the statute says "...or who appears to be less than eighteen (18) years of age."

Six of one half dozen of the other. I'm not sure what you're getting at. The law restricts viewing women who appear to be less than 18 years old. If they don't appear to be less than 18, meaning they appear to be at least 18, then it's legal.yep, you're right but i believe even in hiding scores, reddit still puts higher scoring comments at the top and lower scoring ones at the bottom (and often collapses them)

so a comment at 5 upvotes is going to rocket to the top of a list of comments when all the other are at -5 and potentially collapsed (indicating strong downvotes)Fine, but none of that is inherent to the process of converting 60fps to 24fps. If you want a higher bit rate, shoot with a camera that offers a higher bit rate. If you want a traditional shutter, shoot at 180 degrees. If you want a different shutter angle, change it. There's nothing inherent about converting 60fps to 24fps that damages quality, though there may be limitations in how you specifically shoot it.

And it certainly has nothing to do with the idea that simply removing frames compromises the quality of the image, which is an idea that's been floating through this thread.It was interesting to me too. Though it goes against common belief, I do think it makes a lot of sense. It's pretty much geared for OP's situation, where you're protected if you're looking at women you think are 18, look like they're 18, have no way to know they aren't 18, then somehow find out they're 17 and get your life ruined.

As I said, distribution and production (where *knowing* the women are 18 is a much bigger deal as you're involved in the creation, and are able to find that information out and not mistakenly come across it) have different rules.

Also interesting to note is that there are federal laws for possession if the material crosses state lines, but i'm not sure how that applies to material found on the internet. (federal laws for distribution/creation apply whether the material crosses state lines or not)&gt; You will not find a single camera under 4000 dollars that can shoot at high fps without compromising its data rate.

Budget is not a part of this discussion. If you don't have a camera that can do what you want it to do, then you can't do that thing.

&gt; If you don't mind the fact that your footage will look super choppy, then that's cool.

Nor are the merits of what you set your shutter speed at or its limitations against higher frame rates. If you don't like the shutter speed options at 60fps, then don't shoot at 60fps, that's up to you.

I'm trying to discuss and give information about whether converting 60fps to 24fps damages the image, and whether removing frames damages the image, and for some reason something about merging frames.

Seriously, are you guys playing a joke or something?mine tooIt's starting to appear that way. Major tragedy.All words are invented, but they still have meanings.Probably a good callI agree with what you're saying, I just don't think it's relevant to the discussion I'm trying to have.

If you don't like the shutter speed at 60fps, don't shoot at it. If you don't like the bitrate at 60fps, don't shoot at it (or get a camera that can handle it, there's nothing intrinsic about 60fps that dictates bitrate, it's just relative to what your camera can give you). If you have 60fps and convert to 24fps, you're not going to lose any image quality simply by converting one to the other.

Similarly, if you don't like the shutter speed options at 24fps, shoot at 12fps. I don't think your end result is going to look how most people will want it, but that's not the frame rate's fault. I'm not telling anyone they should or shouldn't shoot at any particular frame rate, that's up to them, but there's no inherent loss of quality (unless your camera can't handle it, but that's True of anything), though there is a difference in aesthetic. Pick whichever aesthetic you like best.

I'm just talking about having footage at one frame rate and converting it to another (which is just strategically dropping frames) not causing any loss in image quality.&gt; This is not helping OP with his original question

You're right. I wasn't responding to OP. I was responding to the guy that said if you have 60fps footage and convert it to 24fps you'll lose image quality. I truly didn't think this conversation would go this far down the rabbit hole.

Other people, you amongst them, adequately answered OP's question.

&gt; The second problem in this specific scenario is that he would in fact be sacrificing a whole lot of image quality if he went the route described above

Again, I agree with you. I think he should get a camera that is capable of shooting at whatever his desired bit rate is at whatever his desired frame rate is, and if he's stuck with a particular camera that could be a problem. But again, irrelevant to the conversation I'm trying to have, is all I'm saying.

There are many potential problems. 60fps will take up more space. It might cause a drop in resolution. It'll cause longer turnaround times. There are plenty of reasons he shouldn't be shooting everything at 60fps (and a few he should be, depending on the situation). That's just not the conversation I'm trying to have, because you and others have covered it. There's nothing intrinsic about 60fps that causes a loss in quality, unless/until you start applying constraints like using a camera that can't give you the bit rate you want or the resolution you want or whatever.honestly i was trying to keep out of it myself, i seemed to just keep digging myself in deeper. i thought i was getting at my point pretty clearly but it seems i wasn't.but do we actually know the plot of the movie? The Assassin's Creed movie is based of Assassin's Creed but is apparently just taking the ideas of it and crafting all new stories. So who knows what the adaptation's going to do story wise.and it's looking like AC is going to be terrible.Yes. This friday.ah hahaha this is my favoriteWe're on marshmallow now? Huh. I'm still on KitKat. Is there any major improvements, or just under the hood stuff?I hear that saying a lot but even where my info/services are being used for profit by the company, i've never felt like a product.

I get something, they get something. Seems fair to me. Why am I the product in that relationship? Why not duolingo, or as is commonly used, facebook or google? They're just as much the "product" as I am.paid translators are going to be a lot better at it than people practicing from duolingo. the people buying translations from duolingo are probably doing it for relatively cheap, knowing it's going to be adequate but not great.well what they do is take many samples, find the most common answer, while tossing out all the rare/uncommon answers. so you can type whatever you want but it'll get chucked, they're not going to directly take your answer and put it into print.it is the *longest* point until the weekend, and people are usually coming off their weekend fun

i'm not a fan of tuesdays myself, mondays are fine because i'm relaxed/refreshed from the weekend but i understand why people hate itit's a great show, but it dips a bit occasionally. it never has a bad run but for the first several years it's solid gold, by the end it's a little hit or miss.If I was working a cash register and someone tried to order in literally anything other than English I would be frustrated to no end. Of course broken English is going to be tough too, but at least we're getting somewhere.

The point, before you all try to correct me, is that these aren't comparable situations.Freshman year of college in NYC, I remember all the southerners who had never seen snow before irl.

"Look, it's snowing."

"No, that's rain."

"Oh.

...


NOW it's snowing!"

"Still rain."

"... Now?"

"Yeah I guess that's technically some light flurries of snow."

"OH ARE WE GONNA HAVE A SNOW DAY?"

"...no."&gt; the pastor can disapprove of the marriage internally within the church

That's called anNoneing it. The word annulment exists outside just the legal definition.

&gt; since they're not a legal matter. 

Nothing involved in this post is a legal matter, as is very often the case with these posts. So the legal advice to OP is don't do anything, because this is not a legal matter. The issue seems to be that everyone *thinks* it is.

e: and don't kid yourself, i'm being downvoted because reddit likes to ride the wave and pile on what's already there.I love doing this, what's annoying is when the person you're with makes you out to be an asshole for not following the rules, so you explain their policy is to check your bags, that doesn't mean you have to let them, and then you're arguing in the middle of a store and it's just easier to go stand in line.I never, ever use the YouTube app. I always find it amusing when my browser asks if I want to use chrome or the app, I choose chrome and click every time. Then it asks me if I'm sure and gives me specific instructions on how to revert it.

Which is all pointless because no matter what it's going to ask again next timeI may be a drain but I am still a profit. They do want my business, they'd just prefer I pay in cash. Joke's on them, I won't be buying at all.what do you think my comment said? because you seem to be replying to something entirely different.and it takes ten minutes to fight with someone who wants to go stand in line. what's your point?fair enoughI think the gaming the system part was when he returned the warranty. The salesman didn't knock the price down so he could get it for cheaper, he did it so the guy could buy the warrantyMy dad loves to tell the story of when he was in school and would go to the local diner. He realized ordering all of the items individually was cheaper than their combined meal. "I'll have coffee, hash browns, an egg, and another egg"

"Okay, two eggs--"

"No no, an egg, then another egg."

That story may sound boring, but imagine hearing it a thousand times growing up. I'm visiting his old school with him this weekend so I'm sure I'll get it a couple dozen more times.Well... what's she interested in?

The problem we have with giving advice is the exact problem you have with picking somewhere: there is *everything* you can do in this city, so it can be overwhelming. If you narrow it down a bit to her interests or what kinds of things she'd enjoy seeing, we can help.

Also, estimated budget would be great.

Until then, I'd just say go see a broadway show, go to one of the museums (I like MoMA and museum of moving image, but you do you) and tourists often like birdland (jazz club). It's not crazy cold so walking the highline or through central park might be fun as wellThis rumor gets tossed around a lot that the bond actors are never allowed to wear tuxedos again.

They're just not allowed to wear them during the course of their Bond contract, *maybe* a short time afterwards, and it obviously only applies to movies they're in.Did it film while he was bond? Was it actually a tuxedo?

E: actually looks like that was probably before they made that clause in the contractsI'm from an hour north of Indy! I know tons of people from Indiana in the industry.

We all moved to new York.If you've read five cinematography books and not one discussed the shutter, you're reading the wrong books.

E: maybe you're reading specialty books. Keep in mind if you're a beginner and looking for general knowledge, it doesn't help to read an entire book on the mechanics of digital sensors. You want a beginner's book for general knowledge.It's two measurements of the same thing. They're not interchangeable but they measure the same thing, in the way that feet and meters aren't interchangeable but they both measure distance.

The shutter angle is the angle of the opening in the shutter. This is useful if you want to keep a consistent angle (usually one eighty degrees) regardless of your frame rate. Shutter speed is the amount of time the shutter is open. So it's basically just the shutter angle after factoring in the frame rate. This is useful because it's an unchanging measurement, good for things like calculating exposure, but also in case you need a particular shutter speed to reduce flicker or somethingImagine the shutter is a circle rotating around the gate, blocking light from hitting the film. It rotates at the same speed as the film moves.

If that circle is open one eighty degrees, then as it rotates around the gate it will let light in half the time the film is there. If your frame rate is 24fps, that means the shutter is letting light in for half that time, eg 1/48 of a second.

You can have your shutter angle be anything, but most common and most aesthetically pleasing is generally accepted to be one eighty degrees.In order of likelihood to solve the problem:

Turn it off and on again

Reconnect your media

Restore from a backup

Start from scratch and learn your lesson about back ups

Good luckSure. But they'd be paying me one hell of a lot of money to do it.

And they'd be paying up front.

E: and let's be clear, there's a difference between despising someone and just not liking them or not agreeing with them. You're absolutely going to find yourself working with people you're not particularly fond of or don't agree with, that's showbiz. Hell, that's probably every biz. But you learn that personal and professional relationships can (and maybe should, to a degree) be separate.Yeah, good analogyI (male) grabbed my sister's cross necklace one day on my way to work as a server in the bible belt.

Easily doubled my tips. Never went to work without it again.that's because that comment is mostly incorrect. you don't tip to keep semen out of your food-- that's just ridiculous.

and you don't tip to hope for good service, you tip *for* good service. this encourages good service, but you should receive good service anyway. in reality, it's more the lack of tipping as retribution for poor service. poor service isn't really that common, but when it is you don't have a lot of recourse-- except, in essence, "docking" their pay. You can call a manager over, but that's not really a good solution, especially in a cab or something.

And if they did an exceptional job, you give a little extra. Or if the job was particularly difficult-- a delivery guy braving a snowstorm and five flights to bring you your food, for instance.

e: and the most important thing to remember is **no one** wants to get rid of tipping except for social justice warriors. waiters don't want to get rid of it because they make way more money than they otherwise would (and make it in cash, but that's a different story), and because they have more control over their wage than just show up, do the job, get paycheck, go home.

managers/employers don't want to get rid of it because, well, it's cheaper for them.

customers don't want to get rid of it because they'll be forced into paying the tip anyway in the form of higher food prices, and they also give up any control over encouragement/retribution for good or bad service.

the only people that actually want to get rid of it are the people crying "I don't want to tip and I shouldn't have to! Just pay them a fair wage!" (completely ignoring the fact that servers *are* guaranteed minimum wage, and with tipping they make well above a fair wage, which you are expected to do and are socially obligated to do by having lower food prices)In that situation, if they don't have a tip jar don't tip. Most credit card machines add a line for tip by rote, and it's unlikely the tip would actually go to the workers anyway-- if they're not tipped positions, the manager would probably just charge the total amount to the card. Free money!

However, normally at a pizza place like that you *would* tip, at least a buck, so it's a little odd they don't have a tip jar. Maybe look around extra hard, it might be hidden somewhere?Amusing, but just in case you're serious, I was clarifying that they're not obligated to not wear tux's outside of movies. So they can still wear one to an awards show or wedding or something.The prices are lower, on the food. The tip isn't part of the price.I think the contract stipulation may have started with brosnanThat's kind of my point. What are you getting at?Not that those aren't useful things to read about, but if you're unaware of the function of the shutter and that it's common to set it to one eighty degrees, I'd classify you as a beginner and recommend beginner books. Sometimes even if you've been shooting for a while there can be holes in your knowledge so it's good to go back and read basics/fundamentals until you're positive you've got it all down.

All the theory in the world doesn't help you if you don't know the basics on how to implement it.

E: in your defense I have noticed there's not many good general knowledge cinematography books out there. My theory is that a) there's not a market for them and b) the people writing them want to sell books, not teach. So you end up with lots of stuff like "The Amazing Framing of Tarantino Movies" and very little "How Do I Expose for Middle Gray?" books. I think you'll have more luck reading beginner's/general knowledge blogs and online articles, where no one's really in it to make a profit, just share what they know.If public opinion on this ever changes, by all means do it. I have faith that we're always going to want a free internet, but this shit keeps coming anyway.Shitty childhoods can definitely fuck you up, sorry about that. But you're an adult now and you get to realize that you are your own person, *you* make your own decisions, and **only you** define how you react to and interact with other people. Not your parents, not your childhood friends, not your childhood experiences. Just you. If you want to not be afraid of people anymore, that's up to you to decide.

I would strongly recommend you see a therapist, they can help a lot in overcoming this kind of thing.that's such a dumb kids joke that has lasted so long.

think about it, a bunch of adult males sitting around the writer's table.

"How do we close this out? What do kids like?"

"They're fucking kids, let's bring in dancing lobsters."

"Why?"

"That's the kind of shit kids like. Dancing lobsters."

"Yeah, alright."If it's an acting subtlety, that's the director. Lucas didn't put it there, and I doubt the 12 parsecs thing was intended to be recognized as this extremely subtle thing-- who in the audience would have even caught that, except if the movie somehow because a cultural phenomenon and nerds still argued over it forty years later?

Nah, in all likelihood lucas just wrote something science fiction-y that didn't hold up to actual science.

I like the explanation as a fan theory, but let's not try to pretend it was there all along.FWIW the entire crew could absolutely know what a parsec is and professionalism dictates (for good reason) they not say anything. It can occasionally make things go awry, but the idea of "you're not the writer, don't do the writer's job" is there for a good reason.

(not to say NO ONE should give advice to ANYONE, but crewmembers on set is neither the time nor the place to go about correcting the script to the director)Also, I don't think threepio even once talks to a cyborg, he's really a human-droid protocol semi-android machine.that is the other fan-theory explanation. they're both solid fan theories; in reality lucas just fucked upthe bounty was massive because of how elusive he was-- good smuggler.

the bounty existed because he dropped the cargo instead of getting found out by the imperials (resulting in not only him getting arrested but likely leading the imperials back to jabba to destroy his whole operation)-- great smuggler.

not everything can go perfectly all the time, it's how you handle the bad situations that defines how good you are. (remember how recently harrison ford got into a plane wreck, and everyone was joking about how bad of a pilot he must have been? by all accounts, any half-decent pilot would have died in that same scenario, it was only because ford was an awesome pilot he made it out alive)not anymore he wasn'tthat's True during the movies, but it's no leap of the imagination that immediately after the second death star, luke would be famous for being the guy who brought down the emperor and vader.

it's possible he could avoid that and lie about what happened, but he's also become pretty public about being a jedi at that point, so it'd be hard to keep all of it a secret.that one poor sap clearly saw the grenade and was the only one to bail

and not even he could make it out in timeimportant to note, since it hasn't been said yet:

they are not buying your testimony, they are paying for your accurate assessment. In other words, you can't pay someone to come in and say whatever you want them to say, that's obviously illegal.

However, they will question you first and if you aren't going to say what they want you to say, they won't pay to bring you in. This *can* lead to the occasional... smudging of the truth in order to ensure you're paid all that money to come in and testify.Sure, and that could and should have fallen on many people. None of them are the crew. The grip's job is to set up the gel frame, not tell George his script sucks.

E: and I do remember many creatives telling George his ideas in the prequels wouldn't work. But he wouldn't listen and didn't have toOkay. I think that applies to everything I've mentioned, you're welcome to ignore it if you wishI don't know how signing up for air bnb works, but I know I've stayed in air bnb apartments and never shown an id. Worth checking out.Does that honestly sound more boring than real life to you? In your most boring imagination, you came up with characters who are super heroes of boring jobs. And in our reality, they're just normal people.

Which reality is really more boring?Sure.Well regardless, you're young and have a passion, which is great, but sounds like you're not exposed to the best teaching resources. You're welcome to hit me up anytime you have some questions or want some general knowledge or guidance.

Best of luck and all that.If only someone knowledgeable wrote some articles on some web site, say a professional video coalition, and would like to plug his articles...

Ah well, we can only dream.You are way too deep into Reddit lore. Upvote as always.Fwiw no one in the industry that I've heard of refers to anything as the one eighty degrees rule. Everyone pretty much knows all of that so we don't discuss it that much. Occasionally I'll tell a director "I'm not a fan of this shot because we're crossing the line" but it's understood what we're talking about. In terms of shutter speed, it's never really brought up... Because everyone kind of knows it and knows if we're not doing it it's for a reason.Favorite short? [Successful Alcoholics](https://vimeo.com/16640746). Why is it so good? Well, you watch it and tell me. I don't think anyone can watch that and not think it's a well crafted film.

I'll link in the morning.

E: and by morning I mean mid afternoon because I'm spending all day... Night... Morning? (Film hours) playing video games. I'll link in about twelve hours when I remember to link better than I remember how to shoot down covenant

e2: updated with link. also what the fuck was with that ending of halo 5, are you kidding me with that? that's not an ending.Ignore it, ignore her. Get back to us if she tries to escalate things.

E: don't ignore legal proceedings, of course, but sounds like that won't happenLiterally professionals...Hey bud, that's weird, but normal weird, but it sounds like you might have had some stuff going on irrelevant to that.

I think a therapist could help you out a ton and help you to get over some of your issueswell, keep in mind luke was already the golden boy for destroying the first death star, and a mild celebrity. it'd be like... i dunno, there's no good analogy, but imagine if some unknown got a home run to win the world series one year, and the next year he came back and got home runs to win every game of the world series. you could shift publicity to the other players of the team, but at the point goldenboy is getting the press regardless.then i guess you're all setHe literally caused the death of the galactic emperor and the most feared and brutal man in the galaxy.

E: and though he didn't create a decisive victory by any means, he was kind of a known all star on hothYou won't see much actual improvements of image quality until you're ready to spend some serious money (there's a reason why most productions rent) but you will enjoy the wider aperture capabilityIs your stance that he didn't cause the death of the emperor and Vader, or that he wasn't publicized? If the former, well, we literally watched it happen. If the latter, I've already addressed that.well, or they did and he didn't care. and even if we go with staff, it's still not their job to tell the writer they wrote the wrong word. that'd fall on one of the producers, who probably didn't know or care, or a consultant, which they probably didn't have-- probably, specifically, because in both cases "it's sci-fi mumbo jumbo and the audience isn't going to care," same reason they have explosion sound effects in space.Regarding "unenforceable" clauses in contracts:

I was questioning whether to sign a dodgy contract recently, there was a clause I didn't like and didn't think was legal. I called up my dad (criminal defense attorney) and asked if I signed it, would it be enforceable. My dad said:

"Well, I don't know, but the first thing the judge is going to ask is 'If you didn't agree with the clause, why did you sign the contract?'"

Point being, you may get out of something if you agree to it but later realize how badly it's fucking you up and shouldn't have been legal in the first place

but if you knowingly sign it hoping to skirt it later, the judge won't look favorably on that.as well as a ton of other proof. it's pretty difficult getting a nys id.this haiku sucksI had (well, still have) bladder issues in school. In high school, I also drank a lot of water because I was into fitness.

This meant I had to take a leak about every forty-five minutes. When I asked to go for the second time in any given class period, the teachers would get pissed and say no.

Eventually I just started going anyway-- fuck to all hell anyone that says i'm not allowed to go take a leak when I have to.This seems like a middle school. College kids could probably handle it, maybe most high schoolers, but we're talking little kids man. I could totally see some of them feeling very shamed and embarrassed at this.If your teacher truly said ALL scenes need to use that formula, obviously she's wrong. But she might be referring to a common practice where tighter shots can help convey tension or emotion, and most good scenes will have rising tension then a release, so if that's what you're going for in your shots it would make sense to follow that guideline.

However my personal general rule is to have the shot as tight as it can be while conveying all the information the shot needs.

Unless I decide to do something else.

I guess I don't have a general rule.Explain to him that while you're happy to help him out you feel you're not the best fit for the project and, because you want him to have something he's really happy with it would be best if he finds an editor who's more on the same page and understands his direction.

And stay firm and insistent on that point, keep reiterating that you want to step back for the good of the project, regardless of how strongly he insists he just needs to explain what he wants.

Give him all the files you've worked with so he can take it from there.

This is the polite yet genuine way of quitting.My friend likes to point out half the reason he smokes is because everything everyone told him about why not to do it was a lie:

"It won't make you look cool"

"It makes you look cool as fuck!"

"It makes your breath smell bad"

"Everyone's breath smells bad unless they chew gum or use a mint, which I can do after a cigarette"

"It makes you feel like shit"

"Have you ever smoked a cigarette while drinking coffee or a beer? It's literally better than sex."

"It'll make your teeth and fingernails yellow"

"No more yellow than everyone else's"

If they just straight up said "It'll probably give you cancer and you could die from it," well that's one thing. Instead, you try a cigarette and find out how much of that shit was a total lie, well, what the hell, it could all be lies!man, you know nothing.why is the collar so tight, that's only a v-neck by the strictest of definitionsHow do you go through halloween season and not watch beetlejuice?

time for you to start on a new and fantastic tradition, my friend.i don't remember that part of the songAdult way of handling this:

Hey man, I love Christmas as much as the next guy but listening to all these on a loop is driving me crazy, any chance we can give it a bit of a break?

Awesome-guy way of handling this:

Dude, Christmas music is so rad, but instead of just listening to the same songs on repeat how about I bring in a disc of different Christmas music and we can double up and switch off so we all get to hear more awesome Christmas music?

Pathetic asshole way of handling this:

https://i.imgur.com/LlEluwa.jpg"My god, someone has replaced my christmas cd with a vinyl record! AND SCRATCHED IT!"That is a bitchy thing to say, but those two statements are not analogous. The top is about forcing people to do things they don't want to their own body

The second is about choosing to leave a relationship because of lack of attraction due to what someone else has chosen to do to their body.

It's bitchy, but it's not hypocritical at all.yeah, everyone's just assuming the writer crapped out some shit to make a quick buck, and if he had put some time and effort into it we'd have a great gladiator 2

in reality, the writer (and this is almost a direct quote) knew there was *no way in hell* a gladiator sequel was ever getting made, no matter what, so he just went totally off the rails with it and had fun writing whatever the hell he wanted.&gt; Maximus fought the gods and he was kicked out of the afterlife

...can they do that?FWIW I've read that caffeine has little to no effect on your poop routine, in reality it's the hot/warm liquid that does it. So decaf wouldn't change anything.

e: are you guys for real? It's some helpful information that, if you spend like thirty seconds googling it you'll find is True. I provided a source below.

E: don't believe me if you don't want to, but stop telling me I'm wrong. I've listed several sources if you don't feel like googling it yourself, and I don't care if you still don't believe meso she can build up a tolerance to it? You gotta think this through, man!or he's cheating or they're in an open relationship

but yeah probably just a liarWhy?That's probably psychological.

No one's entirely sure what does it, but [they're pretty certain it's not caffeine](https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/speaking-of-science/wp/2015/08/10/why-does-coffee-make-you-poop/)Double its budget is only borderline profitable, a general rule of thumb is domestically a movie needs to make double its budget to START making a profit


But it probably raked in cash in the home sales marketIt's generally considered a flop, but is probably still a great investment. The film itself probably turned a profit in home release, and they sold a ton of merchandise and comics from itand what's frustrating is long-term, even if you're not on a curve the cheaters are screwing things up.

It's the difference between "Wow, everyone got a B, this test must have been too hard and/or I didn't teach the material properly"

and

"Well, almost everyone got a B but one or two people got A's, I guess the rest just didn't study very hard"

it's minor but it can add up, especially if cheating is just in general kind of acceptedsolid point. if you have the balls to turn someone in, have the balls to actually do it.Ugh. I had a prof once that straight up told the class

"Here's what we're going over today. If you already know the material, feel free to take a nap." It was one of my first classes with the prof so I didn't quite grasp he must have been joking

and I was waaaay beyond the class (fuck required courses and attendance) so, yeah, I pull out a book and start reading.

Prof loses it, calls me out in the middle of class, gives me a huge dressing down and everything. I apologize, put the book away but he just keeps going.

Everyone in the lecture actually had my side, and many came up to my afterwards and told me that was fucked up.

Really, if I'm not paying attention I don't see how that's the professor's issue. I showed up, I filled the mandatory attendance requirement, I did all the homework and aced all the tests... I felt like reading a little Wheel of Time.Yes and no. The prof can kind of grade however he wants (he may be bound by a syllabus if he gave one out), however with enough pissed off students and blatant disregard for respect and decency like this, the dean may well step in.One of the best profs I ever had was like this, he really just wanted to teach and couldn't give a flying fuck about the grading process.&gt; a few days later he made the announcement that he was tenured, and can say whatever he likes to us without fear of being fired.

that's not how tenure works. sounds like the department just didn't feel like dealing with it, which is a pretty big fuck up on their part because it could have lead to some lawsuits. (the lawsuits probably wouldn't have gone anywhere, but it's enough of a concern that the department shouldn't fuck around with it)i had that happen once. i was so pissed. i felt bad for the prof because he never canceled and a genuine emergency came up and that was the legitimately only way he had of contacting the class

i was still pissed.monday/wednesday is where it's at man, you get to start partying on wednesday night.Well, I can give you a similar theme:

Prof did something wrong

I went to the highest person in the department/school I had contact for

They didn't give a shitcool.cool.weirdwell, or adopted.

Ooh! Or one of those parents is a chimera!sure, what other lies have they told you?hell, chances are the mother is convincing herself that it's the other guy's kid. no reason to wreck that for her now.not how it worksgood stuff. trying to lose weight without calorie counting is next to useless.

plenty of people get all riled up when i say that and want to whine about how much weight they've lost without tracking calories

almost always turns out it was just a generic massive decrease in diet that stalled out after a while, or they're "trying" to lose weight and have lost maybe a couple pounds.

if you want to make serious, complete, healthy changes, you *have* to know how many calories you're putting in your body.so?

some guy has anecdotal evidence that he believes caffeine makes him poop more. i've linked to-- and recommended googling-- many *scientific studies* disproving that.

**with science.**

my dad's can tell you his anecdotal evidence that black people are criminals, that doesn't make it a good hypothesis.the "they" was referring to the highest person in the department/school you're able to contact. once they don't give a shit, there's not much you can do.that's cool, but that's still not how it works so it's a pretty bad joke.

i don't think anyone thought you were suggesting the guy would literally have to pay 18 years of child support, but the premise of your joke was incorrect.&gt; It is quite obviously the caffeine.

Oh, okay. Because here all the actual studies disproving it had me convinced otherwise, but I'm glad you're here to clear things up because you really really think it's the caffeine.

e: don't like my source? too lazy to google it on your own?

here are several other sources regarding **actual scientific studies** showing it's not the caffeine

http://www.livescience.com/45465-why-does-coffee-make-you-poop.html

http://www.medicaldaily.com/pulse/coffees-laxative-effect-why-coffee-makes-us-poop-energy-drinks-and-soda-dont-347060

http://www.iflscience.com/health-and-medicine/why-does-coffee-make-you-poop

i'm not even sure why you're so adamant it's the caffeine. obviously soda and energy drinks don't have this stigma and are rarely claimed to cause someone to poop, and do you really expect me to believe you can just *tell* it's the caffeine in coffee instead of the any number of other things in coffee?any time&gt; Dave Chapelle wouldn't be as funny if he wasn't black

well, sure he would. the man is funny. he wouldn't make black *jokes,* obviously, but that doesn't mean he's not funny

comedy is about being funny. context is a part of that. it's not all of it. it's great that this guy could make people laugh, but he wasn't as funny as the title would suggest.well, today's your unlucky day, i guess.

pretty much all studies have confirmed it's not caffeine.

i really don't understand why everyone is so adamant that it *is* the caffeine....I mean, I've listed several sources now, answered your question and recommended googling it, but okay...

No one's entirely sure. They've ruled out caffeine but they don't have enough evidence to give it a definitive answer. They think it's probably the acidity.

Why do you think it's the caffeine? Coffee isn't just caffeine water.Sure, I believe that.Probably psychologicalI've listed like a half dozen sources, don't believe me if you don't want toCoffee, yes, but studies have ruled out caffeine as the causeThat affects urine.If you eat a 1500 calorie steak with a side of mashed potatoes, you've eaten around 2000 calories. If you eat a 1500 calorie steak with a side of cauliflower, you've eaten around 1540 calories.

Add to this that most people aren't eating steak daily, they're eating cheeseburgers and rice dishes and pasta dishes. Without those options, they tend to just eat less in general.KKKK

E: heh, even your source says it's not the caffeineKNot really, anyone can have bad breath. You're buying into the hypeKKWhat? How is it hypocritical? Your own source proved you wrongKKKYes, it is, which has been done many times with scientific rigor to conclude it is not caffeineKRight onThe only way I can imagine them using it is for artistic purposes, like found footage movies or something.

I did have an old lens that had this really slow clicky autofocus that made for some neat looking footage, but I wouldn't use it for anything besides promo spots, no narrative stuffLowel makes some really great cheap beginner lights, that function similarly to professional lights so you can start practicing with them.Just get that twenty dollar pearstone one everyone seems to have, it'll get the job done for beginnersWhat kind of stuff are you doing? The c100 is a great choice for general film making, low budget web stuff and short films, but if you're looking into strictly narrative stuff there may be some other optionsYou can keep saying it, that doesn't make it any more True. Just because you can determine the cause of the bad breath is cigarette smoke doesn't make it more badKDiuretics make you urinate&gt; literally nothing good

Well that isn't True. If it builds, the negatives will outweigh the benefits, but the benefits are that he's happier and having more fun getting through his work day

e: guys, read it again. i didn't say that he should keep drinking or even that it's a good thing. i was pretty clear in my statement.my parents did the same thing-- deciding the simpsons was terrible for kids (not even very young, we're talking 13 or 14) probably because the news said so, and outright banning it without really considering the content or that i watched much harsher stuff

thankfully my parents were also pretty lazy about punishments so they stopped caring after a while"Bastard's finally dead. Cancer got 'im"holy shit you just brought back some memories. scrambling for a pencil and paper when you beat the level, racing to get everything down before the extremely unlikely but in your mind *incredibly imminent* situation of the power going out or the cord getting yanked or something

and that sigh of relief when you've got the last character down

(and the utter frustration when you try to type it in and realize you must have written one down wrong... but which one, and what is it supposed to be?!?)RemindMe! August 6well, in the guy's post that he's replying to, if the parenthetical were in the original statement but still a full sentence it would require a period. in /u/m3rsh's example it only gets the period if it's a standalone parenthetical outside of any other statementsliterally none of that addresses my post in any way

stop trying to convince me alcoholism is bad. **i'm not on the other side of that fight.** i made a very clear statement and you are not responding to it, you're responding to some other statement you think i made.pro-tip: an easier method would be to figure out his laundry schedule and, instead of trying to mentally predict his mood, just figure out when he's on his last day of laundry and what clothes he hasn't worn that cycle&gt; I have no idea why the teachers banned this

It's easy for school faculty/administrators to go on power trips

"The kids are doing something we didn't tell them to do! Let's make sure they don't!"the 5 years thing is ridiculous. either's it's a good thing or a bad thing, it won't inherently change in five years.

i know, by that time all the students will have moved on, but in that case it's just a punishment, which affects people who don't deserve it and is unnecessary and arbitrary. if you want to punish kids there are already ways to do that.Krrststrrrstrrrernrrthis shit isn't even new. the wizard of oz we all know and love was like the ninth one made. they just kept going until they got it right (and then several more times after)k, but do we have to shame men for it? like, all of them, dressing them down preliminarily before they've even done it? how about we just shame the people who do it?

and it's not like women are physically unable to open their legs on the train or take up extra space or anything.i never understood why "you have a dick and balls there, so you keep your legs open" even made sense. how does that... what? do you hang your mouth open cuz you got a tongue in there?&gt;  I wish I heard more stories about film company execs trusting creative talent

this is how we got the prequels.

studio execs actually are really good at their jobs. their job is getting movies to appeal to people. sometimes that means letting the artist do their thing. sometimes it means stepping in and forcing changes.Read through the comments, I've listed more than a fewThere's not a gap if my mouth is closed.Not all smokers smoke insideThere is a place for my junk, too. What the hell is your point?No more than for my tongue. It's a pretty simple analogy, it's weird that you think it's notOf course there is. It's between my legs, just like there's a place between my upper and lower jaw for my tongue. Both are sandwiched n between two other pieces of our body that move out in a v shape. They're the same, and you thinking they're not is ridiculous.George Lucas ruined star warsIt fits as well as a tongue fits in a mouth. There is absolutely no difference.So you think we're all just walking around in excruciating pain crushing our nuts all the time? There's a wealth of knowledge and common sense there showing you otherwise, but you're blindly buying into how you think it works without trying to use a little thinking.Whatever.I was just given extra "advanced" homework. No additional instruction or anything, which I craved, just extra work. I grew to resent that really fast.&gt; If I didn't want to make movies I'd still be enjoying my $600 mortgage instead of my $2000 rent.

I hear ya. It kills me that my two bedroom apartment with rooms that can generously be compared to closets has higher rent than the mortgage on my sister's four bedroom two story house outside Atlanta.

And she has a balcony! And a fire pit!For anyone wondering

No, there is not a single link in this entire post that isn't a rickrollWe just call them redditorsThat's True, it's also incredibly common anywayHe's pointing out the fact that if the guy weren't renting a room with no window, it'd mean he'd have to go homeless.

Which is stretching it, in reality the guy would just have to move somewhere to a shittier living situation, but point being in reality people would rather have the nicer place at a price reduction than complain about the legality of it... Which would really only have the result of them getting kicked outYep, you're absolutely right.As violent and crazy as moshing at metal shows is, I've noticed 99% of the time everyone is really respectful and won't mess with anyone that doesn't want to be a part of it. They're good guys looking to have fun, not actually out to clockwork orange anyone.

It seems to be the younger punk crowds that just try to be the biggest dicks possible1) don't be a dick

2) have fun&gt; He apparently woke up in a bush in that park a few hours later, with the first people walking by him happening to be German tourists speaking fluent German.

Oh man I can totally imagine this going down.

"Where... Am I?"

"Schnitzel nein schadenfreude?"

"Ohhhh fuck that can't be good."Congrats!First of all, him getting arrested has nothing to do with your movie. I was all prepared to come in and make some joke about contacting your bond company, but this happened after shooting? Not only does this not affect you, it's also not really any of your business.

Second of all, if you get riled up every time someone connected to the production has some legal troubles, you're gonna be in for a bad time

And finally, this is a little more nebulous, but it's not really fair to everyone who worked hard on the movie to lock it up just because you're getting paranoid about someone connected to it getting arrested. It's your movie so you have every right to not distribute it if you want, but it's kind of a dick move if that's your reason.Sometimes the director, particularly if they come from a cinematography background, have enough skill, strong enough vision and a great team to pull it off.

Most of the time, from what I've heard and experienced, calling themselves the dp is a little disingenuous because they often just put most of the dp's duties on someone else and take the credit.

But I haven't experienced every set where the director has also been the dp, so take that for what it's worth. I also can't imagine why a director would really want to, besides ego (or pay/budget), because as director they can step in and call shots and light set ups any time they really want to and rest on the dp any time they don't want to... But like I said, I haven't been on every set so I'm sure some people can share some examples where this was the best choice.Studying body language can go a long way towards helping you understand your actors, and making them feel comfortable and trust you... But also helps a ton at identifying problems in scenes. (As well as recognizing chemistry in auditions)

That can also lead to more in depth study of people around you and learning their motivations, which should help your directing in obvious ways (writing too!)That's the one that always gets me. 

"Well shit we're completely trapped in this cave, no way out except... Wait, a pillar has fallen that we can walk up and is the exact distance from the next ledge that we can jump!"

What if it was, like, two feet father? The whole universe is doomed? That is certainly convenient.Remember Sammy JankisAltair never touched water? You're thinking of the wicked witch of the west, dudeYou're telling me the guy never once went for a swim? The desyncing mechanism only kicked in for egregiius, history altering diversions.Awesome. Oktoberfest here I come!&gt; Well, if the director has a very specific idea about what they want, and take a very hands on approach, the DP would wind up just parroting everything that the DP is saying with regard to lighting and shooting

Yes, except as I said the director can still rely on the dp when they want/need to, and have another specialized voice for opinions. If nothing else, the dp can help delegate properly while the director directs. So the only reason not to have one that I can find is money or ego.

I'm sure it works for some people, but I think that's less likely than the other thing.

And there is no need to can your DP just because you want a closed set for a day. That makes no sense.Well, in the context of the game, it isn't.For the most part, you're on the same page as the rest of us. Apparently deadpool franchised himself out and is now riding on the heels of heroes for hire. That's all new.

The stuff about (spoilers) killing his parents is old information, but they also explain it in the issue, as much as you need to know anyway.There's never been qa case of that actually happening. It's a possibility that you're wrongly convicted, but intent is part of sex offense. The problem is they can't just have everyone say "no officer, I was just taking a leak in front of all those kids, and since that's protected I technically didn't do anything illegal."

Instead, we still have to make intentional exposure of any kind illegal, and the system pretty much works the way it's supposed to-- no one goes on a sex offenders list for peeing outside a bar (despite what your roommate's cousin swears almost happened to his friend one time)Dang, must have been dlcYeah but if they're working on a replica of the Joker it either means they support his lunacy... or joker's outsourcing to foreign manufacturersShe's getting overcharged. If it's windowless that means it's illegal and was never intended to be a bedroom, which means there's definitely roommates, muse be pretty shitty and is undoubtedly very small.

There is nowhere in Manhattan where those things will command a $1200 rent.I can find literally no advantage to a director being his own dp in that situation.Sure, why would the director ever not be in that room if he wanted to be?

E: if I can infer a few things from your statements:

The director is never not allowed to be in a room. Any room the camera op is allowed to be in, so is the director. But the director can always watch from video village if he thinks it will make the actor more comfortable. Doesn't have anything to do with whether he's his own dp or not.

If you're advocating for a director being able to operate the camera and not needing a cam op, sure that's great but that has nothing to do with whether a director is his own dp.Well, whatever, but that's higher than similar places would beIt's been a looong time since I studied it so I can't remember specifics to recommend (though I do seem to recall one particularly good book, How to Read a Person Like A Book, although really you should read whatever you can get your hands on)

But it's pretty much impossible to learn much about a person from specific body language signals. The biggest thing I took away was don't try to look for and decipher specific signals... But more just pay attention to body language in general and you'll learn you already know how a person's body language describes their mood, so long as you actually pay attention. If they're leaning forward they're probably interested in what you're saying, if they're facing away from you at a slant they're probably looking for a way out of the conversation, that kind of thing.

But I suppose the good thing about learning some body language basics is you can help manipulate the emotions of an actor in the scene with blocking. If they're not really feeling the chemistry, you might adjust them so they're in a more open stance. If they're supposed to feel a disconnect but it's not reading, you might rehearse or block with a literal object in the way-- another person standing between them, a bottle of ketchup at the dinner table, that kind of thing.

I also studied a lot of language mechanisms as well which help read people. Daniel Carnegie's book was great for that but again you should just try to read everything you can.&gt; an average walmart catches 200 plus people a year

Considering the amount of people I've known to steal from wal mart with ease, I can only assume that literally everyone steals from wal mart and lp just picks random people to catch&gt; In your situation, the winning team will just hold onto the ball for dear life because there is nothing the other team can do.

That is exactly how it works in football and it works fine. If the leading team has possession when game time is less than the time to snap, that team wins.I've been in NYC for eight years and can pretty definitively say your view is probably heavily skewed by culture shock. New Yorkers may cross the street at what seems like crazy times, making close calls right and left but it's all usually pretty safe and calculated. You'll get used to it.

Of course, some times there are idiots, both pedestrians and drivers.I thought it was the black power pose... from the white tigerGet off your high horse you pretentious elitist, and don't pretend you've never heard people brag about petty theft in high school. That doesn't mean I have to like it or pretend those people are my friends but it's naive to say it doesn't existYeah, you're obviously not a new yorker. New yorkers are way less dickish than you.I know I'm like, the only guy, but I really enjoyed the modern day aspect of ac I through iii, and even a bit in iv. I heard they did away with it entirely in unity. Is it back in syndicate and if so, in what capacity?

I never dug ac as just a period piece game, the modern day sci Fi stuff always really brought it together for meI'll always say the biggest shame of the series was that ac3 wasn't completely modern day Desmond utilizing all of the skills he'd learned to fight the templars in Manhattan. Instead we got, at best, mini game esque side levels.Being a Zora in majora's mask (n64) was so fucking awesome. They changed the mechanics for the 3ds portThe combat doesn't have to get complicated, just better. Use the combat system from the arkham games, and ac would be my absolute favorite franchise.There were modern day missions, but there was very little in the way of story. Technically it was there, someone wrote it, but it was all very bland and static.I'm like ninety percent sure they do it for basically free advertising. They'll run promotions like "like us to enter to win a years worth of free ketchup" they get a million likes making it show up on everyone's feeds and have to give someone like ten bottles of ketchup.

Sure you just scroll past it kinda annoyed... But also, you just scrolled past ketchup which reminds you you're kinda running low... (And obviously increases brand awareness)Reality television is great. It's the shitty reality television that needs to go. Ed Sullivan was reality TV. Football is reality TV. But I've had enough of talent contests.Funny, I've always thought a five minute phone call could be avoided by a five second text. Just send me the information and we're done. No greeting, no small talk, no double checking if that works for me or if I'd prefer something else or extraneous information. Just send the info and await a few-character confirmation.Welcome to RedditWhat? Music is always driver's choice. Always.Remember, that's his interpretation/paraphrase of the quote. As with many cases what probably happened is she said something that sounds a lot more rational, but is as illogical as op proposed when you break it down. That doesn't make it better but at least it's more understandable that the person wasn't being so BLATANTLY selfish and irrational.It's based off this old idea that you're not actually committed until you're married, so this is your last chance to be "free" before the shackles of marriage. It's not really intended to be a cheat fest, but scum bags take the "not committed/last day to be free" thing literally.

These days, most normal people just use it as a celebration with their close friends before they get married.If your relationship is flimsy enough to be destroyed by booze and strippers, I'm gonna say it's better to find that out before the weddingAmerican bachelor/bachelorette parties are good harmless fun too, unless someone decides they want to cheat. Which, if they do, is probably going to happen with or without the bachelor/bachelorette partyIf I found out my fiancee cheated on me but I was guaranteed a full, faithful happy marriage... I would still call off the wedding. This whole "don't ruin the marriage" thing is bullshit, the cheater is the one who ruined it.I wouldn't necessarily call what they did cheating, but it certainly sounds like they were straddling that line...May have been thinking no use in stopping it now, the damage is done, just get through the night and tell the daughter tomorrowEh. I stand by what I said. A marriage lasts a long time, if there's a part of you that's going to succumb, at some point that event is going to come up in your life. It doesn't really count if you're only faithful so long as you're not presented with an option otherwiseYeah. I don't even get their reasoning of dropping it so they could make more ac games. They could finish out the trilogy and still make more games, just like they have.Unfortunately I don't see anything illegal about this. Unless the dogs are obviously being mistreated, there's no law saying you can't have dogs around junk.Real talk? Most bars aren't going to have sugar cubes readily available, and quantity (speed) is more important than quality.

At MOST bars. Of course, if you try, you can find the solid ones that are fully stocked and knowledgeable about how to make real, good drinks. But expect to pay a premium...To each their own. I wouldn't be at all happy to hear about it if we hadn't discussed it before, but if that's as far as it went I wouldn't consider it marriage endingWell, they don't.As I said, they're interested in quantity over quality, not to mention that takes up a lot of valuable space for something they will very rarely makeThe problem in my experience isn't that production doesn't know about the allergy, it's that they don't want to go out of their way to make special/expensive food just because one person can't have what they were planning. "Er, vegetarian AND an egg allergy? Well... We'll have pretzels, that's okay right?"

E: obviously this goes away on bigger budget sets. Doesn't make it excusable.Dated someone who licked the back of my teeth every time. So strange.None. It was a stupid ass ending.I'm not even mad.This conversation is going to end up being "if someone performs the actions which create a specific result, that specific result is possible"Technically wind speed could push it as fast or faster than a consistent-speed car (I assume the car's speed would factor in wind to stay consistent)

But that's not likely at all and goes away almost completely if the car speeds upIf this study is accurate, you can't really compare it to history because it will be literally the first time anything like this had ever happened.Depends on the bar, I've known some places to use a 3:1 water:sugar recipe... Or more. That is a hell of a lot of water and a very shitty bar.I'm somehow really enjoying this comic despite itself. If you can get around the constant in-story advertisements for the game it's actually pretty fun.It reminded me a ton of Douglas adams, actuallyWhy is there an egg in her hairWhen you start planning your wedding you'll see how incredibly fast the guest list fills up. It'll surprise you, but it's not just a birthday party, it's a monumental life event. Everyone in your family, for sure, and your spouse's. Then all of the people they're dating. And all their kids. Then all your friends. And all the people they're dating. And your spouse's. Then there's a ton of people who aren't close friends but will be hurt if they're not invited. And it keeps going...

Now, for sure, there are some people out there who for BOTH spouses will add up to maybe thirty or forty people, absolute tops. But that's fairly rare. The big factor is, it's not just you, it's you AND your spouse and if you don't have many people they likely willPersonal theory-- too many people made fake birthdays too often just to see who didn't know when their birthday was (which would be nearly everyone, how many of your casual friends' birthdays would you know off hand-- and would actively doubt if told when it was?) and then they look like an idiot for wishing them a happy birthday on the wrong day

Maybe that's not really a factor at all, but I noticed a period where it was a huge fad, right before Facebook birthdays stopped being a big dealMy best friend was several states away when I turned 21, so HIS brother took me out. They're both pretty cool guys.Well, in America it is, and only if that's the tone the bride/groom are doing.

I have no idea what the deal is in this video (though regardless the groom's reaction seems way too much)You're reading a bit too much into it. Lack of affirmative response doesn't need to be taken seriously, it just can't be taken as an affirmative response. There's no reason (in America at least) they can't all have a laugh and THEN get the affirmative response. And it's not even about really retracting your answer, he could say pretty much anything so long as he eventually gives an affirmative response.Bailing on the ceremony would help a hell of a lot if you wanted an annulment, but yeah the legal side of this verbal confirmation during the ceremony isn't such a big deal. In the US at least.I think even in states where that's the case, some people intentionally wait to sign the final official forms until the ceremonyI actually thought a lot of the jokes were great. There were several duds, as there always are, but his first sketch of a perfect America was greatI gave it a 50/50 shot Trump would have the whole audience stand up and say it in unison just to call the guy's bluffI was told once that emergency responders will first check your phone for ICE, which stands for In Case of Emergency.

So I was very confused why you thought anyone should be calling my motherYou can't lock people up for things they might have done&gt; This way you can see the light..... and nothing else.

At least I'll know you'll find my placeFrom previous threads, it'll make a difference if your house is on the way to others whether they'll stop at your place first or on the way back. Which could be significant.

But otherwise, most (*most*) drivers won't just sit around in their car for an extra twenty minutes just because you tip poorly. They'll just think you're an asshole.Given the context, it's more likely she was just repeating what she'd been taught.

Nice to see she's being taught healthy attitudes about sex thoughIt's harder to see small people.

The witness said the car wasn't speeding and had the right of way. Visibility is a pretty damn big deal in that situation. If you're hard to see, be careful on the road.It's comics, man. Nothing ever really changes for long and no one stays dead.I actually really like the massive cross over events... In theory. My problem with them (and especially with civil war) is no one ever seems to be on the same page and details keep changing.

Take civil war. What was the registration act? You can't tell me because it changed issue to issue, writer to writer. Depending on which side the writer wanted you to be on, the registration act either meant you divulge all of your information and literally become an employee of the government following their orders, or it meant you tell them you exist so they can be aware of you and that's it (I swear, sometimes telling your secret identity wasn't even a requirement. Literally just "I am a super hero who exists, k?). And everywhere in between.

It's impossible to choose a side because both sides were totally reasonable or insane, depending.

This is super common through all company crossovers, and makes it really hard to get behind them. Secret wars was no better, with the details changing issue to issue which made it incredibly difficult for me to wrap my head around it. But at least with secret wars I could just blame inconsistencies on incomprehensible magic (the doctor who explanation)I'm a huge fan of the clone saga so I love pointing this out-- it didn't crash and burn, people LOVED it, but marvel wanted to end it a lot more quickly than was planned and the tail end was super rushed and shoddy, which is what people actually hated, and now everyone just remembers hating the whole thing.Sure, but that's kind of their problem. Getting stuff spoiled sucks, but you can't come onto a comic forum and get pissed at a ten year old event that made national news.Hey, you guys hear Sony's making a new Spider-Man movie? Spoiler alert but Spider-Man is Peter Parker. I know some of you may not have been around when amazing fantasy fifteen hit the stands, so it's only fair I give you spoiler warnings since there's a new movie coming out about it.Everyone bitching about how spoiler tagging is so easy... Well, I hate spoilers so I stay away from anything tagged... If we're going to start tagging ten year old events, I'm going to miss out on a hell of a lot of content for no reasonI'm not even close to victim blaming. I'm just pointing out you don't know the details, and visibility is a major factor here.... There was a witness cited in the article who's probably going to come as close to answering those questions as we're gonna get.

Respectively,

No

The car

NoI don't think Bucky's going to die, but keep in mind just because he's "signed on for" more movies doesn't mean they have to use him. Signed on for more movies usually just means if marvel wants to use him in more movies, he can't say no/renegotiate his payThat is a drawing. What you're asking is similar to asking how to make a flute sound like a guitar. As others have said, if you want it to look like a drawing, at some point you're gonna have to draw.The benefits of a higher end camera are many, but they come with a hefty price tag. You are unlikely to see much benefit from any camera you'd receive on the budget of a Christmas gift. If you're happy with the camera you're using now, and it's accomplishing your goals, you don't need to spend money just for the sake of it anyway.

Besides, a major test for whether you should upgrade your camera is knowing why you need the upgrade. Asking us is cheating.Right on, happy shootingThat's a bingo!I didn't say both sides skewed it in their favor. I said the actual, literal details changed.your story's starting to break down, pal.

no one who's been here for more than a few months keeps the east/west prefix on streets

and no one would refer to a single club on 14th as famous. there's like twenty clubs that are famous, and of course there are a few near union square (which is what people would say)We get the data as factual information, and it keeps changing.

And the same characters keep changing it.

If you genuinely think what we're reading is just spin, you didn't read enough of it to understand it.Nope, but my money is on him causing jane foster's cancer (unintentionally, a la dr. manhattan)That "color" is essentially a shitty camera hitting the limits of what it can record. In real life there would be a noticeable difference between her and the background, you wouldn't have an issue at all seeing her. But the camera can only record light to a certain point before the photo sites are completely saturated and it reads as completely white no matter how much more light comes in.

Does that make sense?They're way, way behind. Like, months.

e: /u/ancientworldnow is the guy you wanna talk to about it, but i think there's a long list he's working onQuestion: why are you guys all preceding your questions with declarations that they're questions?because he caused the illness and likely eventual death of someone he loved. his very existence is unworthy, which is why a human was the one who was worthy

i'm sure there's more to it than that as well, but i'm betting that's the basis of itFair enough, it just hasn't happened in this threads before and seems to have spontaneously sproutedI just want to say that is a very interesting spelling of fluctuation you got thereUnless they're very experienced, your end time will not include break down or data dump. When they say you're done, what they mean is the actors are done.I would love it if this sub just did a general "don't share your own work" rule. I know there are a few times it's good or useful, but on the whole it would clean up the sub a lot. There are other places to show your work.

That said it's not that difficult to just skip past all the videos, since they're all flairedDoes anyone have experience with this plastic Chinese DSLR accessory on eBay for twenty bucks?that's because this is a sub for discussion, not an education site, and it's impossible to put years of training into a single article. which makes all the "which camera should i buy?" questions a little annoying.&gt; I don't think its possible to create a free and public forum where only professionals go to talk about filmmaking at a high level,

fwiw i've found cml to maintain high-quality professional-only discussions. i've since stopped paying attention to it because my e-mail would get flooded with hundreds of messages a day, but back then i never said anything simply because i knew the discussions were way over my head. i just read and learned from everyone else.

ps i'm sure he'll see it before long, but you misspelled the page for /u/instantpancake&gt; There are very few places to post reels and get feedback, and based on the quality of "reel" I'm seeing here a lot of people need help not just building them but understanding what they are for.

the problems i have with this are:

there are individual subs for every position on set, so it'd be more useful and appropriate to post to those subs for whatever role you had or are asking about. i know some of the smaller subs don't get a lot of attention but i'll still occasionally pop in to give advice for reels on the cinematography forum

and, this point i know doesn't apply to everyone, but i'm so tired of giving advice like "your vid's a bit underexposed" and hearing excuses: "yeah we didn't have enough light and our lens broke so we had to borrow a kit lens that couldn't open enough and blah blah blah." plenty of people can take criticism well, but the overwhelming majority can't and i'd rather just toss it as a general rule for this sub and leave the smaller subs for criticism

also, i never saw your post about the learning opportunity (not that i'd have taken you up on it, i'm across the country-- but it indicates it maybe didn't get a lot of exposure here) but keep in mind while it's interesting to you that the pros showed up to learn about it-- the pros can afford to show up and learn about it, and that's a worthwhile investment for them. it's very difficult for a lot of the younger guys to take off work to come in and learn about a camera they may never touch, as it will be outdated before they get to a place where they'll be working on projects with the budget for it. and this sub does skew heavily towards younger people.&gt; -I used to see 100 messages a day, now we're down to 5-15

interesting to hear, i dropped cml specifically because i was overwhelmed with the hundred+ messages a day. i may go back and sign up again.GOODright, and i'm saying, i think the sidebar does an adequate job of addressing the question. i think people just don't buy it/believe it and want to hear the same information from actual people instead of a pre-written article.

but i also think that's their problem and have no issue with disallowing "what camera should i buy?" questions-- except maybe for very specific instances, but that gets tricky to moderate so i think it'd be beneficial to the sub overall to just nix them and have people go to the sidebarI posted a bit of a rant recently as someone who was hiring a cam op and seeing a lot of mistakes from people

but what it comes down to is, if i want a sound designer i want a sound designer, not a lighting tech. i want someone who has done sound design, and only sound design, for years, and have a passion for it, and reads sound design books and articles in their spare time and participates in sound design conversations with other sound designers.

in other words, if i'm paying a professional rate, i want a professional, someone who is skilled and experienced and does that job for a living, not just someone who knows the job.

if you don't want professional rates, then you can probably attract newbies with super low budgets who think it's neat that you know lots of different jobs. but that won't get you very far in the industry.and as a starting point, it's fine to take those gigs as educational experiences. but they're not professional, you shouldn't be charging professional rates, and you won't get very far doing it. i'm not even convinced you should be charging at all for coming on as a learning experience. if you want to get paid, you have to do the job. if you want to do the job, you have to know how to do the job-- not be there to learn about it. (of course, we're all learning throughout our careers, but that doesn't mean we need to learn how to do the job, just learn different/better ways of doing it)&gt; I'm just saying it wouldn't hurt if one has more than one profession, which is beneficial for employment.

Well, I think most professionals would agree that it's usually pretty damaging. Most of us are going to look at your credits list, and if we see vastly different jobs that will indicate you're not very good at any of them and likely don't have much experience in the industry&gt; most people have the same skill set as mine and the company won't consider me

then you need to get more experience, skill and talent and/or be better than them (or at least a better fit). or apply at a different company. if the problem is "the company is hiring better people than me," the solution isn't "apply for a different job."

Not in this industry, anyway.can't think of any gig opportunities for ya but hit me up when you're here and i'll grab a drink with you. have you spent much time here?doesn't count when they take six months off to do a bunch of elseworld talesi think they never had an answer for that onein this case? absolutely not.

we can get into the whole work for free or don't work for free thing... but if *anyone* is making promises like that they're full of shit. anyone asking for your time for free should be upfront and honest about it, not trying to convince you you're being compensated by getting into a network of future work.&gt; It's probably just as easy to give people readings in stops, though.

this is how i've always done it, it's interesting to hear you do it in fc as to me that just seems like adding an additional step. i really only use fc when i'm checking out new lights i haven't worked with before.Um... I guess you can think of it that way? Now that you mention it I have no idea what happens to photons that hit a saturated photosite.Get her that coffee mug that is a replica of a lens.I completely agree with what you're saying, if you were doing it on the east coast and I was available I'd certainly have been there, but I do think it's tough for the younger guys to make that investment sometimes. When I was in school I went to every learning opportunity I could find, sometimes skipping class for them (learned way more than I did in intro to film anyway), but shortly after school every day had to be bringing in money or finding work.

 And it is an investment, as you said while it may not be directly applicable it's a fantastic learning experience

And I do understand you're not asking for work, and it sucks that that's the response you got

I'm just not surprised that it was established pros who showed upYeah the cold here sucks, but you're just in time for Christmas season which is amazing in this city.Maybe, but you'll get far more than a $50 jump in quality by spending that extra $50 if that makes senseI've always been curious as to how you guys handle a high dynamic range. Like someone whispers, then yells in excitement then back to a whisper. Are you just constantly riding the levels, and if so doesn't that affect background noise/static?You're not going to get perfectly smooth shots without spending some money, but for my taste if it's supposed to be the cart's pov a little cart wobble will feel natural. Kind of like how you can tell when interior car shots are on a stage because there's zero camera shake, feels unnatural

PS you can look into renting a glidecam for a day if you want, but I have no idea how you'd mount it inside the cart. Maybe get a plate of it and comp it in?Friends and family typically, there's not many investors I've run into interested in investing on micro budget stuff like that.

Also the actual dollars raised may be far less and they'll convince local businesses to donate either just out of the kindness of their hearts or for advertising/publicity. I've even shot a quick web promo for a business in exchange for using their location for a dayI use Google services for almost everything, even if it's not the best software. It's just so damn convenient to share or access anywhere.Gather up every cent you can spare. Every single dollar you have to put towards a lens. Literally get all of it and put it in front of you.

Now get a shoebox and put all that money in there. Get a note card, tape it to the box and write "lens rentals" on it.

Anytime you need a decent lens, take the money out of that box and go rent it. Canon's ef line is more than adequate for small day to day freelance stuff, and anything requiring better glass is going to need more than you'll realistically be able to afford (and make a profit on) by purchasing.&gt; the writers were just sloppy and/or wanted different things

Yeah. That's what I'm saying. If there was a conscious effort to present it as obfuscated, fine, but that's pretty clearly not the case. The writers just interpreted it however they wanted.Thanks man, that was an awesome explanation! I'm going to hang on to that and show it to producers everytime they ask why we can't just hire their college friend with a zoom for $200... I'm not sure why you're linking me this?He was what came out of the UFO in area 51

Case closedProblem is, he was being condescending to me for having friends like that

When I never indicated they were my friends. He was just being elitist, we've all known people who have stolen from wal mart and hopefully we all think they're scumbags.Reminding myself to comment in the morning. Hey you guys I won trivia tonight and have the belt to prove it. Literally, we got a belt and it is mine now. It's a Celine Dion belt. And it is mine.

Anyway, I'm throw my opinion at ya tomorrow.Build a fire

Put your actors around itRoll on down to the courthouse and file for small claims. It's way easier than people think it is. It'll take a while to get anything done, but it'll get done....this is literally-- *literally*-- the first time i've seen anyone argue against curing cancerthat is absolutely 100% not True.oh my god, stop. that's not how any of this works.&gt; But instead of warming up the white balance or printing a different light, I might employ a soft 1/4 CTO or Amber gel on the lamp.

i suspect that's the purpose of the dimmer. that's how i often make "fire," anyway.your imaging technicians very likely will get paid for extra work or rush jobs. and it's not common to finish a movie just before it releases-- it happens occasionally, but not often. of course, you only hear about it when it happens, because no one tells fun anecdotes about a movie finishing ahead of schedule.Hey man, cool article, it really sounds like you've learned a lot. But if you don't mind I have a bit of advice. This doesn't really apply to low budget fun shoots with your friends, but since this is an article about learning and best practices, I'd like to offer some things.

First... Don't dine with your cast/crew. At least not all the time. I know my explanation is going to sound like a ton of nonsense, but I've been on both sides of it so I'm talking from experience.

Filmmaking is fun. And you're often working with your friends. It's easy to get into it and feel like everyone's hanging out and having a good time, and forget... As director/producer, you're their boss. They're your employees.

They need and deserve a break from their boss, whether they know it or not, and lunch time is theirs. To goof off, to relax, to blow off steam and bitch. That last part is important-- they will, and should bitch, and you should expect it and not be fazed by it. It's natural and in my opinion necessary.

There are exceptions for sure. Maybe you all want to have Friday meal together, or breakfast, or whatever. Totally cool.

Not a big deal when you're making fun shorts with your friends. But when you get to ten, twenty, thirty day schedules... Your cast and crew deserve a little time together, away from the boss.

Secondly, using crew as extras. Don't do it. That's not what they're there for, and you're disrespecting them and devaluing their skills by asking. And the only reason to do it is because YOU screwed up not getting the proper people there.

And look, I know sometimes you gotta do what you gotta do. I've been thrown in front of the camera so many times I'm pretty sure I'm sag eligible. But you need to recognize it's a favor and not one to be asked lightly. It's not something you should plan for. Emergencies happen, busses break down, confirmed people flake. We all get that. But recognize your crew can't be looked at as extra bodies because they're not doing anything.

Again, when we're talking shooting for fun with your friends, especially when filmmaking is new and being IN THE MOVIE! is an exciting prospect... No big deal. But when you start working with professional crews, you're going to get some flak if you say "oh turns out we don't have any extras today, can you jump in?"

Anyway, just some thoughts about things that jumped out to me about your article. I'm sure many others will have very different opinions, so take it as it is.

Congrats on finishing your film, and best of luck.edited the OP, but here are my thoughts on why it's not as great as it could be:

Most of the articles seem to be fluff pieces, explaining to me that the cinematographer used color to set the mood, or framed someone so they looked small to set the tone.

Okay, that's fine, but... that's just what cinematography *is.* It's just explaining the job. Which is interesting as a film enthusiast, but it doesn't help me grow at all as a cinematographer.

If you want to learn something about cinematography, push your craft and expand your abilities, American Cinematographer Magazine doesn't have much to offer (in my opinion). Go read whatever article Art wrote at provideo coalition this week (hell, read 'em all). Go to the dvxforums and ask charles papert a question. Go find some interviews that include lighting plans and explanations for why and how they had to do that the way they did-- bonus points if it includes a challenge that had to be overcome. Read cinematography blogs.

It's not a bad magazine. Hand me one, and I'll browse through it on the train. But I don't think it's the great cinematography resource many others do. It's interesting, but it's not a "learning resource."

anyway, that's just my take on it.edited my op to expand a bit on my thoughtsNormally, I wouldn't suggest storyboarding unless it's either required by a higher-up or a complicated shot/sequence. But let's since everyone's new to filmmaking i can see how it would be potentially a benefit.

Okay, so for the purposes you outlined I would suggest that the basic function you're going for is to describe to others what's in your head.

Given that, I would say black and white is just fine, no need to do more work than necessary, they'll understand your shot just as easily in b&amp;w as in color.

Drawing every shot... well, that's up to you. As I said earlier, I think it's unnecessary and I would prefer a shotlist (or even a floorplan!) unless it's a complicated shot or communication will be difficult. But then, I understand what the terms in a shotlist are going to translate to visually. You tell me you want a medium-close-up, I know what you're going for. You tell me you want to track on the face while pulling back to a full body wide shot, I know what you want.

Your students may not be there, but then the question becomes-- do you want to do it as a learning experience (and think it will be helpful?) or for the good of the production. If it's for the good of the production, then talk to your DP/operator and see if he thinks it's necessary. No one else really needs to be involved with them.

If it's as a learning experience, well, do what you do.

Improving your drawing: it's great to have a fully realistic drawing, but all people really need are stick figures. All the information you really need to communicate is:

What angle

What height

What subject image size

and maaaaybe any important elements besides the subject that need to be in frame (if your subject is looking at a picture frame and you want the picture frame kissing the top of the frame, you need to draw that)

That can all be accomplished with basic stick figures.

What I've done that helped a lot is just basic circles for the head, but drawing the direction of the nose is super important. Just a basic triangle will do.

And remember, you can make notes on the storyboards to help describe anything you need.


Oh, and yeah, four to six per page is a good rate.

Good luck!Tough situation, man.

So here's the thing:

They're your clients, and you're obligated to give them the product they want.

Here's the problem:

They may not know what they want. It's great when the client recognizes you're the professional and are more skilled at crafting a music video than they are, but that doesn't always happen.

And... you need to recognize that they're better at marketing their band than you are.

The ultimate goal of a music video is not to tell a good or interesting story. It's to market a band. And if they've decided they want to do that by featuring themselves in the video more, you need to understand that your desire for an artistic vision isn't more important than marketing their band.

Here's how I would handle the situation you're in.

I would sit them down and explain to them everything you've told us. Figure out exactly why it's so important to you to follow your vision, and do your best to convince them why that's better than what they want to do.

If they're unwilling to budge, and you're unwilling to budge, I would tell them that unfortunately you don't feel you're the best person to give them the video they want, and offer to step down (and help find a suitable replacement).

This sounds like a polite way of telling them to fuck off, but it isn't: it's the genuine truth. You sound like you're not willing to compromise on your vision to the degree they need, so you're truly not going to be able to deliver them the product they want with creative integrity. Let them find someone who is and wish them good luck.

But really, I think you should recognize that sometimes you need to make sacrifices and compromise. You say you are, but it doesn't *sound* like you are-- at least not as much as is needed.&gt; What would be the process for finding a house to shoot an ultra low budget short in?

google houses for rent, ask your colleagues for places they've used, or-- yep, drive around and find a place you like and ask them if you can pay them (**very well**) to shoot in their house.

i guess craigslist might be an option? i dunno, never tried it.i can't think of any reason you would need sync sound recording for isolated exhaust audio.

can you elaborate?gonna have to narrow down where you're living more than thatIt's hard for me to sympathize when they're actively bullying kids, making threats using a vastly superior amount of money and legal team, and just outright lying.

If they want to ask him to knock it off and he doesn't, fine-- they can do that.

But that isn't really what happened, is it?&gt;  that's very rarely how multi-billion dollar companies operate.

that's exactly how they operate, what are you talking about? getting tons of bad press means they back away *very* quickly, especially when continuing will do more damage than letting it go.The mk II started the revolution but couldn't do 23.97 at first, but the major interest pushed canon to include it on the 7d, which really made shooting movies on dslr's a thing. Canon eventually released a firmware update allowing the mk II to go 23.97, (also it may have been magic lantern, not canon, that gave it the capability first)

Short history lesson for ya which is neat because it's one of the only history lessons I can give from experience.Let's say an airplane can hold fifty people. 

25 people from California want to go directly to Denver. 

25 people from California want to go to Nashville and don't care if there are layovers. 

And 25 people from Denver want to go directly to Nashville.

Now, the airline could send one plane half-full from California to Denver, one plane half-full from California to Nashville, and one plane half-full from Denver to Nashville. Three planes total.

Or...

They can send one plane from California to Denver, and one plane from Denver to Nashville. Those 25 californians going to Nashville can fill up the extra space on each plane, and the airline gets to send two planes full up instead of three planes half-full.

Because the people with the layover aren't getting a direct flight, they're not going to want to pay as much. It's still better for the airline to charge them less and fill up their planes, rather than have them decide the layover isn't worth full price and take another method of transportation.

But the people on the direct flights really want to go directly there, so the airline can charge them more and they'll pay it.

So you could be on the same flight as someone else, and be paying 2/3 what the guy sitting next to you is.

What it all comes down to is, the prices the airline charge isn't based on how much it costs them to get you somewhere. It's based on how much the people are willing to pay. If people will pay more for a direct flight, the airline will charge them more. If people will pay less for a connecting flight, the airline will charge them less-- better than having them use a different airline (or take a bus/train/drive).but that doesn't sound like a micro budget short to me, it sounds like a well-funded short.

i don't know how iatse classifies their budgets for short films though. or if they even make a distinction.
&gt; Is that what you're saying?

No. That is what the logic of the above poster is saying. I am saying that that is really stupid logic.

I think the only way to consent to get pregnant, is to consent to get pregnant. Everything else is just varying degrees of non-consent, but the above poster pulled it to a binary state-- implicit consent by creating an atmosphere where a pregnancy is possible, or non-consent by not providing an opportunity for pregnancy 

and I was explaining how that is a poor logical stance.No, I didn't. I specifically said that the logic the above poster used which would necessarily lead to that conclusion was *bad logic.*

I don't know why everyone keeps thinking I'm endorsing rape. I think I was pretty clear when I said "that logic doesn't hold up."i think you may be extremely surprised at the state many colleges' sex/rape education is in.that was amazingYou've got to put your emotions aside and let your rational thinking take over.

You've got know *know* that no one likes their own work-- everyone is their own biggest critic. It's okay to never be satisfied with what you make. In fact, it's a good thing.

It'll make you strive to improve. But you're going to end up in a dark place if you just keep rewatching what you made and thinking about what you could have done better, how much you don't like it, etc. Work on a project, do the absolute best you can, learn as much as you can, then finish it and let it go.i think you got confused in the comment chain

the explanation for the tux one is donaghy is suggesting that only classless people *don't* wear tux's after work-- indicating, as usual, his status and wealth has removed him so far from common people he doesn't understand what's normal and what's not-- he thinks the things high society does (or do for the sake of the joke) is what everyone doesBecause of the other thing you find in small towns:

Everyone's plan for how they're going to get out of the small town.

Everyone has a plan that they're totally going to do any day now-- when they have enough money saved up, or when they remember to take that test they need, or when they get around to going back to school-- for how they're going to get out of the small town.

But then they get promoted in their shitty job to a shittier job with slightly more money and a small amount of power

They get comfortable

They get old

And they give up.

Almost no one *really wants* to stay in a small town, in a shitty job (there aren't any others). They just fall into it and get complacent.

e: whoops, I pissed off some townies!my thought too, as soon as the "whore slut" thing came outwhat kind of shitty-ass coworkers do you have that wouldn't cover your table in that situation?

(also who brings a date to their ex's restaurant?)5-7 exercises a day

3-5 sets

5-10 reps

As Chris said, why can't you do it in neutral? Why do you need to do it at the same time that you're filming?Call up your superior and ask.

If no one has any specific instructions, plain black t shirt and dark jeans. Comfortable shoes.lift more

eat more

look into the svunt shake

what lifts are you doing, what's your progression been like, what's your diet look like, what's your weight change look like?

three months isn't a long time, but you should still be starting to get some noticeable changes, especially with noob gains&gt; The big deal about it is the fact that the producer doesn't own the copyrights to his songs if he uses pirated software.

...what?yeah i've never got this "no one will notice you" thing.

no, yeah, i definitely see you over there on the bench press. i absolutely see you in the squat rack. i know you're over there with the curl bar. you're not invisible, i can and do see you.

i just don't care about you at all, i'm there for me.Why? One of us isn't understanding the other.You desperately need an editor

And please stop spamming articles that... Did you just transcribe someone else's podcast? Weak.You can tell them to stop. You can revoke permission to search your vehicle any time.

Fun fact, you can also limit how they search your vehicle. You have every right to say "you're free to check the car except don't look in or remove the seats"To be fair, she did indicate she wanted you to stop, then you ignored that and said you'll just go homeIn NY, it's common that the camera will roll on their own when everyone is ready.

I strongly prefer a verbal cue though, so I always request one. In fact if I can get away with it I prefer a verbal check and confirmation first, just to make sure I'm actually readyIt's common these days on digital, especially because many camera these days will record a scratch trackSpoiler alert:

He's not really in it until seven or eight episodes in, before that he's more of a shadowy figure type deal"SON DO YOU MIND IF I TELL EVERYONE ABOUT YOUR ORANGE DICK JACKING OFF STORY?!"I've honestly never understood it, it's gross. Use tissues you can throw away afterwards, not clothes.Runpee.

As a frequent bathroom goer, changed movies for me. It has a built in timer, tells you when to start it ("when the universal logo comes up " or something similar) then buzzes when you're at a time that's good for a bathroom break.

Also gives you a short synopsis of what you missed while you were out that you can read on the way to the bathroomI've noticed, with a lot of people, it's more like "clean when it gets dirty"

the "clean as you go" or "put shit back" concept never entered their minds. Once a week or once a month or whatever, they go around and clean everything.

In that time, things just "naturally" get dirty/cluttered.

That's their thinking, anyway. It bugs the hell out of me (us) when there's that disconnect, because no, things don't have to just naturally get dirty/cluttered and need to be cleaned every month. You could just clean up after yourself.honestly it's just a total change in mindset. pointing out specifics, like "throw the bread bag away" won't do much help, I think. They need to get it in their mind to clean up after themselves-- you use something, you put it back. You finish something, you throw it away. You spill something, you wipe it up.

The thing should be clean, and if you caused it to not be clean, go clean it.WE DO NOT HAVE A GARBAGE DISPOSAL WHY THE FUCK IS THERE FOOD CLOGGING THE DRAIN ARE YOU AWARE OF OUR LACK OF GARBAGE DISPOSAL HOW DID YOU THINK THIS WAS GOING TO END?I am 100% convinced this isn't caused by parents cleaning up after them

but rather parents having the same habits, so they never recognized it as not normal. Leaving shit out is just how people live. To them, anyway.well you *can't* put the knife in the sink

what if you want another sandwich?!no thanks, i'll passugh i have the same issue, but just one roommate (he's bad enough to do all the damage himself)

i don't go into the living room anymore

i've stopped cooking

i'm basically living in a studio the size of a bedroom, ALL of my EVERYTHING is in here because anytime it's not it gets destroyed. No matter what it is.

I do get a reprieve, I convinced him to hire a maid every month (I'm sure, in his mind, to clean up after us-- I haven't broached the topic that he's paying for the maid because it's to clean up *after him,* but I wouldn't be surprised if it comes up one day) so for two or three days i actually get to live in my apartment again

for the first six months i just spent two or three hours every day cleaning up after him. finally i gave up because, as much as i *love* clean apartments i'm just not his maid.i did that with my roommate

now our apartment is just a shithole.Wait, push ups or press ups?

Also pics or it didn't happen

Seriously congrats but show us some pics!*sigh* yeah I knowI know your pain buddy, I could say the exact same thing...

Except change out girlfriend for parents.

I have no idea how he managed to ever get a girl stay in that apartment, let alone his living room. I would always just take women immediately to my bedroom, explain the situation and apologize. But him... I don't understand it.

Although I did once witness a woman freaking out, run out of his bedroom saying "I can't, this is disgusting." And hightail it out of there.

He halfheartedly started cleaning.The phrase "life saving surgery" is often a misnomer. A more accurate phrase would be "*potentially* life saving surgery, but also potentially lethal"

And there you go.

Also religious stuff.I agree with /u/novawreck

It is absolutely vital that you learn avid to be a professional editor...

Eventually.

Right now, premiere pro is going to get you more work and experience. When you're ready, you'll be able to easily afford avid on your own, and by then you'll be able to easily transfer skillsets from one program to another. Switching is mostly learning about different key strokes and a few technical differences.

It will do you very little good as a learning resource right now.

Instead, ask for a new video game or something. Maybe a nice night stand. Can't go wrong with a new pair of shoes.At the very beginner level, yes. You're looking at jobs from people that know nothing about filmmaking, don't want to waste time with and don't understand viewing a portfolio, and just want to see something "hot."

These jobs suck and pay shit, but they're somewhere to start.

As you progress, or if you manage to bypass this step, competent producers will care less about a "hot reel" and more about talent and substance.

Most middling level producers may take a quick glance at your reel to see if it was shot on a sony handycam or a professional camera with a professional crew(this is done to weed out the amateurs), then move on to your portfolio.

Most higher level producers will just assume you're not only experienced with amateurs (they'll know this because your connections will have endorsed you) and will be more interested in your credits and portfolio.There is plenty of great software that can recover almost all footage, assuming you didn't record over it.

None of them are free.

There's a few options for recovering footage that you did record over. None of it is guaranteed and it's all very, very expensive.do we really need to allege that that's a board room and a window?

i think we can all stipulate that that is, in fact a board room, and that is, in fact, a window.why? that's a proper use of the term.

the above poster is suggesting that, rather than look like an idiot for his mistake, he lean into it and pretend it was done on purpose. Even though the reasoning for having done it on purpose may not make sense, the fact that it was done on purpose would indeed be saving face over having been proven wrong about his knowledge.i always forget i have this installed until i double-click something accidentallySo write something corny. Nothing wrong with that.

But the truth is coming up with an idea is the easy part. It's all about the execution. Some of the best movies ever have been very simple ideas, and some of the worst have been great ideas.Except he didn't say some people mistake him for condescending, he realized he actually was condescending once someone pointed it outyou either have too many "and"'s or too few.my thoughts too, far too distinct to be a coincidenceWell, as you and others have stated, the L is actually really reliable, comparatively.

It's just that when there's a problem, there's a HUGE problem. There's no "I guess I'll walk to the other train" or "It's skipping a downtown stop"

when the L has a problem, everyone is *fucked*...so they're not really eliminating tipping, just whether or not you have a choice in it.

which is, by the way, the end result of eliminating tipping anywayNow I'd like to see a restaurant do it that actually has to have competitive prices

and which doesn't already pay servers high hourly rates

this is a neat thing for them to do but it's absolutely not indicative of other restaurants or waiting tables in general, at all.i'm just going to add to this for anyone else reading:

very good pipes can handle these, at least for a while

*this means that many women go for years thinking tampons are flushable and completely wreck other pipe systems when they move or leave their parents' house for the first time*

just assume no tampons are flushable anywhereget a trashcan that has a pedal thing&gt; Although I am still kinda grossed out by the whole thing

you should work on becoming less sensitive to it

i recognize that sounds like i'm saying you're wrong or need to grow up or whatever

not at all. i just have a bit of advice that might come in handy. i used to be the same way. i wouldn't freak out over it or anything but i thought it was kinda gross.

i eventually just got over it, and lemme tell you, sometimes accidents happen with women. and it can be embarrassing for them. if you can show them, genuinely, that you understand it's an uncontrollable bodily function, it's just fluid, and that *you don't think it's gross*

their admiration and respect for you will *greatly* rise. especially if previous boyfriends have been the opposite.happy cakeday bruhDude I'm not going to say that's an attractive picture of you, but you absolutely have it in you to be hot.

I'm sure you're crazy inundated with replies but you need to do this:

Different haircut. Definitely. Try styling it differently, try a different kind of gel. Get it cut shorter or grow it out but what you got DOES NOT work for you.

Fashion sense:

First things first, everything looks good on a good body. Go to the gym. Just fucking do it. I don't want to be mean but you are pear shaped. You don't need to be insanely buff benching three plates but you will look SO much better if your upper body is bigger than your midsection.

Second things second, if you can not figure out good clothes to wear, plain black or gray t shirt and jeans. Plain black or gray sweat shirt if it's cold out.

And facial hair. Something. Try a trimmed beard or goatee. Mix things up.Costco really does have everythingYour complaint was about needing to lift the lid.this causes a lot of people problems with paternity (and even maternity) tests. it's actually really good you already know.hey guys i hear /u/dickslap tosses salad

there's my good deed for the dayit's not "mated"?that's a bullshit excuse to not explain yourself.

no one's saying the kid will calmly and rationally accept that explanation. but that doesn't mean you can't at least explain, and maybe they'll recognize later, or as they grow up, how it was the better option. they may reject your explanation and you can enforce your stance anyway, but don't just not explain yourself. that's a shitty precedent to set.rolls, my friend.well i don't want to fingerpaint with it but if an accident happens i'm not gonna flip out and get disgusted and make her clean it up while i leave the room or whatever (i'm happy to go get the spray and help clean up if necessary). 

that's demeaning, but it's a common reaction.&gt; Also, diamonds are worthless.

...

like pretty much everything, diamonds are worth the value we give them.

&gt; The value is made by your want of it

uh, yeah. i mean, you might as well be saying Amazing Fantasy #15 is worthless-- it's just ink and paper and I got tons of that.
&gt; I am always shocked to see any restaurant that has a B or lower as their rating.

If you're talking about NYC, it's pretty much arbitrary. Major corruption aside, the difference in health grades are basically whatever the health inspector notices-- did he notice five rats or six? did he notice the raw meat was on the same counter (that wasn't washed) as salads were made on? that kind of thing.

Almost all restaurants are or can be extremely disgusting. Accept that if it doesn't make you sick, you shouldn't think about it.no, what you do with it can be gross. if you honestly just think that it *existing* is gross, you'd do well to get over it.and his investment is worth less (unless he plans on dying in that house)well, though, i can't get behind putting an age restriction on it. what's way better is some basic test, checking to see how informed you are of basic facts.

although that is a *very* slippery slope in who chooses what's on the test... and what the right answers are.If it makes you uncomfortable, I guess that's one thing

but look-- it's not like you did it on purpose. In my mind it's not that different from spilling your drink, and if I spill my drink I'd appreciate you grabbing some paper towels for me or whatever.

But whatever, if you want to do it on your own, just say so and that's fine-- what I'm mostly speaking out against are the guys who actually get grossed out by it and makes the person feel worse, unnecessarily. "Ugh, gross, this is so gross, I need to go shower, ugh, why didn't you say something if you were still on/about to start your period?" etc.Hm. Interesting. I'll be curious to see what happens with this.

I've always been ambivalent with these issues, and this could be great or troubling.

On the one hand, gender equality, absolutely. Hire the best person for the job, don't discriminate against women.

On the other hand... hire the best person for the job. Don't hire less talented women over more talented men just because you'll get extra recognition for it (and don't give extra recognition for hiring worse crewmembers just because of their gender).Well, wouldn't it at least be alright if I handed you a tissue? I'm not seeing the difference.Download times are going to be horrible from our film studio on the moon.&gt; No.

Yes. I can, and it's happened before. If it's by accident in some way that's uncontrollable. You just go clean it up like an adult, no reason to make the other person feel awful because of something they couldn't control, and you're too immature to handle it. If your SO pukes on the rug because they got food poisoning, and they literally can't get out of bed, you put some gloves on and go clean it up. You don't tell them how gross they are and they're going to have to lay there next to it until they can get up and clean it themselves because it's too gross for you.

But if they get hammered and puke on your shirt at the bar, *that's* gross.

(this isn't a directly analogy for menstruation, obviously, but it's for bodily fluids in general)

&gt; Don't try and tell me they're not gross; they are quite literally hazardous to your health.

Gross and hazardous are not the same thing.

Also, go wash your hands afterwards you numbskull.also it could have just been a turn of phrase to more thoroughly describe their attitude.depends on what you want. there's no real steals out there or anything-- everything costs what it costs because it has or doesn't have things other neighborhoods do/don't.you think a thirty second commercial takes two hours to film?it takes significantly longer than that.i'd be curious to see which laws that would fall under, as it's my understanding that legal tender is legal to pay any debt.

maybe something about intentional harassment or whatnot?&gt; I think it takes between a full day and weeks depending on the shots and location availability, the logistics behind crew and equipment, and budget. That's not counting the months spent conceptualizing and approving, the consultations with the video production companies (at the rate of hundreds of dollars an hour) and the time spent negotiating for air time.

[I am aware.](https://www.reddit.com/r/videos/comments/3v7dga/nick_offerman_silently_drinking_whisky_by_a/cxl7o43)wait so what the fuck do you do when you try to pay a debt if your creditor is like "nah we don't want that. we only accept the face value of extremely rare collector's coins"

oh wait here we go, from your source:

&gt; However, legal tender is the default method of payment assumed in contractual agreements involving debts and payments for goods or services unless otherwise specified.

So they actually do have to accept it, unless before hand they say they won't. (but from the above post it sounds like there may be state laws that come into play)I know.Actually, another poster said the same thing so I did some digging--

you're mostly wrong. Someone has to take legal tender unless they specifically said they required a separate form of payment before hand.

That's a federal law, however there may be states laws which can modify which legal tender they're allowed to refuse.

The trope part that you're talking about is that someone *can* choose to receive payment in any method they want. They just can't spring it on you after the fact.hahaha people in this thread are getting so fucking pissed at anyone saying anything bad about the movie and going in strong with downvotes.

i dunno, that's a pretty valid living situation for a lot of people. it's not like he was a bum who snuck onto a rowboat. well, not necessarily anyway. sounds like it was a houseboat or at least had full amenities and the guy was paying rent for it.

hell i bet it was more spacious than my apartment.

probably just wasn't meant to be tied up in the bay or op didn't know what he was doing when he took it out there.&gt; Legal tender is the default unless specified elsewhere

that is what i said

&gt; but that doesn't mean they have to accept pennies.

that is also what i said.

i'm not twisting anything.doesn't surprise me, i don't *think* any judge would rule that unreasonable-- they're still accepting the currency.

and also, like i said, there may be other laws which modify what currency they're allowed to accept/refuse, and how.No. And I don't know any who are. It's essentially a management position-- and a collaborative one. I'm sure there are many out there who do it, but I'd find it extremely difficult to do the job and be shy.

But I wouldn't worry. Once you gain some confidence and work your way up you'll probably feel much better about working with others.can't say i'm not sad to see bookstores go under-- especially locally owned ones--

but hey man, that's how technology works. old models give way to new ones.Eat? Around 1200-1500 calories/day.

Drink? Dunno, but there sure was a lot more peppermint schnapps in that bottle yesterday...I was gonna be an actor

I was gonna be a star

I was gonna shake my ass

On the hood of whitesnake's carThose can be valuable research resources. I work in the arts and can imagine picking one up if I were writing a movie about anti-semites. If I were writing a scholarly paper on the subject that kind of book store is the first place I'd look for that kind of thing.You're missing my point. If I want to understand the motivation these people had, I need first hand material.

And if I'm writing a scholarly paper, I'm absolutely going to need to know the kinds of things these people actually said-- from a first hand source.Exactly what I was thinking. If I were working on this I would recommend lighting/grip and set design for the morning, break for lunch, then shoot the thing after.

And that's on a full budget. They could probably knock this out in a half day if they really wanted to.Holy hell are you stubborn and closed minded.&gt; Their buyer chose and stocked and sold books about how the Jews planned 9/11.

And if I were writing a movie or novel or play about anti-semite 9/11 conspiracists, that is exactly the kind of thing i'd need to read.Not to diminish your input, but there's nothing regarding the law in that statement. It's entirely possible the reason you were allowed to do it was because no one challenged you on it. I'm just curious about the actual laws.

And anyway, I'm not really saying I think you *do* need to accept currency, I'm just curious as to what the state laws say about what you do and don't need to accept.&gt; The internet is full of it.

"The internet" is not a legitimate source.

&gt; it wasn't meant for researchers

Let's go at this a different way. If I were to be researching 9/11 anti-semite conspiracists, what resources do you think I should use? Do you know how actual research works?

&gt; just like the back room of a video store wasn't for "research."

Oh, my mistake, I didn't understand you were saying they had an entire room devoted just to anti-semite materials.when does surge pricing happen? i'm gathering it's some type of premium thing when demand is really high, but is it like every day at rush hour? or like once a month after a particularly big sporting event or something?Well, we're not talking about low-budget one-man-band arri-kit commercials, we're talking fully-funded with legitimate client thirty-second ads.&gt; The silly whole idea that a hateful conspiracy book in a bookstore is innocently meant for academic researchers is listening to hoof beats and saying "zebra"

So no, you don't understand how actual research works.

&gt; Yes it's possible to write papers using sources that are available online.

I get it-- you don't understand how research works. You don't have to keep confirming that.

&gt; you would be doing a terrible job in a very anachronistic way if you went to a bookstore instead of looking for it online where by far the richest material and most of the intellectual (such as it is) discourse on this subject is happening

Every academic who reads this is going to laugh heartily at your understanding of how to research for a paper.

That's it, I've said all I can say.happy cakeday bruhit certainly didn't diminish my fears that:

jesse eisenberg is too young to play lex luthor in this movie

gal gadot is not physically intimidating enough to play wonder woman in this movie

and that batsuit is going to look stupid as hellMy first reaction was legitimately

"Oh they brought back Abomina--

wait a second"Batman *would* win because he's Batman.

Superman says it himself-- "If I wanted it, you'd be dead." He doesn't want it.

He could blink and squish Batman into the dirt if he wanted to, but he doesn't, and that gives Batman the opportunity to be Batman.

Batman v. Zod? Different story.&gt; Batman would never want to kill Superman either.

You're right but that's not my point. Everyone's argument for why Superman would win is that he could kill batman before batman has a chance to do anything. You give him a chance and he might have a trick up his sleeve.

Since Superman doesn't want to kill batman, he has to be more subtle (and would maybe even want to talk first). Batman would use this opportunity to pull out whatever trick he has.https://xkcd.com/538/It's not non existent, we just haven't seen it yet.

Batman wouldn't win in a fight against Superman's powers, the whole point is that Superman would allow batman the opportunity to remove his powers.Where in the actual hell are you getting your information about what you can and can't record from?&gt; Of course the guy has the right to not show his ID

No he does not. (laws of identification depend on the state)

&gt; he does have the right to refuse these things

No he does not. You are mistaken in what you are/aren't allowed to do under cop's instructions. Some of it depends on the state, but in most cases:

You do have to identify yourself

If you wish to remain silent you have to vocally express that

The police are allowed to do things like pat you down if they have a reason to, or detain you with reason. This necessitates commands you have to cooperate with-- like "Please step out of the vehicle."

You are not required to consent to a search, but you can not *prevent* a search.

Things like that.

So, I'm not going to argue against your view that people should remain courteous when talking to the police, but I am going to argue with your reasoning-- the people you're describing are breaking the law. Do not break the law. Know your rights.

**NOT** just what some liberal website says are your rights. Your *actual* rights.&gt; First is that if we expect sex ed to move in this direction, then wouldn't it only make it more likely for people to see abortion as a bad thing?

I can't possibly see why. It sounds like you're assuming "no abortion" is the *right* decision, so being better educated will lead people to that decision.

In reality, being more educated on *sex* has nothing to do with your stance on *abortion.* It will, however, lead to fewer abortions as people are more aware of how to have safe sex.and they will renegotiate their contracts to scale against the minimum wage increase

thus everybody retains their purchasing power but the dollar is worth less.

the problem is that people see the actual dollar as inherently valuable. instead, they should look at a dollar as a piece of paper representing the worth of their skills. if someone's skills haven't increased, the value of their skills haven't increased, and regardless of what's on the piece of paper, it won't be worth any more.hey aren't you that dude who tonguepunches fartboxes?&gt; Next thing I know I am waking up to General Petraus giving me my purple heart.

that is a convenient time to wake upboth of those sources are telling *you* what *you* are allowed to do-- not what's legally permitted.the term "nifty fifty" refers to a very specific cheap, plastic 50mm prime lens made by canon. it's possible nikon co-opted the term for their 50mm (but far more likely that people just mistakenly started referring to it that way)

it certainly does not refer to any prime 50mm lensThose contracts only get **you** sued. You, in your very specific situation which does not apply to anyone else. What's the point in arguing for your own unique position?

I find it more likely you just misunderstood the difference between legality and policy and don't want to admit it.c3p0 was always looking out for people and, though he didn't have a lot of courage he just wanted everyone to stay safe. he was more of a scaredy cat.

jar jar was just a coward. until he was inexplicably not a coward for no reason."But that's the whole *pooooint.*"

The whole point was for me to hate every second of that book? Then good job, you have succeeded in making me hate it.it doesn't have to be one or the other&gt;  The day I run into the back of that person will be a bad day for them.

No, it will be a bad day for you. Most (all?) states have a blanket rule that if you rear-end someone, except in extremely rare situations, you're the cause of the accident. You're supposed to have left enough space between you and the car ahead of you that even if they slam on the brakes, you can still stop in time.

Of course that's utterly absurd, but that's the law.If the people telling you this are telling you this without having *seen* you without make-up

they're total moronsno, that is not rape by modern definitions.

i know i'm fighting an uphill battle, but *someone's* got to be the one to say that that's not what rape is.

and extremely misguided, over-protective college rape-ed classes don't count as defining rape.are you fucking kidding me&gt;  like she doesn't need to be more aware of her body?

holy fucking hell, you think that's why period accidents happen? because women need to be more aware of their own body?

that is seriously fucked up.i dunno man. what happened to you seems pretty shitty, but if OP already paid for his game, specifically to receive it on time, and over a month later still doesn't have it, he gets a little more leeway than the person you're describing.I'm a cinematographer, and I once had a promo gig out of town. The producer hired a local cam op without consulting me, and he refused to take direction from me. The producer kept undermining me when the cam op would say "let's do it like this" and I'd say "no we need to do it like that." The producer would say "let's try both and see what we like."

It's not that the guy's ideas were bad or wrong, you just can't have two people doing the same job. We wasted a ton of time and energy before I had to go to the producer about how it was a problem. He said "well on other film sets you'd have to learn to cooperate."

I said "no, on other film sets I would have fired him by now."

I think that was an education for the producer. To his credit, he recognized the issue, spoke with the cam op and we didn't have a problem.I don't know what happened either, but I'm just pointing out the two stories aren't analogous.

Maybe OP's friend was a dick, maybe not, but the situation wasn't the same as what the above poster was describing, so it feels a little irrelevant and off-point to bring it up.This was not an issue of overselling/understocking. The situation you were in and the situation GAME was in are very different. I'm not saying OP's friend wasn't a dick, I don't know, but your story was an example of someone being completely irrational and unjustifiably getting angry (and also being a dick). In OP's case, he was totally justified in being annoyed or pissed off. That doesn't give him the right to be an asshole to anyone, but it does mean that what happened to him is different from what happened to you.Anything that costs a fraction of what the professionals use. You're not getting a good deal, you're just getting a piece of crap that won't give you results and will break.

I have more admiration for people who go diy to learn/for fun than people who spend a hundred bucks on a knock off light kit.&gt; LEDs: They render terrible skin tones, aren't as flexible as their tungsten and HMI counterparts, and often have less light, flicker.

That's just for bad LED's though. Higher end LEDs can actually be great to work with in some circumstances.

Part of the problem, as I understand it, is the manufacturing process inherently makes a few good bulbs and a whole bunch of bad ones. The bad ones are picked out and sold cheap. You're basically getting the natty ice of LEDs when you cheap out.Dealing with the same thing. It can be annoying but I've found some good practices are:

Keep on top of your recording time and get an alert when you're about to run out. At about eight or nine minutes in start looking for a good place to pause.

Don't make a big deal about it. Have the slate ready to go, say "let's go ahead and pause there while we make a quick camera adjustment (guys go ahead and cut)" and pop off the next one. Doesn't need to take more than twenty seconds.

Use two cameras, and if they're both dslr's stagger when you cut each, so if you get into a tense moment where you don't want to cut you can end one and restart, then a minute later end the other and restart, then tail slate them both. If I sense this moment I just give my op the roll again signal and we silently keep going.

It's annoying but you can mitigate the headaches.That kind of sounds more like user error dude. It's not a professional piece of equipment, but it is a piece of equipment that's more valuable than its price tag. You need to be aware of its limitations, and that means paying attention to the power situation.

It sucks you lost your recording, but it sounds like if someone had said "hey this thing chews through batteries, let's keep an eye on it" you would've been fine.I think that's kind of the whole thing with the black magic cams. You can get some high quality stuff there from a cheap price tag, but you're going to spend a lot of time doing it.

I almost always prefer to put that time somewhere else, but that's a personal decision.In most professional settings, a DSLR *can't* "get the job done."

There's a lot more to it than just image.

They can work in a lot of settings though, it totally depends on the project.Single overhead light with a skirt.

Basically, you're going to rig up some kind of tungsten light-- if it were me I'd prefer something directional to get the table a little hot with some hard shadows on the people surrounding and let the light bounce from the table to add in a little fill underneath

but the far cheaper and easier route would be a china lantern taped to the ceiling, which would be a ~~little~~ lot softer but still get pretty close to the mood you're looking for at a fraction of the cost/effort

then skirt it-- get some black cloth or something and string it up around the light making a sort of skirt. This will keep the light from spilling onto the walls and make sure it just goes straight down.

From what you've described I am 90% sure this is the look you're going for. However, there are many, many ways to light this scene, so you should think about what you actually want visually and think about how you need to position lights to get yourself there.

If you've got the time and resources, that would be the main set-up and I'd just use a few smaller directional lights as needed, for kickers or some highlights somewhere or whatever. If you're not super experienced with that kind of thing just skip it and go with the single overhead source.How much crew do you have? How vital is it you purchase rather than rent? Will you need to be lighting these interviews, and if so in what kind of setting?Yeah, but in jokes timing is important. This would have been much funnier, to me at least, if there was even a five minute delay.

Even knowing it still was planned, the delay would have helped sell the humor.

Still amusing though.Yeesh. You're asking for a lot out of $5k, especially (I'm assuming) you don't have any audio gear either.

You gotta get a bigger budget, dude, or get them to relax a little bit on using the gear you already own.

Camera-wise I can't think of much you can do on $5k that'll get you something significantly better than your t5i-- particularly something that'll work with green screen, and still leave room for lights and audio.&gt; You don't think upping to an Canon 7D would help?

Over your t5i? Not much. 

[as you can see](http://www.imaging-resource.com/cameras/canon/7d/vs/canon/t5i/) the advantages of the 7d over the cheaper canon dslr's are few and mostly stills or convenience based.

And more importantly, i think the company is going to be kicking themselves after a while when they realize their 7d is falling even further behind and with a bit more money they could have had something with a bit more longevity, instead of just needing to upgrade again in six months to a year.

But hey, you know the company and the needs better than I do, so sure, if you think a 7d will get the job done, cheap $200 tripod, along with a zoom h4n, let's say rode ntg-2, and lowel three-light kit, then go that route. you'll bring it in in under $5k. don't forget lenses, batteries, cards, card reader, cables, cords, etc.

i just think you'll find that the quality isn't as good as even many amateurs are able to come up with, and-- this is my personal opinion-- can often even damage the company's reputation when people see what low quality they're putting out. It's going to *appear* to your audience as though you just set up an old sony handicam or whatever and pressed record. but, again, i don't know the company, or the purpose of the videos, or the clientele. if $5k is all you have, and you absolutely have to purchase all new gear with it for a complete shooting package, then that's what you have to do. a dslr/zoom h4n combo isn't the end of the world, it's just very limiting for the kind of work you're trying to achieve.

if i were in your situation, i would strongly urge them to reconsider their plan. push them towards rentals, or towards buying *one* piece of nice equipment and then renting the rest until they have refilled their budget to buy a *second* piece of nice equipment, or hire out to people with their own gear, or let you use your gear while they accumulate more money in the purchasing budget.Good call, I love seeing this kind of creative work.

It's also how I know I'm not fit to be a gaffer and really appreciate the good ones.It's the best worst thing you will ever do.Battery powered clocks have been around for a long, long time.

To add to this, if it has a signal it will recheck the time with whatever area you've set it to check (most just set it to automatically check for local time)Minor nitpick but by law (American law anyway) no singer has to ask permission to cover a song, there's what's called a compulsory license so any song writer is forced to license performance rights for their song, however a fee (royalty) for each performance is also mandatory.

In other words the performer is required to pay, and the writer can't say no.

PS since it often gets brought up in these discussions, what weird al does often does require permission since he's not covering the song, he's making a derivative work of it (using some elements of the song but creating new ones as well) for which there is no compulsory license. Some of his songs fall into the parody category, which does not require permission, but some don't.DoneNone of the rest of this movie is right out of a comic book though, at least not at the cheesiness level you're talking about.

This is a post Nolan superhero movie, with everything that entails. It's not Christopher reeve and Adam west up there


Though could you imagine that movie? So much fun.I remember seeing that movie, and I went to the bathroom at the absolute wrong time.

"What the FUCK is going on? There's a freaking alien?"Well, he still failed to even consider the original creator or do even a small amount of googling, until he got called out on it.

Stealing someone else's work without credit and saying "oh my bad I didn't realize it was someone else's" doesn't fly with anything elseDude, thanks /u/filmcrumobile for telling me about filmcrumobile!Your notable credits, the director, producer and/or production company, and group together by roles if you choose to include multiple roles (try to only include those in the same family/department... You can do both 2nd ac and 1st ac if they're notable, but don't put editing experience on your camera op resume)

What notable equipment you have experience with

A gear list if you're likely to be hired with gear

Contact info

Address of your website/portfolioNot as part of the film requirement, but I did have to take an intro to music class as a liberal arts major.

Which was annoying because I had transferred in from a music major, but had never technically taken intro to music, so I slept through a semester's worth of classes to take the final. Course requirements are weird sometimes.Slate. Import everything. Log in your nle.

Dumb slates are like twenty bucks dude, and if you really can't afford it just write the info on a piece of paper and hold it in front of the camera. Make sure it's there on the very first frame.You don't think that makes him badass? The tracking was the whole thing no one else could do. Boba was the only one who could do it. And he could have gone down and grabbed solo himself, but he was hired and getting paid by Vader to give his location, then wait until after he had been frozen. So he got the same bounty, twice, by doing something no one else could do, then didn't even have to do the hard part of actually getting the target.

That's pretty badass.If anyone else had managed to collect two bounties from one target without even having to capture the target, you'd be saying how awesome that was.I come to this thread to quickly skim the top comments on what was good and what wasn't. I appreciate that this helps prevent spoilers, and I'm sensitive to spoilers myself, but I feel if you come into this thread and browse randomly, you're accepting you might get a few. And it's not even that big a problem, the top comment is almost always "the writing on this is fantastic" or "I can't wait for a new creative team" or something (which helps me know what to pick up). Very rarely is the top comment something like "omg I can't believe so and so died!"That was last week I believeI don't know how everyone doesn't know dick isn't dead at this point. He runs around in high profile situations with his spyral things disabled every other issue.I thought they came right out and said it? It might have just been in the nightwing series but he found his name in the book of people chosen to be talons. I'm pretty sure it was the owls who killed his parents to prime him for being a talon but Bruce got there first.Ah neat, I didn't catch that. I thought Damian saw an opportunity and just called it a trap to save faceI think Jason's less about supporting the movement and more about "don't hurt kids"

Which makes a lot of senseIgnore timelines/continuity, it won't help you.Endgame was like six years ago in continuityBut Michael Shannon was acting wacky in that interview so we legitimately had no way of knowing if he let something slip or was just being really weird. He said something like "yeah I'm doomsday... Or am I!" And that's exactly the kind of weird thing he'd say as a joke.

So it got people wondering but it wasn't confirmedNnnno I think you'll need higher wattage than just a regular lamp. As I said, I would choose something directional-- like a Fresnel, though you may not be familiar with that term. Or, as I mentioned, an easier thing to do would be to tape a china lantern to the ceiling. This isn't just a regular lamp, you need to go to home depot and buy a porcelain socket, wires (home depot actually makes a small, easy to do kit), extension cord and a 300-watt bulb.

Now that I think about it, unless you particularly want the diffusion you don't need the actual china lantern at all and can just hang the bare bulb from the ceiling (make sure it's well secured) or go to a local hardware store (not sure if home depot has these) and get a metal shell. Might even be able to find one with a socket already in it

Like this


https://jet.com/product/detail/b89d1e01841e4445bda24edde93face8?jcmp=pla:ggl:home_garden_a3:lighting_a3_other:na:na:na:na:na:2&amp;code=PLA15&amp;k_clickid=5ad8a41f-86c9-4eb7-8283-297247506094&amp;gclid=Cj0KEQiAkIWzBRDK1ayo-Yjt38wBEiQAi7NnP7Jyb-9Wka1D4TH4KwR2K61yQRZumtAfZruwMBjas8UaAthl8P8HAQ

Though I'm sure you can find one cheaper. Secure it to the ceiling, put in your 300-watt bulb, skirt it to keep the light off the background but on the subjects

And see how you like it. Maybe do a test first to see if you really do want the softer light from a china lantern after all (something like this)

http://www.filmtools.com/ligdep/lighting-equipment/light-fixtures-kits/chinlan.html

Good luckYes, but she's not going to like it. You need to count and measure each part of the recipe. It's actually a little more fun and very enlightening when you see exactly what the "bad" parts are of any recipe. "Oh man, I shouldn't add so much butter, this is going to set me way over-- hm, actually it wasn't that bad at all. This is a pretty light meal! Now to just add the tablespoon of peanut butter and WHAT THE FUCK"

But yeah. As others have said, get a kitchen scale as well to measure everything. Go by weight, not volume, any time you reasonably can.In addition to you tossing and turning, it could also mean you set the sensitivity too highThis was the only way I could ever manage to get myself to wake up on time.

Until finally sleep-me, clever little dumbass that he is, figured out that my alarms are fake alarms and I can snooze and wait for the real alarm

But he wasn't clever enough to figure out which the actual alarm is, and now I sleep through ALL my alarms.

I'm not kidding it's a serious problem. I've overslept through so much shit and I'm at a loss for what to do now. Maybe one of those alarms that has a puzzle or shoots an airplane across the room or something.I need that alarm app, not even kiddingI got all the way to the search bar in the Google app store before realizing what that lower case "i" at the beginning of the name probably meant.You never lose, it just makes you feel really bad about all the people you're not savingGod damn dude I get one or two daily. Some are only worth ten cents but I did one today for fifty.

It may not seem like much but I got drunk at a party the other day and bought all the Heads Up bonus packs at a dollar a piece, woke up and realized that was money I didn't need to spend

Before realizing I still had four bucks left in my Google wallet.

Once or twice a month I go buy a new mobile game just because.Finally get me interested in it?My dad does the opposite and it's so annoying. If there's a place called, for instance, Mac's Burgers, he'll ask if we want to eat at "Mac Burger"

Dad that's not what it's calledOrdering off the menu makes you not look like a dork.

I sometimes, before coffee, forget I'm supposed to say it a certain way and just say large.

But I don't do it to spite the system or whatever. They call it what they call it and I order it from them.Dude, did you accidentally not Reddit the other day? Flipping a coin yields a result of landing with the face up of whatever it started on 51% of the time.Yeah but it has a different connotation when used as an adjective instead of a noun.&gt; things were still OK doing an emergency.

People fucking frequently died in preventable emergencies what the fuck.

Or at least, we've seen literally first hand how cell phone communication to emergency services can help rescue or save people

For most of human history we got by without the penicillin too, that doesn't mean we should just stop using itWhat if the shooter shoots the guy controlling the remote lock?Fire

Gunman

Building collapses

Person has heart attack

I could go on. You may not see the benefit here-- if a building collapses, everyone's gonna know-- but wouldn't it be helpful if someone could IMMEDIATELY contact emergency services, tell them how the building collapsed, who might be hurt, which areas are blocked and which entrances are clear?

Wouldn't it be great if someone can be on the line with a 911 operator receiving instructions on how to care for someone who just passed out for no reason?&gt; I don't believe that strict gun control laws would prevent organized religious extremists from obtaining weapons.

Depends on how strict the laws are, doesn't it? In new York, you can't legally carry a gun  as a private citizen unless you have a very good reason-- usually you have to be a licensed security enforcer. We also have some of the lowest violent crime rates of any major city per capita. I'm not saying those are directly related but it's something to think about.

What I am saying is there's almost no chance the type of person you're describing would have easy access to guns. And the only reason they'd have any reasonable access at all, if they were in new York, is because we're an island literally across from a state that does not share these laws.

If the entire state of California, or all of California, were to enact these laws the access to guns would go way downThe avengers took down Loki. Killgrave is good but not that good, the avengers would find a way to take him out. If he lays low and doesn't attract publicity he can keep living the life he wants, that was kind of the whole thing.

All it really takes is one person figuring out what's going on and putting in earplugs.Why even show a picture of power girl if you're gonna pick one without the boob windowShit yeah totally dropped the ball on that one, Duke first showed up in zero yearAh yeah my mistake, just got confused. Duke's first appearance was actually zero year and I guess at two in the morning I didn't catch that you said endgameThat makes a lot of sense, I'm in NY so they probably target high profile areasSure, but it's irresponsible to disallow any group of people access to emergency services. There have been many laws about this in the past, if this becomes common with cell phones I guarantee a tragedy will cause some new laws, just as they have in the pastI feel like I already explained how it could be helpful? We already have legitimate instances of people involved in an ongoing shooting situation giving police information by cell phone which helped them infiltrate.

Or in a fire, imagine being able to say on the phone yes, there are people in the balcony, but I don't think there are people behind the stage. The firefighters will check both but now they know to prioritize the balcony, which could save lives if they instead first investigated an empty back stage.No, it isn't. That's not what that word means.Landline might not be accessible. Security may be in the same situation as anyone else.

E: people have used those same excuses in the past and it got people killed.oh, neat. i'll check it out then. it actually didn't come up when i searched for mood trackers/diaries, so i assumed my assumption was correct (lot of assuming going on on my part)well...

i'm fairly certain that the reason we keep seeing them is because congress/telecom companies *keep* pushing it, and without a stricter law they're not going to stop.

with "we've cured alzheimers!" headlines i'm always pretty sure what they mean is they may have found a link between some random thing and memory loss in mice or something, but with this... i think they're all fairly important.well... that's not True? they'd love to avoid taxes, create monopolies and collude with each other, but...

....hm.what did we lose at television and radio? it's my understanding both of those things were ignored and regarded as fads by the communication companies, until laws were already in place to protect them. radio specifically.True or False:

if a truck driver makes it more than a decade without a single incident (i'm not sure what constitutes an incident), he's probably lying and/or paid someone off

just curiousIME it's 100% about your co-workers. If you're working with the fun/laid back manager and one or two of your friends, working is kind of a blast.

If it's the overbearing "If you have time to lean, you have time to clean" manager, the annoying 15 year old that keeps whining about high school drama and the 60-year-old career cashier, it fucking sucks.the best part is how robin is apparently just *now* questioning it.

"Hm, tonight purple bat-costume."

"Neat."

"Okay, how about the green one for this patrol?"

"Swell."

"And tonight, I think we'll go with the red."

"Hang on just a darn second..."yeah but in tdkr he looked like a human tank

in this he looks like a puffy marshmallowi am one bajillion percent sure he is moving fast there because they slight undercranked the footage

he doesn't look as mobile as he could be, and using camera tricks to make him look fast is just going to ring as False to me.&gt; The important thing is that he doesn't use them to kill or maim people and only when the situation calls for it

like when arkham knight attacks him with an army of tanks which conveniently had no people in them?

(although i've managed to rationalize that plothole to myself, but still, i shouldn't have to)honestly my problem isn't that he uses gun-type weapons, that's standard protocol for batman

but it is kind of a bummer that the awesome cool trinity poster shot has batman holding a gun. even if it's a grenade launcher not meant for lethal use, it does detract a little bit from the image.it's not considered canon by anyone... it's a future story, and no future stories are considered mainstream canon.

in fact we've already established significant differences from it in main continuity. the first that comes to mind is we've already been introduced to carrie kelley in the mainstream, at the age she is in TDKRyeah but they're rubber bullets so they don't count

(just go with it)it looks like a gun.

it's *not* a gun, not in the traditional sense, but you're kidding yourself if you think that doesn't look like batman holding a gun.

batman could also be in a mech suit-- it's established, even in this movie, he uses them when needed. but that would lessen the trinity image, just like batman holding what appears to be a gun, **even if it's not one**

batarang? for sure. grappling hook? i can buy that. but gun-like device? i get that he uses them, but that's not how i picture batman.that was different and very specific to the character. for him, it was a punishment, because dignam didn't give a shit about pay he really, *really* cared about doing his job/justice (as illustrated by the end scene)

so it was a punishment, but he's also a rational guy, so when it was obvious he had lost the battle he said fuck it, fine, pay me to sit on my ass then. sort of a "i want the thing" "you can't have the thing" "fine i didn't want the thing anyway" type deal.your boss has firing power. a police chief may not.

i've been plenty of people's bosses without the technical power to fire them. in practice, i usually do have the power to fire them, but it involves me going to whoever's signing the checks and saying "fuck this fucking guy"

which, if i were doing a public statement, would need to be called a *recommendation* to fire, since i don't technically have that ability.i am aware. what is your point?yeah he's just putting them to sleep&gt; No spoilers for the season

What are you talking about

Now we know it takes place in a prison!

Come on bro.well the space light is diffused by the silki don't recall now, but didn't they just refer to the "incident" or even "death" of jason, but not specifically say he had never come back to life?

maybe they had another falling out and they just don't talk about jason's return, or maybe he died again&gt; explosive batarangs

exactly what i was thinking

"but how do we know they're explosive?"

the same way we know that's not a gun-- context. but batarangs are way more batman (and look cooler) than a gun-like device. better image, because you *know* that shot is going to be on a million posters and desktop backgrounds and whatnot.1) can't see it very well, but is that not just a stills camera? probably for publicity.

2) director's viewfinder. shows what the camera will see at a given placement and focal length, so the director (or whomever) can view his shots without needing to actually move the camera there.

E: lol, first to respond, accurate, downvoted. You guys crack me up.woah, bkv wrote the titans? can't believe that slipped under my radar.

then again, not crazy about his characterization of dick here...i think that was batman's point the whole time.

He mentions dick's social life, then dick, trying to defend himself, lists off his *extensive* social life, and comes to the realization on his own that maybe he needs to lessen up on the social life.unmanned tanks don't make sense in the world where literally your only enemy is one who will refuse to fire on manned tanks (or have much, MUCH more trouble disabling them while being absolutely meticulous about not killing the people inside).

literally if arkham knight just straps a person to each tank then all of a sudden batman is pretty much out of options against a tank *army.*&gt; If I don't sign then there won't be a permament position

That is illegal. If that is legitimate, then you are being coerced into signing something you know not to be True.

Do not sign something that says you have been offered a permanent position but declined, if that was not the case. Do not *ever* sign anything admitting something you know to be unTrue.lol no. you'll get severance and damages, as well as lawyer's fees paid, and possibly continue after them for wrongful termination (depends on the circumstances). they may even be forced to hire you back, with pay for the time you spent not working.

in all likelihood they'll just hire you back to get rid of the hassle. they won't re-fire you for the same reason.

this is pretty common. most of the time the employee willingly takes the severance or settlement and goes on to another job.yes. don't listen to anyone saying they'll come up with another excuse-- do your job and do it well and it will be *very* clear that this was retaliatory firing.

and furthermore, the company won't bother firing you after you *just* filed/sued for a bad termination.&gt; He also had to fight the GCPD who don't care as much about firing on manned tanks.

the gcpd had no way to fight the tanks anyway. that's why batman had to step in. that's why i didn't include them as an enemy, to arkham knight they were essentially a non-threat.

&gt; Also, if there were human operators then you could easily just give Batman some kind of weapon like an emp or electrical gun that would disable/disarm the tanks without hurting the person inside.

Which, in game-canon, would have been much more difficult to do. He *did* have an EMP, and it didn't last long, and took a while to charge up. He absolutely would have been overrun by the tanks had his only option been an EMP.I have no idea who any of these people are, besides Hawkman and Hawkgirl.

And that guy at the front kind of looks like a futuristic Flash?

E: what the fuck. You guys suck.there's absolutely legal action to take if they told him he had graduated, and their mistake will cost him financial aid and potentially delay his college career.

it may not be *worthwhile* legal action, but it's there.I know all of that information and none of it addresses my post.I am not arguing against that.

Seriously, am I taking crazy pills?

I thought I was pretty clear that my point, and my only point, was that the fact that the suit makes him look less agile, and using camera tricks to make him appear more agile doesn't change that.No, it isn't. Why would it be? If we see a puny hulk, we can cgi him lifting a tank and it still will feel False.We're not talking about the gameplay the developers could have chosen, we're talking about the story as presented.

Yes, obviously the developers could have changed the game so there wasn't a plot hole. That doesn't make it any less of a plot hole.What he always does.That is exactly what happened.So, you were bound by seating assignments but the girl's friend wasn't?

Yeah that sounds like middle school.Come on. We all know it's because the Jews would have raised hell if their kids didn't get out of school, while the Asian parents would have raised hell if their kids DID get out of schoolWhy the hell would you ever confess to that

I'd take that one to the graveMaybe not. It's not a federally protected class. And you certainly wouldn't have had much luck with it twenty, even ten years ago.It was awful. I took intro to music theory, intro to music history, intro to aural development... But technically no intro to music.

I was pissed.

Thankfully the prof could tell I was way beyond the class. I still had to show up (mandatory attendance) but he didn't care if I slept the whole time because I could always ace quizzes cold.Well there needs to be grounds for it. The courts can only interpret laws, and there's no law suggesting they might be a protected classIf the budget allows, or it's a long lens, probably a motorized slider type deal. If it's lower budget and/or a wider lens you can do it by hand.No.

E: hate me all you want but the fourteenth amendment does not, in any interpretation, include protections for gay people to dance with each otherI don't know what to tell you, man. We got the story we got. Could they have changed the story to not have the plothole? Sure. But they didn't. And we're left with a plothole.I highly suspect you're wrong and we got the poster shot in the trailer...

But I guess we'll have to wait and seeHow cool would that poster be?Dude, thanks so much. You rock.I know. I did think it was a plothole. Saying "it was a game mechanic" doesn't make it not a plothole.&gt; What we found out is that his whole resume was for working as a jib operator

This is super common and I always warn about it when possible. Pay close attention to the credits and reel, and if possible look up the projects. I think I've told this story before but I once got a dp reel from a guy that included footage from a show he worked on... As hmu. Of course, once I found his actual cinematography work, it was awful.there's a pun there?pewYes really. I always get downvoted for saying this, but even that fan theory admits in its own explanation that it's just a fan theory, and much like other fan theories, doesn't really hold up to scrutiny.

Did you even look at the thing you linked? It says right out, while theorizing about conspiracies is fun, the reason they miss is because it's a movie and it's more entertaining if the heroes don't die.It's like you have no idea how the justice system in America actually works and have only been exposed to ideas through

&gt; an ethics course

yup there it is. This isn't your shitty grad student's philosophies, this is the real world with way more prisoners than we can handle, who are constitutionally guaranteed rights (cruel and unusual doesn't mean whatever you fee like it should mean).

We can't make them all go sit in a dump.For fuck's sake, you can't just make up definitions for cruel and unusual.For anyone even thinking about discussing cruel and unusual punishment,

we first need to recognize that this is a *truncated quote*

and I can goddamn guarantee you the second part of the "choice" that was mentioned, but not included in the article/sound clip, was a traditional sentence of minor jail time or community service.I thought you were referring to the guy you responded to.it's fucking disgusting that those protestors weren't just immediately told to leave then arrested. schools piss me off sometimes-- you can not protest in a building hallway. i've been kicked out before for being too loud, but it's fine for them to shout through a megaphone?

and i'm not just disagreeing with their message. i don't even know what their message was. but fuck schools letting protestors break common rules just because they're protesting. get some cops in there, don't ask any questions, just calmly tell them they need to leave and when they don't, throw their asses in jail.

(for anyone saying this would be bad press, i watched a very similar situation at my alma mater, and the vast majority of alums were embarrassed that cops didn't come in sooner, and public opinion had no problem with the dickbags being arrested)why didn't any security or anyone just take the fucking guy out? saying "be quiet or get out" doesn't do anything if you won't enforce it. if he can't be quiet, he should get out, and if he doesn't get out, **someone should get him out.**...why would you think it's intentional? it doesn't make sense and doesn't hold up within the story. it's a plot hole. they came up with a way to justify the game mechanic of literally shooting or running over innocent people, and they could have come up with a reason for firing on tanks, but instead of anything that works in the story they gave us, they said "well they're unmanned."Well, first because it's not cruel and unusual (under the legal definition)

And second she wasn't sentenced to it, she was given the option.No they haven't. No court in western civilization has ever ruled that long term incarceration is cruel.

E: saying "the courts have ruled" does not give you carte Blanche to make up legal definitions.Yeah that's tough, you just got into a bad situation, it happens. Over time I'd like to think it becomes easier to spot the fakes, or when someone's credits are suspect. There's a few signs, but you can't really overcome someone just flat out lying.She wasn't sentenced to eight hours of nausea, she was given the option of being nauseated or *some other punishment* which we don't know because this article truncated the rest of the statement. It was probably community service or a few days in jail.

My dad was a judge and his general sentencing for animal abuse was, for example, if the crime was not feeding a pet, you got as many days in jail for each day you didn't feed the pet. Make it starve for a week, go to jail for a week.no, it's a fan theory, which even the linked image admits.

that quote is to give weight to the power of the empire and storm troopers, which then elevates the daring escape our heroes make by not being beaten by the already-established precise storm troopers.

it's a movie. it doesn't entirely hold up and is meant to be entertaining, not logically consistent. which is why it gets made fun of.I know that's their reasoning, and it pisses me off. Why do some get to break rules just because they're protesting?

Had I still been at NYU when the sit in happened a few years ago, I'd have staged my own sit in the night after just to point out that if you're going to let them do it for a protest, then I get to do it as a protest too, and I get to protest whatever I want.

I'd protest the fact that charizard foils were so goddamn expensive when I was a kid. Whatever.I don't know what you're arguing against but it's not the points I'm making.&gt; answer the question

I did answer it, you've just chosen not to respond to it.

Again, I know this is the argument you want to have, but it's not the one I'm making. If you're going to respond to me, respond to me. Not some imaginary character you've made up who's making the arguments you want to argue against.&gt; why there would be a tracking beacon if the intention was actually to kill them.

There is no evidence that this was their plan the whole time, there's evidence that this wasn't their plan the whole time, and the far more likely scenario is that this was only their plan for not sending more tie fighters after them.

Why would Vader allow them to be crushed or strangled in the trash compactor if they intended on following them?

That is one (of many) piece of evidence indicating Vader intended to stop their escape, failed, and decided rather than blowing them out of the sky he would track them.What really sucks is she probably had to pay even more money that she couldn't afford to get it turned back on, which caused even more trouble paying bills.

Being poor is fucking expensive.Also from experience, it's easier to go without electricity for a little while than running water. Charge your devices at a coffee shop, go to bed early and don't watch TV and you can manage.

But show up to work without showering for a week and you got a problem.

But if you've got a gym membership or good friends, you can use their shower. Just depends on your situation.Did someone say...

Greased Lightning?!If I have a little extra money one month I'll hide tens or twenties in my coat pockets to help out future me.

There's probably a better or more responsible way of accomplishing the same task, but I like my way.I think there's an app for that.

Well, there's one for cocktails. I assume there's one for food.I'm poor as fuck but I've always managed to find a table and various other furniture. I think you guys just aren't trying hard enough, craigslist on moving day is fantastic.I dunno. I think by far more talent will be found by someone that can devote years or decades to their craft full time without an income, as opposed to someone that needs a day job and can only work on their art after a full day's work, totally drained and exhausted.

Good art can come from either situation and they're both unique, but I think we find more good art from the independently wealthy.&gt; they can easily be disciplined via the administration or made to leave but the security.

or arrested

http://www.nytimes.com/2009/02/20/nyregion/20nyu.html?_r=0

http://cityroom.blogs.nytimes.com/2009/02/20/students-end-nyu-building-takeover/

a few things to note:

obviously they were breaking rules already set by NYU. Special treatment granted just because they were protesting.

The article says people were given suspensions but I remember at the time, everyone was pardoned and there were *no* consequences.

The article also makes it sound like the school agreed to let them stay, then when they overstayed what they had permission for, the school immediately took action.

In reality, the school immediately told them to leave and they said no. So the school said "Alright, fine-- you guys were allowed to stay last night, but tonight you need to leave."

and they said no. And the school said fine you were allowed to stay again but you really super need to leave this time

and that's when some of the students trying to push through to join their friends accidentally broke one of the guard's arms. that was the *only* reason NYU decided to act. Not because NYU decided they had enough, not because NYU gave them rules that they broke-- because someone became physically injured (and public outcry became a lot stronger).

I followed the whole thing as it happened and they had *no* support from alums-- everyone, right from the beginning, was essentially rolling their eyes and advocating the police go in and drag their asses out.

So yeah, the whole deal pissed me off-- I'm not even allowed in a building without my ID, but here they were totally fine with kids from other schools occupying the cafeteria overnight, disrupting classes, disallowing others to eat, and even going to classes *and coming back* and had no problem with it until someone got injured. You can bet your ass if I had still been a student I would've been sitting in kimmel the very next night demanding my right to have a sleepover there.&gt; not sure what security you have that have the powers of the police.

none.

the police have the powers of the police.

&gt; what exactly would they be arrested for?

disruption, trespassing.

&gt; And how would the security guard exactly restrain them given he has no handcuffs?

they wouldn't. the police would.

&gt; They can be made to leave

In handcuffs, by the police. No private citizen has the right to force them to do anything.

&gt; Unless they're assaulted the staff or broken a customers nose or something demonstrably illegal they just kick em out and refuse entry....that's it.

I think you are mistaken about how this works. They can not force anyone out. The fact that bouncers at bars sometimes do it does not make it legal.

And even if it was, as you've clearly stated, the private security does not have the force to do it.

This is exactly the kind of thing cops are for-- removing unwanted people from your property who are disruptive to what you're doing and refuse to leave when asked.i had to deal with protestors who were outside disrupting my class. that was specifically their intent-- they directed all their shouts/chants/megaphones up to the windows of the classrooms. pissed me off the administration allowed it to happen, i legitimately just wanted to learn and these fuckers were preventing that-- slightly ironically, they were protesting classes being expensive.

classes that they weren't even going to because they were protesting

and which they were preventing me from utilizing

(this was one of the cheapest, city-subsidized schools i'd ever been to. i think residents had to only pay two or three grand a semester, total, and there was TONS of financial aid available)i guess you can think what you want to think, but i seem to remember everyone thinking the "don't taze me bro" guy was a total joke and asshole, once the whole story came out.

it's a fucking shame that people are allowed to break rules just because they say they're protesting.&gt; A.) we can't just take tax off. It's the fucking law.

well kind of. legally, the store has to pay taxes on their sales. no one says you need to charge the customer tax though. or really, no one says what you need to charge the customer, period.^intensifiesI'm a democrat and I feel the same way about Trump. For the love of God don't put him in charge of the country, but I'm glad he's actually up there talking about important issues without being beholden to contributors.Yo listen up, here's a story

About a little guy who lives in a blue world

And all day and all night and everything he sees

Is just blue like him

Inside and outside

Blue his house with a blue little window

And a blue corvette

That's all I got from memory.Exactly. Argue in the court room, not on the street.Bahaha what the fuck are you talking about that's not how consent works.

Any judge anywhere will tell you to say you do not consent to the search, then comply. Compliance does not indicate consent.

THAT is how the law actually works. Not whatever bullshit you just made up.It depends. If they're asking you to do something that could compromise your safety, you don't have to and shouldn't comply.

For anything else, comply but verbally state your dissent.&gt; You generally have the right to withhold your information.

No you don't. Almost every state requires you to identify yourself if suspected of a crime. And that suspicion can be very thin.Most states require you to verbally state that you're exercising your right to remain silentObstruction of justice is one of those things no one understands and think it applies to way more than it does

What you did, however, was pretty much the only thing that is actually obstruction of justice.No, they don't.

E: well, they can't lie or misrepresent. But they don't have to answer, and they could be mistaken. Cops aren't lawyers, and I've found more than a few who legitimately don't know the law.Yes. It's their job to investigate and gather evidence, not yours. You tell them what you know to the best of your recollection.

Don't go the other way though and say "it was absolutely definitely that guy for sure." Tell the truth: "I believe it was likely this person, but I didn't witness the event. Here is why I believe it was them:"

and the cops will go investigate and check it out.Well, that's simply not True and is against the law.That's not how it works. If someone isn't sure what they saw, they need to recount what they saw to the best of their recollection, and say that they're not sure if that's what happened or not. "I don't know, but I think..." is perfectly reasonable.

The cops won't immediately run to whoever gets named and cuff them. That never happens. The police will go *investigate* the matter more, ask if any other witnesses saw the person in question, ask the person in question what happened and see if they too have a broken nose or whatever.

That's called investigating the crime, and is exactly what the police are for. And by not saying anything you're preventing them from doing their job.

Everyone likes to bitch about how the cops can't do a competent job, but no one wants to actually make it possible for them to do so.

Arresting the wrong man? That's what happens when witnesses *don't* say what they saw.No it isn't. Fucks sake this isn't an opinion.Obstruction of justice is a crime, which you committed, and deserve to be arrested for.

And yes it's illegal.It's not advice. I'm just stating what is a crime and what isn't, because, unsurprisingly, no one seems to knowThey are absolutely vital to conducting an investigation.Pizza.

I will never understand crew who bitches about "pizza, again?"

Pizza is the best food, even if it's every single day.

e: this comment has had a wild ride through this thread&gt; Not pizza.

BOO! PIZZA IS THE BEST FOODPizza and redbull is the way to go&gt; he could be in hugeeeeeee trouble.

not really. pretty much just told not to do it again. unless you want to leave the place, or have evidence he damaged something, there's not a WHOLE lot you can do about it. It's essentially trespassing, no one's going to arrest him for it but if you catch him in the act you can call the police to have him removed.

if the police have to come several times he might have a problem, but in all likelihood he'd have left before the cops get there anyway.it's the one with vandal savage. don't remember the name but a quick look through the list on wikipedia will give it to you. Doom I think.

e: looked it up, it is doom. it's the tower of babel adaptation. go read the comic it's way better.This is how the Batman died.&gt; You won't find it on proper sets.

To my great dismay.I once called my mom who happened to be midway through having her computer fixed remotely because it had viruses.

Except it took like ten minutes for me to figure out what the hell she was talking about

"They're on the computer"

"What does that mean? Are they there with you?"

"NO! They're on the phone fixing the computer?"

"Mom I don't understand. Are they on the phone or are they there fixing your computer?"

"THEY'RE FIXING THE COMPUTER. IT SAID I HAD A VIRUS AND HAD TO CALL THIS NUMBER AND NOW THEY'RE CONTROLLING THE COMPUTER TO--"

"Mom, I need you to unplug everything from the computer right now. Pull the power cord out of the wall immediately."

(except imagine, like, legit ten more minutes of the same preceding this)he's almost always promoting his environmental agenda

which is a pretty solid thing to promote

and he's also usually pretty rad about being funny/parodied in the episode as well

i agree, gore is awesome&gt; You want bacon on your bagel with cream cheese, you fucking got it. 

that sounds so good. the salty bacon would go great with cream cheese.

also if i'm being honest the absolute best way to do it would be to chop up the bacon and mix it into the cream cheese

god damnit now i gotta try thatthis applies to pretty much everything. want a burger at the pizza place? you're gonna regret it. want a taco at the italian restaurant? your funeral.you understand that what i'm suggesting isn't censorship, right?does the brain see my hands as large because i use them for everything, or do i use them for everything because my brain sees them as large?ah, okay. yeah.There are very few people who advocate for a total ban on guns in America. Even if that's what they want, most people know it's an unrealistic task.

When you hear about gun control issues, the people wanting more gun control are mostly advocating for stricter laws on what kind of guns you can buy, how and when you can carry it, and who can own them.

Pretty much the only people who keep saying America should ban all guns are non Americans.I don't think per capita is really a useful measurement since we're discussing total volume. If Canada only had a single citizen and that citizen had ten guns, that would be very high per capita, but not really a big deal for the US.I feel like the bomb would just spray confetti and glitter everywhere

Which admittedly would be kind of a pain in the ass to clean upThat sucks but if there's a terrorist attack somewhere I want to know about it.

You think we'd all be better off pretending 9/11 never happened?

"On this morning of September 11th, 2016, I'd like to take a moment of silence followed by a reading of the names of people who... went on vacation and stayed there fifteen years ago."

That wouldn't go over real well.&gt; no matter how down you may feel, you will slowly stand up, dust yourself off, and begin the healing process.

Careful. Some people legitimately never recover from this type of betrayal. They have chronic trust issues and may never be "themselves" again.

If you need it, go see a therapist. Do something. You can't always expect to just get better on your own.the fish in the sea line (or similar thinking) helped. Part of the pain is thinking that person was "the one," and that without them you've ruined your *entire life*.

And it helps to remember, no, she's not the one, she's **a** one, and not even really that because she sucks, there are other, better women out there who can and will make you happy.

Not right now, but someday.I feel like if you have to ask it wasn't really confirmedi believe the point was that it was really shitty advice

most people would say the opposite-- if you have to ask, you probably should go ahead and not drivethat is the point he's trying to makeyeah but also you gotta ask yourself if they're the ones who are out of line, or if you are.

they're doing it for some reason. is it because they're assuming you'll be an asshole, with no evidence/reason to believe that?

or are you frequently flipping the fuck out, maybe get violent, etc.?
Boba Fett performed the following tasks:

Tracked someone that the most powerful government agency (and all his colleagues) found to be untrackable

Got a bounty for it

Got someone else to actually collect the target

Convinced the client to give him the target

Then got a *second* bounty off the same target.

That alone is pretty damn cool when you think about it. Dude got paid twice and didn't even have to do the job. He got Vader/Lando to do it for him.if a cop lies to you for the purpose of enticing you to commit a crime, that is entrapment.

[here's a handy comic explaining it](http://thecriminallawyer.tumblr.com/post/19810672629/12-i-was-entrapped)&gt; An officer cannot ask you to do something illegal and then penalize you for following their instructions.

Yes they can. That alone is not grounds for entrapment. In fact, that is a very common way of, say, busting hookers or johns or drug dealers. They ask a drug dealer to sell them crack, drug dealer does it, then gets arrested.

The police can not *convince* you to commit a crime you wouldn't have otherwise committed-- but they can ask you.

However, note, they also can't lie to you and tell you it's legal while identifying as an agent of the law-- that's False representation and is entrapment.death sentence is a terribly tough punishment with a very high burden of proof

in other words we only give it to very, very bad people

there is no judge who thinks cutting off someone's arm is a suitable alternative for someone getting the death sentence.

judges aren't on the bench just to play games and fuck around to see what they can get people to do for their own amusement. the original punishment still has to be just.it would also be rape by coercionYou can be pissed at him for being a drug addict if you want, but if he didn't know he had a kid you can't be pissed at him for being a deadbeat dad.can you elaborate? why is it so bad?well... they introduced new people to be superman. i get your point, and it's well-received, but they were all still *about* Superman in some way.

Kind of like how Batman is still going strong even with Gordon as Batman.There is absolutely no chance this movie doesn't make a kajillion dollars.

Even if everyone is absolutely sure they'll hate it, we will all *still* pay to see the first appearance of Batman and Superman on screen. If it's really, truly awful, we all might rethink the rest of the Justice League movies... but we'll definitely be seeing this one.I don't necessarily do it inappropriately, but if something is on my mind but I'm not quite sure yet how to approach it or how I want to communicate it, I will sometimes get drunk and say it.

And of course since I wasn't ready to approach it in the first place, and am doing it drunk, it often doesn't go too well.

(Bit different from bottling it up though I suppose)Maybe he really did black out often? Some people black out really early, occasionally before they're even obviously very drunk.Seems the common thread is rationalizing why they're doing it.I am not the person you want to have this discussion with. I have no interest in getting in the middle of it, I was just pointing out who's making which arguments.I'm with your husband. This isn't your kid. You don't get to decide which ideals she should follow or how she's raised. Even if the vast majority of us would agree that what you want for her is far better than what her parents are allowing-- that's not your decision to make.

What if some other parent had different ideals from yours, and secretly let your kids do those things you've disallowed? Their opinion of what kids should be allowed to do is no more valid than yours.Don't do a no-carb diet. Carbs are an important macro nutrient that your body needs.

Just moderate your carb intake, along with the rest of your macro/caloric intake. Do some research and figure out how many carbs you need daily, and don't go over.

And do actual research, don't just stop at the first fad website that gives you the information you want to hear.I think I did a pretty good job explaining it already, but sure here we go again:

Another country's population has no effect on America's population. This is a discussion about how many guns can make it into America-- ranking of how many guns *per person* has absolutely no bearing on the total number of guns that could enter America.

Once again I refer you to my example of there being a single citizen in Canada. If that single citizen has 10 guns, then Canada has ten guns per capita. That would put them way higher than any other country in number of guns per capita.

But, America wouldn't really have to worry about those ten guns entering the country. It's just ten guns.This shouldn't even be a question. Tell your ex to get bent.So, from your sister's perspective:

Her boyfriend needs two rooms if he wants to move in

You said there's no way that will happen

Ergo (from her point of view) you said there's no way her boyfriend can move in

And now you're mad that she's saying the same to you

Perhaps understanding it from her perspective can help you communicate with her about your feelings.Those sound like perfectly innocent comments to me. At least, potentially. Bit of a case of foot-in-mouth, but from what you've described you **may** be making too big a deal over this.

What might be helpful is if you point out anytime he says something hurtful. He obviously has no idea what he's saying is hurtful, so it's not really fair to treat him like the bad guy-- again, they could be perfectly innocent and you're just misinterpreting them, or worse, projecting your own self-esteem issues onto the comments.

I don't know.

But if you started making him aware of which comments were hurtful, I strongly suspect he'd stop making them.so you're just making total assumptions and are unable to support any of your conclusions with what OP actually said--

and OP's statements actually outright refute your assumptions--

in order to paint the husband as an awful guy?

you are indicative of the worst parts of this subCould be very serious abuse

Could be drunken rambly nonsense.

I would do my best to investigate further.He wants to bang other chicks and maybe come back and marry you if you're still waiting around on him-- maybe.

I find it very unlikely you have a future together. However, you're young, that doesn't mean you need to break up. You don't *just* have to date with a long-term goal in mind, you can date just because you enjoy dating the other person.

However

he also kind of sounds like a douchebag.

So that's a pretty good reason to dump him.

(but I don't know him and I don't know your relationship, you do you)whatcha wanna bet he really does, though?

i can almost guarantee if they went through with it OP would end up banging a bunch of dudes and having a great time

OP's bf would find out women *aren't* just knocking down the door to fuck a douchebag

and he'd come crawling back bawling over the fact that he's not getting laid and she is, and he gave her upDon't listen to these losers. Jumping on the "dump him" ship is a stereotype of this sub for a reason-- it's all anyone ever says.

You don't need to break up.

You can, if you want. If you're, right now, looking for a long-term life partner and you know this isn't the guy, go get someone who is.

But you are **young.** There is absolutely nothing wrong with dating someone because you like them and enjoy dating them, even if you know it won't work out in the end.

Not every single relationship absolutely has to end in marriage, it's okay to have some you know won't. They can still be fun and important times in your life, they can still help you learn and grow as a person, they can still be fulfilling and meaningful.

It's important not to kid yourself and think it's going to be marriage material if you know it won't be, though. Know that it's going to end someday and be ready for when it does.

All that said, if you want to break up with him that's okay too. If you're not comfortable knowing it won't work out in the long run, then do what's right for you....we're in a discussion about how the amount of guns in a neighboring country can make it difficult to prevent them from coming in...&gt; her calling you crying about this provides almost total certainty

my sister cries at catfood commercial.

the fact that someone you've met is crying proves *nothing* with *any* kind of certainty.insufficient data to provide meaningful answer

we don't know if it was consensual or even asked for

we don't know if she was pressured into it

we don't know if the boyfriend just made an honest mistake

we don't know if this was something they do regularly but it just got out of hand this time

we don't know if the boyfriend is abusing her

we don't know what crying signifies

there's simply too much here we don't know-- and you don't know. get more details if you can, don't make any judgments until you do (including against the boyfriend-- again, this could have all been consensual)This is the comment you replied to:

&gt; This is exactly what I keep telling people who want to ban guns in the USA. It won't work like it does in countries like New Zealand, Australia, and the UK because we have Mexico below us. The cartels would make billions supplying the US guns illegally. I know it's not just Mexico and the cartels, but that's only one example.

Per capita does not have any relevance on that, since it's their volume that would allow them to flood the US with guns. Again, if there's only one citizen with ten guns in the entire country, it's not a problem. Per capita is not a useful measure here.this is why women's lines for the bathrooms are half the length of the bar

y'all up in there bonding and shitno wrong time to start. me and my friends have no problem telling each other if we lookin' good after working out, getting more defined/trim, wearing a kickass suitjacket or whatever.&gt; Obviously if the waiter is a dick, this is different. 

Reddit has messed me up because I've always been pleasant to waiters but after hearing SO many times how you guys won't even consider an so who's rude to one I'm now overly polite even when they suck.

I gotta knock that off.You will literally die.I wasn't gonna click it but now I kinda feel like I have to

E: it is a dickI'm in the minority here but (besides issues of discrimination) I don't think pay should be discussed.

Yes, someone in an equal position might be making more than you. That's them, not you. You negotiate what you negotiate, you make what you agree on with the employer, and you accepted the rate you agreed on. No one else's pay is your business, and it's impossible to say what an employer might value more in someone else over you, even for the same job-- that's their right as an employer.

I know that's not the world we live in, I know that's not the popular opinion, I know that's not legal and I accept all that.

Still how I feel about it though.what's "the right environment?"maybe currently, but-- hear me out on this

*if* we were to make it a given that no one would be **disallowed** to have kids naturally

and *if* we were able to artificially grow humans from sperm and egg donors

and *if* we were to remove the emotional attachment of "it's my dna so it's my kid and i have a responsibility to it"

couldn't we then use donors to selectively breed, like, super-athletes or super-scientists or something? make sure there's a fit parent ready to adopt them and go for it.well now this is what i'm curious about too

i'm in manhattan so i think i could make it a solid couple blocks if i ran"He said it was agony."probably kurt cobaini'm a much bigger fan of the comic. if you liked the movie, fair enough, but in the comic i felt like all of the plans for each of the JL'ers were motivated, specific to that person and could *only* have come from someone who knew them all enough intimately to know their exact biggest weakness.

Which was kind of the whole point of the plans having been stolen from Batman. I mean, who else would know Kyle well enough to know how as an artist losing his sight would completely *destroy* his willpower?

In the movie, it just felt like random arbitrary stuff any supervillain could have come up with.i was just talking about the act of a public break-up in general, not this specific instance&gt; I'm sad and almost nervous for the success of the movie.

Yes. Rape is an entirely separate additional charge.I disagree. I think this is an anomaly. This is batman and Superman. I'd put it up there near star wars-- even once we all realized episode I was bad, and we all heard each other say it was bad, we saw it anyway.

And did the same with episode ii.That one coffee mug that looks like a camera lens

That's the gift I always recommend in these situations, because it shows you put some thought into getting something related to their career path-- and shows your support for it, which a lot of us don't always get.

But filmmakers don't even really want the coffee mug, we don't really want anything film related. (E: as far as crew type gifts go, anyway. Obviously we all love movies, so movie related gifts can do well)

 Anything we want that's worthwhile is going to be outside the budget of a Christmas gift, and anyway-- I don't think many of us want work stuff for Christmas. It's like getting your maid a new set of rubber gloves.

Hobbyists may want a new cheap lens or new camera strap or something

But your best bet is to just get him something HE likes, personally, unrelated to filmGet creative. The movie you wanted to make is gone. Look at what you have and figure out what you can do with it. Can you cut to silence and use music over dramatic/shocked expressions? Can you do funny voice overs and make it a comedy? Can you call up a local band and make a music video? Can you put the whole thing in reverse and tell people it's an avant garde piece exploring the nature of time?i mean, i don't think jj could get these guys to calm down if he wanted

they're old, they're famous, it's not like they're going to recast if they get out of line

but thankfully they're also not dicks, so i think they've all decided to just have as much fun as possible&gt; These interviews aren't really good for anything on the movie side it's all about rating for the TV shows.

tbh it is increasing the hype. don't get me wrong, i'm going to go see the movie either way, but it's great if i'm getting even more excited for it than i was&gt; "Blow? Which one is that? Is that cocaine?"

/r/me_irlinteresting how they're both star wars actors

well i guess not that interesting. inevitable may be a better word.Go get his five dozen eggs ready, he'll need them

(no this is not normal and is crazy stupid and is entirely done for showing off)I'm convinced Matt Albie was the role he was born for. So disappointed that show got canned.that's definitely a phenomenon that happens

but it isn't *guaranteed* to happen with *all* your old memoriesI guess we'll see.Side note: I get really bad razor burn/bumps, always have, no matter what kind of razor I use.

Alcohol based after shave products are the only thing that I've found to help treat thisBut I do it all the time and never get sick, so is stopping the germs from spreading really a worthwhile endeavor, except for your mental aversion to them which obviously many of us don't share?Keep in mind, if for no other reason, I guarantee your breath will GREATLY improve.Tried it. Didn't make a bit of difference to me.1) you're comparing internal to external. I don't want shit ON MY BODY but obviously it needs to get digested from within

2) flushable baby wipes

3) even if you don't get flushable, get a bin with a lid on it. You can't seriously tell me you'd rather be walking around with actual shit on you than have it in a garbage can

If you truly believe that then next time you walk your dog, instead of a plastic baggie just grab his shit and smear it all over your arms instead of tossing it, way more convenient and now you don't have gross shit in a garbage can&gt; Never forget to wash your feet, all of it, from legs to the tips of your toes, to the soles. Scrub/soap it up until foam covers the entirety of you feet.

But then I slip and fall down in the showerDoesn't that just mean our definition of memory altogether needs to change?&gt; Getting on a train before everyone who is getting off has gotten off.

I straight up mowed a guy down the other day. Usually I do the little gesture of like "cmon dude what do you think is gonna happen here you gotta step aside" but I was just not in the mood and he was very aggressively blocking any way I had to even push past him

And I had some heavy duty camera equipment with me

So I used my equipment as a battering ram and just went full speed. He wasn't too happy but fuck that guy.well i'm saying, if we're using the fact that we *never* remember our memories as actual memories, that means that the "you never remember old memories" just applies to *all* memories, and further, just changes our definition of "memory" and "remember" so yeah, we do still remember them, we just have a different definition of remember now because the old one is incorrect."I'll tell you in person"

Fuck you we're talking right now and having a relevant conversation. If it's, like, how you were sexually abused as a child, fine, that can wait. If it's what you thought of the movie last night just fucking tell me if it was good or not!How can I stop three times in a row if you never told me to start again?ha!We can see great boobs any time

But now you've brought into play *specific* boobs

We don't know her, her boobs probably aren't the best... but now we know there is a particular set of boobs out there

and now we have to see them.

It doesn't make any sense. But that's the way it is.&gt; from what I am told feels remorse for what he has done.

I bet he'd feel more remorse with a shovel to the face

and then you wouldn't have to rely on "what you were told"The definition of insanity is performing the same actions and expecting different results

okay no it's not but isn't that a fun saying?So use something that's flushable. They exist.So use something that's actually flushable.I'm fairly certain what he's saying is he wants to prevent the FCC from doing what we're afraid he'll do.

In other words, he's saying "you guys gave the FCC control over the internet and they might fuck it up. Give it back to me so I can make sure no one will fuck it up."

Problem is, we'd have to give him control of the internet first and just trust that once he has it, he won't fuck it up. Whereas we already have evidence the FCC doesn't want to fuck it up, we don't have to take their word for itHe'd be punished directly? It's a start.The pina colada song.

It's about a guy trying to cheat on his wife-- about whom he's never even bothered learning the basic details-- only to find out she was trying to cheat on him first.

Haha that's so funny I love you so much bae

And it's played as this super sweet romantic song about enjoying amazing breathless moments with each otherIt also sparks and encourages curiosity in wildlife, fostering compassion and creating the next generation of wildlife scientists, vegetarians, preservationists etc

E: that was supposed to say veterinarians, but sure, vegetarian works too. Thanks autocorrect!Broke up. Relapsed. Resumed planning wedding. Later,

"It's not cheating because we weren't Facebook official."

Best thing that ever happened to me.I wasn't sure anyone would know what I meant! That's just leaving karma on the table, manTo complete your original idea? Probably. I don't think you'll be able to sell it in a documentary type thing.Heh, yep, see my editThat is not the point. Anyone who *legitimately* thought Batman was holding a traditional gun is kind of a moron.

The point is that the big, awesome, poster-shot of the Trinity now has Batman holding what *appears to be a gun*

In my mind, it would be similar to that shot having batman in his mech armor. He uses it, we know he uses it, but that's not what I want to see in an awesome Trinity poster.

Batman doesn't need a gun-like device to look cool. Give him a batarang (it can be explosive if you want), or just have him in a super-awesome-Batman-pose. Having a gun-like-device just detracts from the image.it's fucking reddit dude, does anyone actually think i'm giving him the legitimate legal advice of committing assault?

you're not wise or superior, you're just an internet white knightSure, if that's what actually happens.

But basically, they want to take the internet away from the FCC *first,* and then pass that legislation.

So we'd basically just have to trust that what they say is going to happen-- which he can't even guarantee-- is what's going to happen.

Or, we can just let the FCC handle it, who've already shown us they're going to block those things.

(and remember, they've found many loopholes to these things in the past-- they're not blocking "lawful content," they're protecting intellectual property. They're not throttling data, they're prioritizing amongst customers. That kind of thing)&gt; If internet companies want to make deals with other people to help incentivize me to use their services through perks (for example, T-Mobile just released Binge, where mobile data used on video services like Netflix don't count against your data cap), then let them.

But then you're *greatly* increasing the barrier of entry to new (and possibly better) services, and destroying competition.

Netflix never would've gotten off the ground if everyone could go to blockbuster's streaming service and not use any data. At the time, blockbuster would've had the money to make this happen and crush netflix.I understand, and I agree

but the fact that ones marketed as flushable aren't always flushable

does not mean flushable ones don't exist.

We're basically talking about wet toilet paper here, obviously that's not a problem for plumbing. The problem is when they're much more substantial and filled with lots of other goo besides just moisture.&gt; The whole reason Netflix, which at its core started out as a video rental, got off the ground even when it was competing right up against BlockBuster is because they innovated and as such could compete.

Absolutely

However,

If one service had had *no data toll* at all, it would have made netflix irrelevant, even if they were the better service. No one would use it.

You're talking about massive price differences.

&gt; How would anything established like that be any different than, say, when a Mom-and-Pop type of business starts competing against a well-established one?

In a lot of ways it wouldn't. That's why we have wal-marts everywhere and very few local places. I don't know about you, but I wish to hell that weren't the way it was. We lost that battle in brick and mortar, but I don't want to open the opportunity to have the same thing happen online.&gt; It's actually kinda inspiring.

except for the part where they try to cheat on each other instead of just saying "Hey, I'm not super fulfilled, I don't suppose you like pina coladas and a bunch of other romantic shit that literally everyone likes?"

Instead, it's "I'm not super fulfilled... BETTER GIVE CHEATING A TRY!"After the apocalypse, human corpses will rot in the street, and fade to ash as buildings crumble

and only two things will remain unharmed

the roaches

and protein powder.I think this is a "what works for you" kind of thing

If I'm not emptying my tank with the highest weight to the max of my ability on almost all my lifts, I make next to no progress.

The only way I've ever found to beat plateaus particularly is to just increase the weight, even if I can only do a few reps.FWIW it's kind of okay if one has to suffer a little bit (assuming we're talking about lifting performance not form)

this will depend on your goals, but keep in mind you're suffering a bit in one because you already worked those muscles-- you're not getting any weaker, even if your logs show less weight lifted.

You'll find this in nearly everything you do-- if you do *any* compound lifts, you'll find that the first exercise you do will be your best, and any others that use those same muscles are a little lacking.

For instance, if I do pull-ups first, my curls go down. If I do curls first, I can't do as many pull-ups. That's just how it goes.he's talking about the weight he's lifting staying the same, not the reps he does.

it depends on his timeline, but if he never increases the weight or the reps i can't see how anyone can call that progressto increase *mass* all you need to do is eat more.

to increase *muscle* mass you need to increase the work you're doing.

this means, eventually, either increasing the weight or increasing the reps.

please note however that this is over time. you don't need to increase every time you work-out... in fact this is probably a bad idea.

But, long-term, if you're not increasing the amount of work you do (either reps or weight... or something similar like change the speed you do it or increase your range of motion) then you're not gaining, you're maintaining.

if maintaining is what you want to do, great, no problemo. if you want to increase muscle mass though, i'd recommend you do some more research into what's the best workout plan for you, and learn how and what to increase, and when.&gt; The other guy had more or less the right idea.

How? Because the guy in the song thought it was *amusing* that they both wanted to cheat on each other? That doesn't make it not cheating.

The song opens with him laying in bed next to his wife, deciding his bored with her and checking out the personal ads for someone new-- while she continues sleeping next to him. He's literally looking to hook up with someone in bed with her."Descent is spelled with an 's'. Without the 's' it's decent."

(from one of my favorite shows, studio 60)&gt; Are you improving from month to month, season to season, year to year? If so, you're doing fine no matter what you're doing.

well, until bad form catches up with him and takes him out of the game for three months, or he hits a plateau after noob gainz and can't figure out why he can't overcome it/u/brightlinger is spot on, but to add a little bit:

common practice is to set a total calorie deficit *per day.* This way you can do your best throughout the day to make sure you *end the day* with a total number of calories at or fewer than your limit.

However, it's more useful to actually track by week. If you accidentally end one day with too many calories, you can eat fewer calories the next day to make up for it. Just so long as you are at or below your limit for the total week at the end of my week.

So set a target for yourself by day, but track by week.Even if I know proper form, my own limits, and safety procedure

I don't think I can ever sit in a leg press machine again after seeing that one video of the chick's legs getting snapped backwards

e: fuck, it's that one that other guy postedaw yeaLay down.

Now sit up.

How did you sit up? Think through the movement. Did you place your arms behind your head, engage your ab muscles and use them to lift your torso up while your legs remained stationary?

Probably not. Probably you put your arms down to help push you up, pulled your legs in and maybe folded them for more leverage. Basically, you did everything *not* to use your abs to sit up.&gt; Plus Im yet to meet someone whobcan actually spot and dont hold onto the barbell mid rep

who the fuck savage gym bros are you guys working out next to? I hear about this shit all the time but I haven't once seen it.

I did one time-- *once*-- have a guy who came in and helped lift a little too early. Which was annoying but whatever.It is nice, but at the same time, I hate not knowing if I could get the last rep or not. especially because half the time, I can get it... and one more.I don't want to pressure you into something you already said you don't like doing,

but if I can share--

I had the exact same problem you're having until I watched some really in-depth, focused tutorials on proper bar placement. Used to be I'd *always* need the pad thing to squat, or my neck/shoulders would feel super, super sore and painful and I couldn't put much weight on them.

After I took a closer look at proper bar placement i have had zero issues. Squatting way more than I used to, no padding, can't even feel it on my back/shoulders.i think we will find you are mistaken, and this is the trinity money shot

but i guess there's no way for us to know without seeing the movie, and the following marketing

e: i wonder if i'd have gotten upvotes if i had called him a moron and told him to go fuck himself, instead of a reasonable response where i agree to disagree based on lack of available knowledgeit's pretty rounded dude. check it out on slowmo-- he's contracting at the bottom *and* top of his spine and it's definitely creating a curve throughoutwhat's weird is you do a full deadlift, get into a nice position, and almost pause a little before just-- for no discernible reason-- rocking backwards.

just like... don't do that last part, and you're good.Dealing with stretchmarks:

Laser surgery

Accepting them as battle scars and wearing them with pride from a hard fight that you won

Creams/lotions/etc. will not help. Maybe a very, very minimal amount, but not much.

Fat or extra skin:

It's fat.

Losing it:

You can either gain or lose, and that typically means both fat AND muscle. Thought if you're really strict you might be able to lose fat while retaining muscle, but typically you should accept if you want to lose fat you'll be losing a little muscle too, and do your best to minimize the amount lost.

At 5'9", you could lose twenty or twenty five more pounds and look great. Maybe thirty. (but of course, go with whatever feels best to you, don't go overboard)

You need a proper diet plan. That's the most important thing. You need to track your calories and your macros and come in under your limits. That's the only way to lose fat. Check the sidebar for more diet info

Shaping your pecs:

Mostly, just keep working them. It takes a LONG time. But also you can try to make sure you've got a well-rounded program. See the sidebar for more lifting/routine info.

Finally:

To help firm up your belly, you CAN do some ab exercises. This won't get rid of the fat there, but it will help tighten it and keep it defined for when you get rid of the fat. I prefer planks, some prefer ab-rollouts or leg lifts... do what works best for you. Sit-ups/crunches are not usually recommended.

Good luck brah...uh

it sounds like you're maybe looking for ways to cancel out your cheat meal by eating it at a certain time

that's not really the way it works. don't think of it like that. a cheat meal counts like any other meal, gets logged like any other meal, *is* any other meal. you don't cancel it out just based on what time you eat it.1:30pm because that is when the gym has the fewest people in it&gt; Why wouldn't you recommend crunches or sit-ups though?

Eh, you can do some googling to find some in-depth information, the short answer is they don't do a very good job of strengthening your core/abs, and they can have some adverse effects on your spine.

ps okay i got your age and weight wrong but i still stand by everything i said. cut some fat, get on a proper diet plan, track your calories and macrosSounds like shit is "supposed" to be wherever you feel like declaring it's supposed to be, since you're not going by any recognizable objective reasoning I can figure outat the top of the lift.There's another thread on the front page of the sub **right now** about lower back tightness. The reason mine is different from his is because mine has soreness along with it, which is why I wanted to make a different post

**and**

I *very specifically* say mine is NOT a medical problemCan you elaborate on how what I posted broke the rules? It is not a medical issue and I specifically said in the post it was not a medical issue, nor was I seeking medical advice.

It was simply a post about muscle tightness and soreness. Do you want me to start listing threads that ask for advice on muscle tightness and soreness?That's not True, if someone is hired to work and doesn't work they don't have to be paid

But this is difficult to prove, costly, usually goes nowhere and is not op's case, since he actually was working

But simply being clocked in and on the premises doesn't entitled you to pay. If it turns out someone clocked in and took a nap in the back room, that's not working.Not if you've got a contract saying otherwiseI'm not seeing a doctor for soreness, and that doesn't make me a dope. I'd like some advice on how to relieve the soreness, but I forgot how terrible this sub is about mod abuse.Declining sex isn't the same as withholding it. There's a fine line, but not wanting sex isn't the same as saying "No sex for you because you didn't take out the garbage" or whatever.I'm fairly certain you can't be insured with a suspended license

so it was probably suspended license *and* no insurance

just guessing, but that sounds like an insane punishment for driving on a suspended licenseYou don't have to literally make money on an item itself for it to be an investment.

That's not even close to what that word means.

If a person can make a significantly higher salary by getting a job somewhere an hour or two away-- that's inaccessible by public transportation-- he might *invest* in a car in order to obtain that job. Over time the increased salary will be more than the cost of the car.

That makes it an investment.

Similarly, businesses might invest in new computers or machines which make the business more efficient or profitable. Those things are immediately devalued when used but are still an investment.None of us know whether he meant it with offense or if he's just kind of an idiot.

You have to figure that out for yourself. If you punish people simply for the words they use, you're going to have a very difficult time with relationships-- words are tricky and don't always convey the same intent between people.

Those are very loaded words, and if he didn't mean them offensively he is definitely an idiot. But is him making a dumb mistake and being an idiot worth kicking him out of your life? We've all said stupid shit at one point.

On the other hand, he might just be racist. But we can't know, that's something you need to figure out for yourself."I just fell through the cracks, even my lawyer said so"&gt; I started wondering if he wasn't thinking about just me when we were intimate.

Uh, I hate to break it to you, but he almost definitely is. Nearly all men will fantasize about other woman on occasion in bed with their lovers. If you don't like it, that's understandable, but that's the way it is.

Anyway, you've only giving us one side of this argument, and he sounds like he was kind of being a dick **however** this sounds like a communications issue. I think the relationship is perfectly salvageable and you both need to work on your communication-- being open and honest, and learning how to communicate in ways that aren't momentary outbursts or hurtful to the other person. Therapy may be a good option if you find this difficult.

Well, good luck.

ps everyone saying he's being selfish or whatever, or that he has no right to feel hurt/embarrassed/betrayed, look at it from his point of view:

he agreed to something **that his partner was up for and excited about**

his partner then changed her mind **and did not tell him**

he had to outright ask her if she was, in effect, lying about wanting to do it **and she was** (**note:** changing her mind was fine, but it became a lie when she changed her mind but continued to tell him she wanted to go through with it when she didn't)

and worst of all he now knows that it is **his actions** which caused OP to feel unconfident of their intimacy

he also now needs to go tell his friends that the thing is off because **he wasn't connected enough with his gf to realize his words would hurt her**

That adds up to lied to, embarrassed, and humiliated.

And it's all a result of poor communication on both ends. Boyfriend didn't know he was saying something that would hurt OP, OP wasn't honest about her feelings

there has been no evidence that I've seen from OP's post that he's trying to guilt her or pressure her into it or make her feel bad for changing her mind. He's simply confused, embarrassed, humiliated-- all the things he said. He's not a bad guy, from the sounds of it, just one that doesn't communicate well.Cheating is kind of one of those things that everyone has their own interpretation of. Personally, I would not consider this cheating/infidelity.

However, I would consider it a huge betrayal of trust, and disgusting, and would expect any girl who had not given her permission to send these nudes to break up with him upon finding out-- rightfully so.

He sounds like a scumbag. Not a cheater, but a scumbag.If they're good friends and good people, a serious and legitimate talk about how much it genuinely bothers you should take care of the situation. Make sure they know it's legitimate and not just goofing around or faked drama for attention.

If they're shitty friends or shitty people, showing any interest at all, especially not liking it, will only ensure it sticks. It's likely to go away and be forgotten soon if you never mention it. (but that's not guaranteed)

How you handle it from there is up to you.well has he tried that?absolutely tell her now

i hate to break it to you but being a virgin can be a dealbreaker for some people (and that's totally valid) and it will be a lot worse for both of you if you get too far into the relationship hiding something like thatchicks cry over stuff, man. especially over stuff with weddings.

it could be just one of those things. the shock hit her and she cried.

or it could be she still has serious feelings for him.

or it could be she's disappointed she's not married yet and hoped she would be (29 is about the age a lot of women start having that feeling)

it could be any number of things. there's no way to tell for sure. if she hasn't shown other signs of still wanting to be a part of that relationship or not having moved on, i wouldn't worry too much about it.

you feeling hurt and embarrassed is fine, that's natural. getting furious over it kinda sucks but you said you apologized, try not to do it again.

have a talk with her in the morning, try to do it without things getting out of hand.&gt; I'm not sure why people seem to get frustrated about this comment

I genuinely don't understand this sub, but I frequently see OP replies to top comments get *heavily* downvoted, when they're completely innocent replies.

I think the stereotype of this sub is True, anyone who's not advocating fully breaking up over *any* issue gets downvoted.i've had a similar experience

from what i've gathered, i think the difference is it's pretty much just imovie, but more powerful

and i have *never* been able to figure out imovie (haven't tried all that hard though)

so i suspect anyone coming from imovie will have no problem with learning it, while those of us coming from other pro nle's will have major issues figuring it outFor lower positions, I have guys to train. I'd much, much rather have someone who genuinely wants to be there than someone who doesn't.

The best thing you can give me is honesty. I can see an inflated/illegitimate resume from miles away. I can spot bullshit no problem. If you've worked on one thing, don't try to make it seem like you just forgot to include others or that one thing is incredibly, supremely important. Just tell me you have only worked on one thing but are excited to learn more and gain more experience.

Everyone fluffs their resume a little but don't try to sell yourself as something you're not.In movies, there's a concept of "poster shots," essentially beauty shots that, originally, the director/cinematographer knew and sometimes specifically shot so they'd make them into posters for marketing.

These days marketing is a whole different beast, so actually being on a poster is irrelevant, but the term has stuck around.

This is very likely the beauty shot, the badass action shot of the Trinity walking into battle.

Maybe it isn't. I'd say we'll have to wait and see, but last time I said that I got a wave of downvotes.Sure. I was only talking about for the Trinity.Whomever set that policy should recognize most people won't be offended if you go ahead and start cleaning the empty rows, so long as you stay far enough away that you don't block their view. If someone's sitting in the middle you should be able to clean at least all of the back rows, the aisles and some of the front onesI am not a fan of this thread. I love the holidays and the season and that includes flooding things (including reddit) with holiday posts!

What's your favorite christmas cookie?ah, neat, lie to your friends in order to convince them to indulge your sexual fantasies.

yeah that's a great idea.&gt; Edit 2: Also not buying reddit gold when you upvote past the 500 comment karma point, especially when it's close to Christmas.

Is that a thing? I've been without gold for months but I got guilded twice today-- two separate comments.

and they were only alright.this is the stupidest fucking thing to get upset over

you're telling me not only does someone have ancestry where you live

but they're *proud* of it

and this pisses you off?

don't get me wrong, i think it's dumb as hell to have pride in wherever a bunch of people who are related to you but died a long time ago used to live

but why the hell are you upset over it? how is that rude?that was actually way more impressive than i thought it'd beOh man, good oneProducer is a title that can mean just about anything. It's really difficult to nail down why any one person got it. Typically it reflects their contribution to the project, and in theory exec producers are the owners, or at least significant financial contributors. But even that's not always the case.I didn't mention karma until I already had the downvotes

You're the one that's laying in with the insults, which is a bit immature

And I didn't express any concern over my karma, I've got plenty, take a look if you don't believe me. I was just dismayed at the downvotes for a reasonable response-- something that is not what downvotes are meant for.Good callBuffalo buffalo?But which little kid was the real one?actual cinematography posts get flooded and lost in the storm of all the reels and beginner gear questionshell they probably found clients to accept bids then bail for $2.50/hour. $25 a pop? They'd make a killing.&gt;  sadly how human encroachment on these vulnerable and fragile ecosystems

mother nature *made* us what we are!I once worked with a guy (admittedly foreign, so he gets a bit of a pass) who kept telling me where to put the "chimera."

I thought to myself, but we don't have any soft boxes...

I somehow made it through half a day before figuring out he was mispronouncing camera.Not a bad choice!Every time, this comment comes up, as though the poster is making some huge revelation while completely missing the point that while their situation is POSSIBLE, it's not an accurate portrayal of typical twenty somethings in new York, as the show purports to be.Not if it saves you money.

I feel like you completely skipped over everything I said just because you don't want to admit you hadn't thought of it like thatSure. It's a TV show, and wish fulfillment. It's completely understandable they have big sets to perform and shoot on.

But it's not logically consistent with typical twenty somethings and it's silly to try and justify it.Oh man those are great. I think of them as more valentines day cookies but good choice"Ridiculous" scenario. You have had a very narrow life experience.How'd it go?Adjust things in frame so they look better, even if that's not technically how they were in other shots or how they would be in real life.

For instance, if two people are standing talking to each other, in real life they'd probably each be facing each other
But we might cheat them towards the camera, so they're both slightly facing the camera instead of directly at each other.You should ask a superior to remind you what an investment isAs always, anytime I see a ridiculous headline about Donald Trump on Reddit, I can be certain that the truncated and outright False quote attributed to him isn't what he said at all, but a serious mangling and False interpretation of what he actually said.

Trump would be a shitty president. But don't make yourself into an ass by buying all this ridiculous bullshit the headlines want you to believe.No, he didnt. This is so egregiously out of context, and theyve even added words he didn't say to create their own context.I'm on mobile and can't play the clip right now. Is it that difficult for you to go two clicks deep to get it?FYI the garbage in our kitchen is overflowing

Because after six months I decided I wasn't my roommate's maid anymore. 

The trash is my room is just fine. ( and When I actually decided to cook-- which is rare because I can't often muster the courage to brave that kitchen-- I put my garbage in a plastic bag and take it out by the end of the day)

Moral is, try not to judge off things that might not be the person's fault. I usually try to explain the situation to guests before hand, but I don't always get to it, and it sometimes makes me feel like I'm making excuses.This fucking sucks dude, sorry it happened to you. If you want to be done with it and move on that is completely valid.

However... if not there are many ways to recover deleted items from your phone. Do a little googling, odds are very high you can retrieve pictures at the least.This is absolutely her being unreasonable, and you have every right to go inform the landlord who will shut that shirt down immediately.

That said... can you find a compromise? What if she pays half her rent, the tenants pay all of hers, and you keep half? (In other words she pays you half her rent to let someone stay there). Would some type of deal like that make it more acceptable? She may agree to that, particularly when the only other option is you go to the landlord and then spend the rest of your lease with a roommate who hates you.You are also a tenant and have not agreed to the sublet. It doesn't say a tenant, it says *the* tenant, which is both of you. I would investigate further.If everyone paid the same in rent, split it equally. If not, ration it out based on how much they each paid.

Then tell them all if they don't like it they can sue whomever they want and see if a judge thinks it's unfair.

For fuck's sake you're only two hours apart? Reading through it I thought you guys were across the country or something.

This is ridiculous. There's no reason you guys shouldn't  be able to work this out.

Look, don't make her do anything she doesn't want to, this obviously isn't relationship ending, but to me this would be a huge red flag and make me wary of progressing the relationship further until I understood the reasoning behind it. Initially it seems like she's either unwilling to compromise or way too attached to her family and her old life.

By the by, what her friends in relationships do has no bearing on her relationship. It seriously sounds like a kid saying "but mooooom all the other kids get to watch r rated movies!"So ignore her anyway.

Although if it were me I'd  skip the events, at least for a week or two. She's obviously just doing it to screw with you, she'll likely get bored and quit soon.

And no, being friends with her or being polite won't work, as obviously her only goal here is to fuck with you. Keep that in mind.Do you? It doesn't mean you can fuck anyone you want any time, op said in his last post he laid out clear boundaries and this is breaking them.This guy is a moron and has no idea what an open relationship is. Please don't listen to him.

She can't,  and likely no longer wants to, be with you. Sucks, but we've all been there. Do your best to move on.Fwiw, the key to not marrying an adult who acts like a teenager is...

Not marrying an adult who acts like a teenager. They're pretty easy to spot. 

(Cheating, on the other hand, can come from anyone)One of them will feel cheated on because it's cheating. Cheating happens when someone decides to cheat, not because you decided to have an open relationship.

Grow up and learn about the things you're talking about.Yeah, probably. You can't just take people's  stuff. That's stealing.

They ran away. That kills your self defense argument. You attacked them. That kills it even more and provides one for them. You took their guns. That's theft.

Get a lawyer, but you're probably paying for those guns.

You might also find assault charges in your future.I don't understand why you're so adamant to trust in a volatile headline when you can't even check the source material

e: here's what trump said:

&gt; The press has to be responsible; they're not being responsible. We're losing a lot of people because of the Internet. We have to see Bill Gates and a lot of different people who really understand what's happening and maybe, in some ways, closing that Internet up in some ways.

Now first things first: that's a thing that I really do not like. I don't like censorship on the internet. But this is a *censorship* issue. He's saying go see the experts to find out how we can censor the internet to protect people. (in the same way I might say "Let's go ask Stan Lee and those guys how to clean up comic books." I'm not saying Stan Lee is the single person who controls the content of comics, he's just the first name that comes to mind)

That's a bad thing and I don't like that he said it. However, it **wasn't** what the article and headline implied-- he **wasn't saying let's go ask bill gates to shut down the internet.**

And here's the problem I have with it-- now, instead of recognizing that Donald Trump legitimately is talking about censoring the internet-- even for a noble cause-- instead the headline just made him out to be a total buffoon, which he's not. Instead of laughing at him and making him out to be a clown, let's talk about why his political agenda is wrong.Cool man! Learn anything useful?He's basically asking if there's any high resolution vhs formats. Of course vhs had a whole host of other quality issues besides resolution...Your description is a bit vague, can you go into more detail about what specifically you're trying to achieve that you're unable to?don't tell me, tell that guyThe only thing I've learned about pitching is you have no idea what someone's going to like or dislike. Clean cut and well dressed? Some people are going to *require* it, some people are going to really dig the laid back "artist" feel. Comparing to their movies? Some people are going to love the praise, some are going to hate the bs.

Of course, part of this depends on who in the company you're actually meeting with-- the artists or the suits (sometimes one person is both)

The best thing you can do, IMO, if you're dealing with people you don't know is dress well, but still "yourself," and get really good at reading the room. Adjust on the fly.Here's some things to keep in mind:

I have never, ever had someone hire me at a low rate, get legitimate funding, then hire me on at a full rate. Once you're the low-rate guy, you're the low-rate guy in their eyes forever, and legitimate funding means they can hire a "real" director.

Since this is a personal friend and you're not taking a low rate, but *no* rate, this may or may not hold True depending on how they approached you. (And, people will NEVER admit to this way of thinking, you have to feel them out-- chances are they probably don't even know they're thinking it). I *have* done favors for people for no charge before, and gotten hired on later at a decent rate-- but I made it clear the first time I was way out of their budget and doing it as a favor.

Even if they do get signed, there's no reason to think they'll bring you on for more once they get funded

If you don't do the low budget one, there's no reason to think they *won't* bring you on for more once they get funded. In fact, by sticking to your higher rate, that "real director" phenomenon might kick in and they'll say "Well /u/someonewhomakesfilms was so far out of our budget last time, he must be really good, now that we have money we can hire him!"

So, here's what I would do:

Figure out if you really want to do the video and how badly. *Do not* factor in any "potential future earnings," including more work. Your mind is on this video and this video alone.

Do you want to do it badly enough to do it for free? (and can you afford to?)

Then explain to them you're way outside their budget, but since you like them and the project you're willing to work on it for no charge as a favor-- make it clear that it's *no* charge, not shared profits or anything. 

**Do not** call in any favors or pay out of your pocket for anything. It's one thing to do it for free. It's another to donate to it. You're already donating your time and skills, that's enough. Any more makes you a chump and hurts your rep.

That's my take on it. Those are the principles I try to stick by to help build connections and work on fun projects without feeling like I'm being taken advantage of. It seems odd to some but I'd rather work on something for free than for a quarter of my rate (especially if that 1/4 rate is deferred).&gt; Secondly, that's exactly what I read, they didn't add/remove words.

They did in the headline where they quoted him. The part I quoted wasn't added until later.

And yes, you can "close up" the internet, but that's censorship and we don't like it. That's what net neutrality is all about.My guess:

He's the act 3 villain, who requires all of them to team up and fight the unknown threat

and they do, and defeat him

but unbeknownst to them.... doomsday starts regenerating.... and we see the classic eye popping open before cut to black (possibly post-credits sequence)

and like three movies later he's gonna show up as the major badass doomsday we all know and love.&gt; Everyone can die in our universe.

except that superman doesn't die, he goes into hibernation or whatever that shit wasCat&gt; Yeah, for the headline they paraphrased

They didn't paraphrase, they added words, moved words around and completely changed the meaning.I would pay extra for a cappuccino feature on my camera.

Anyway, my contribution this week is (not really about practicals but relevant to using natural light on a low budget): direct sunlight can be reflected. A LOT. I once did a shot where we had sunlight on a reflector, which was bounced into another reflector, which was bounced into a THIRD reflector, bounced onto an actor. All to get some light into a covered porch.

Looked beautiful. (Of course, we're taking six by sixes or bigger, flex fills ain't gonna do it)

I've done similar shit in houses down hallways and whatnot.

It's something people don't think about but it works. Especially if you can mount actual mirrors. Way, way cheaper than a generator and hmi's big enough to compete with the sun.

Of course you need to schedule this properly. If you have your big direct sunlight daylight scene as the last day of your shoot, and it rains or is cloudy, you're in trouble.
Which is an excellent example of a quote being taken out of context and truncated to imply a different meaning.&gt; He literally said "we need to close up the internet"

**He said several others words before and after that which make those words mean something completely different.**

For instance:

When referring to the article, /u/FallenMoons said "It's a bad thing," and "they don't actually give the context in the article."

Those are your words. You literally said them.

Is that a fair representation of your quote?

Of course not. What we're talking about here is a *classic* example of a truncated quote taken out of context used to imply a completely different meaning.that whole thing was interesting but kind of lost steam once the trades started being about publicity than the actual trade.But would you have sold it at its peak?I still have some dogecoin tips. Are those worth anything?WAGONI'm right there with youit's pretty rare that a guy will outright refuse to even try that basic kink though.

you're right, it's possible, but if it's not too deep into the bdsm/bondage stuff, just some spanking and being tied up, i can't imagine too many guys would flip out and say no if they were into the chick.

maybe i'm just too open minded thoughnot being into them is one thing

but not even be willing to *try* them? as in, *anything*?

that kinda sucks. not just because he's missing out on some stuff he'd probably enjoy (though he is), but it's also kind of closed-minded and unrelenting.

i'll try anything once.

okay, that's a lie, there's a whole lot of stuff i won't try ever, but there's a whole lot more i will try, or try to find a suitable simulation for, if asked.great sex is fantastic

but i've never been in a relationship where we couldn't make the sex at least passably good (if both parties wanted to)&gt; they should have one page that just says "play with his penis"... that's literally all you have to do to get us in the mood

i mean, they could elaborate a little bit with things like "no teeth" or "don't just flick it with your tongue"

but yeah, 'bout a page should cover itat one point someone traded some kind of vehicle-- i think a motorbike or a jetski or something? for some way less valuable item-- a very obvious bad trade-- but it was through a radio station or something that was pretty much just for the publicity. Essentially they just sponsored him.

I may have fucked up a lot of those details, but that's the idea.You've gotten great suggestions already, so this is just a drop in the bucket:

but as always i think communication is best, and my advice would be to ask your partner if he can engage in arousal actions spontaneously throughout the day. naughty texting, dirty pictures, that kind of thing.

i suspect you'll find this will begin arousal earlier in the day and keep it going, especially if it's off his initiation, and will make you more eager to have sex with him when you see him.like, haha funny? you saying i'm a clown?books and movies tell her she is&gt; "Angels singing" is of course an exaggeration

which is how OP described what's missing, and why everyone is saying that's not gonna happen. it's an exaggeration, but i'm not sure op is aware of that.so let's see.... i think i have maybe one and a half dogecoins... i'm gonna need siri for this oneHey man, you do you, but here's some things to think about

1) sounds like you're ALREADY the low rate guy in his mind. Given that info there's no way I'd do low rate or even free. Let him know you're a professional by being professional-- demanding a professional rate or passing.

And are you really that upset about offending the guy because he only wants you to work for cheap (which shows you disrespect, I might add) and has shown no intention of getting you real rates?

2) if you can't make the project you want on their budget, you don't really like the project. You like the idea of the project.

Finally, it sounds like no one knows what they're doing, no one's going to respect you or appreciate your work or value, and I honestly can't see any way this project benefits you. That's just my opinion based on what you've told me, I don't know you or the details, take it or leave it. I would pass.Go back and read better, you're arguing what you want me to have said, not what I said.Sure. That's common. A healthy sexual relationship includes pleasing your partner. Not all the time, not every time, but you should take some time to care about their needs even if they're not what gets you off.

That's the definition of a healthy, adult, sexual relationship to me.Someone who never tries anything outside of very basic, vanilla sex is missing out on things they would *probably* enjoy. I stand by that and I'm right.

And no, that's not your point, that's just the only point that reflects what I said. Your point, as you've expressed it, is that if there is a particular thing someone knows they won't like they shouldn't be forced to try it. That's perfectly valid. In fact I outright stated that was my own philosophy.

But that has nothing to do with what I actually said, which is that it's closed minded to put a blanket rule on never trying ANYTHING in the bedroom. That is selfish and immature.Son of a criminal defense lawyer here-- they get that shit all the time. Of course it's worrisome, but it's not credible. Even if he wanted to the cops probably wouldn't do anything about it.The likelihood of that happening seems astronomical. You still have to enter account information and a password of some kind, which means someone would have to have the same name as you, use the same password as you, *and* have an account number similar enough to yours to easily mistake one for the other.Well at least you were willing to give it a shot, which is what's important. And if she's still unfulfilled but you have a healthy relationship she'll communicate with you what she wants.

In mean time, and I know you didn't ask for advice, but for now if that situation comes up again just do the same thing you were already doing. Most of the appeal is being tied up and knowing what you do is your choice, not hers (within the roleplay/fantasy). There are other things you can do to heighten the experience in that scenario, I'm happy to share some of my personal tips or you can look into it a little more, but just doing what you were doing should get you by until/unless she communicates more.

Also, all that said, if you don't want to do it that's perfectly fine too... But hopefully you can communicate and find a way to still meet her needs. For instance, I'm never going to be able to do scat, never ever, but if I was with a partner who was really into that and communicated that to me... Well, let's get some chocolate ice cream or cookie dough and see what we can do.You're not wrong, and I understand the reasoning behind it, but that wasn't the guy's point. OP said "It's not her responsibility." Legally, that's not True-- his debt *is* her responsibility (which is what the guy you replied to was pointing out). OP was using the wrong justification for why he can't give out the information.

However, also legally, the credit card companies can't give out information to people whose names aren't on the card. They have no way of verifying the legality of the union, and even if they could, they have no idea what the person's intentions with that information might be.

I get that, that makes sense, but that's not because "it's not her responsibility"; it is. That's more for confidentiality reasons.Occam's razor says it's more likely she really did just want to pay the bill, rather than that she suspected him of cheating. Both are possibilities, but there's no reason to doubt her statement and it's common for one partner to take care of bills and things.This is way better justification than the top comment. Were we in CMV I'd be awarding you a delta.but has PCI become ubiquitous to refer to the industry? If so, then he is indeed in the industry of PCI.

I really don't know if it has or not, just pointing out that sometimes the acronym can become the actual name-- like how these days, it's actually correct to say DC Comics, because DC is just the name now and doesn't *officially* stand for detective comics anymore.In my experience banks require MUCH more information than just a password to verify who you are. I'm fine with a simple password, I get a little edgy when they want my street address, my previous street address, my date of birth, my social security number, my mother's maiden name, etc. etc.Probably my witty and poignant comments. You have good taste.Maybe he did after she found out she can't pay it on her own.

Or, more likely, they just set it up online after realizing she can't do it over the phone.Maybe he sold it before that

Maybe he would have it today and want to hang on to it until it went back to $65mil.

Just pointing out that it's kind of silly to dread over what you could have made on stock value (which is what this is pretty similar to) if you had sold it at its peak-- because there's no way of knowing if you would have or not. We've all, at one point, probably had something in our possession that increased in value before or after we sold it. But that's no reason to lament having not sold it then, because... that's not when you sold it.that... got pretty dark for what's presumably a children's comicGolden age? Yeah, probably. He had all the other powers, why not.a guy did an ama not more than a month ago, you should check it out. super simple, he was just a guy who had herpes and was advocating for more understanding of the disease. he was really encouraging and put it into perspective, you should try finding itahh, i love the christmas season.this is the best thing ever. this is hilarious.

okay but for reals, this doesn't sound like a problem to me. it's not like you're imagining a hot coworker or something. most guys know about the baseball trick-- if you're getting there too early, think about baseball (or in your case, cooking).

i would say, since you're doing it because your wife is so amazing you'll finish too fast, it's not really an issue and you're not lying-- she probably does feel amazing to you, otherwise you wouldn't have to think about cooking!apparently they also help with (as stated) orgasm *control,* but also erection control and intensity of orgasm. I don't know if I really believe those last two, as more than just something an article put as bullet points to add to the list somewhere because it sounds reasonable enough

but what the hell. can't find any downside to doing kegels so why notsome states define this as rape. (specific sexual contact without consent)

that should tell you everything you need to know about whether it was fucked up or not.&gt;  OP was planning on stopping using condoms with her SO a week after this occurred:

*especially* when talking about sex, this is the lamest fucking justification ever. how dense are you to not know that consent at another time does not mean consent *now*?Dude Marty mcfly jumped the railing that one time. He skipped like ten steps.I gotta be honest, I didn't realize how much I missed highlighted new comments until I went three months without gold, then got gilded.I can't see how filming a technical workaround is much better, but I also get that that's not my call to make. To me, the actual filming of the location is, if anything, what would be seen as disrespectful, not whether or not the cameras technically touched dirt inside the gates.

Though perhaps it was more of a concern that the movie crew, which was undoubtedly huge, would trample the place (not on purpose, but you put that many guys in one place and shit happens. Normally the production just pays for any damage, but you can't really replace that stuff)I'm also fine with 99% of the movie, but what gets me is when Schindler starts talking about all the other people he could have saved if he had just tried a little bit harderwha... what was up with that ending?you're absolutely right, the problem is these kinds of talking-out-your-ass threats are made *so often* that without more credible evidence... if we took them all seriously, cops would *always* be staking out someone's house just in case instead of solving murders or protecting other people or whatever. especially when it's usually not definitive "tonight i will kill you" stuff, but more just "at some point in the future i will kill you!" because then what, you get a cop escort as a personal bodyguard indefinitely?

it really sucks that that's the reality of it, but i understand why that's how it has to be.I'm really glad this all seems to have worked out for you!

However please don't take this as a sign to never engage strangers. Sure, some of them can be creeps, this guy was particularly awful, but being outgoing and meeting new people can be a fantastic experience-- and yes, they can sometimes turn into great lovers.I love everything about this short film.

It's lighthearted and fun

It sets up a crazy world that's not the one we live in but whose rules make *total sense* that you get right away

It's got bro camaraderie-- these guys that have never met instantly know one of their guys is in trouble. They all know exactly what the situation is and how to fix it, and help the guy, because of course, that's just what you do when one of your guys is in trouble

And at the end, she's just resigned to her fate, because, well, dem's da rules. It's all so civil-- they just *agree* that those are the rules, so that's the way it works.

It's so much fun.

Do yourself a favor and watch [the original](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=hTNaWMfwTVM)If you want to analyze it in our world, the whole thing is fucked up. You can't force someone to be in a relationship with you just because they threw their clothes in a window faster than you could throw them out. That's-- what z kidnapping? Rape? Fucked up is what it is.

But to me the whole thing read as playful and fun. Like I said, it takes place in a world separate from ours. I guess part of the assumption is that if this is the way the rules work-- and everyone just agrees that these are the rules-- relationships must really not be that bad! It's all just one big game. No cheating, no abuse, no mentally manipulative so, just fun and games.

I dig that.&gt; Sad part is that it could have gone a lot worse for you. If she decided to tell anyone. Even tho she were the one who fucked up. Because that is apparently how society works.

normally i'd say that's a valid concern, but he had her fucking *name* carved in his dick and likely some marks from the restraints. that's pretty strong evidence.if it's like, one-on-one dinner i can see how that *might* be an issue

but i remember some teachers would hold, like, dinners for ten or twelve kids-- maybe the teacher was supervising the math team and would have them all over, or was teaching a small AP class and would invite everyone over for pizza at the end of the semester

now this was ten or fifteen years ago, so things definitely could have changed... but if that kind of thing is unacceptable now, that's really pretty sad.

picking drunk kids up from parties is a whole different issue.

which reminds me of a teacher i had once who said "now i'm not giving anyone permission, but if anyone ever finds themselves intoxicated and thinking of driving home, well..." implying that he would come pick them up and take them home. I'm sure he had the best of intentions, but I am 100% sure if anyone ever called him in that situation he would pick them up and take them straight to jail "for their own good, to get their life turned around." It was that kind of school.in the defaults it doesn't make a difference at all, but it is super convenient on the smaller subs, especially with threads i want to check back in on regularly (for instance there's one sub i visit that has a weekly advice thread, so i often check throughout the week to see if i can give any newcomers advice)that... *is* the joke of the comic. the punchline isn't "hi hungry i'm dad"when Coffee Mug Dad put the mug on his stomach, I thought they were going to start trying to out-dad each other instead of just give a stare-down. just something to think about.

anyway really dug the comic.I'm not gonna lie to you, some women are definitely not going to like that.

But those women kinda suck so to hell with 'em. (Well, not really, anyone is entitled to their own interests or disinterests)

But there are plenty of women out there who won't mind or who will even prefer it. I wouldn't worry about it. If you want to have sex, go have sex. If you want to wait, wait. The key is to not make a big deal out of it, and recognize that it doesn't change you as a person.&gt; She says deeper penetration isnt something she is crazy about.

From the OP, she said deeper/harder is something she *prefers* but isn't crazy about. I'm assuming that's just OP's awkward way of saying it's a preference, but not a strong one (according to her).how ugly? [this](http://www.tipsyelves.com/mens-christmas-sweaters) site has more raunchy than ugly but if you're getting it as a gag gift they work great

otherwise just browse amazon for a while.

or etsy.I have zero idea how it works for firefighters or whatever, but when my dad (formerly in the air force) needed hearing aids, the burden of proof was whether he could show that the air force was at least 1% responsible for his hearing loss.

That was a pretty easy burden of proof to pass, so he gets his hearing aids completely free.

Of course there are tons of other variables there.I'm gonna have to make a chart on how many Christmases get canceled out by Star Wars so I know when to be excited for Santa again.i wonder if mace windu, as a father, would teach his kids how to spell their nameif i had to guess i'd say the most likely explanation is they all got *stupid* rich and most of them decided they didn't want to work on anything else

until they, like, *really really* wanted to. they basically all went off and just did tons of passion projects-- and most passion projects done by stupidly rich people end up being not very good (see: star wars, but not the good ones)i find it more likely he was just joking about how there's only one black jedi in the franchise, and this guy's the second one.

there's like, what, sixty years difference there? he probably didn't mean it literally.i'm no lawyer, and none of us here know all the details

but self-defense is absolutely a valid legal defense to assault, and he has the scars to literally prove he was attacked first

so a self-defense defense would hold a lot of weight. again, depends on what exactly evidence there was, but that's what i was getting at.&gt; ~~unthaw~~ thaw

i did a little googling and

&gt;un\u00b7thaw
\u02cc\u0259n\u02c8TH\u00f4/
verb
1.
NORTH AMERICAN
**melt or thaw.**

sounds like unthaw is just a synonym for thawnot everyone orgasms in the same way, and not every orgasm is the same. it's possible that's what it is for you, it's possible you'll come across something that'll make it much more intense in the future. it's not really a binary state, sometimes it's more intense, sometimes not so much.i am fairly certain all of them lived very wealthy lives due to the success of star wars. maybe not from direct payments for shooting days, but if nothing else they're making *bank* off royalties. plus many other merchandising, endorsement, appearance-related fees, etc.

even unprofitable movies have to pay royalties (in fact, that's part of how creative accounting can make movies appear unprofitable indefinitely).&gt; That might or might not be effective though.

It would not, especially with the marks on his wrists from the binds.Indubitably!this was a spelling lesson, not a grammar one.

do you get upset at parents playing peekaboo for indulging in their child's fantasy that their faces have disappeared?You used words large and obscure enough for me to believe you know what you're talking about.And I think the teacher should teach her lesson with as much clarity as possible. I suppose we'll have to agree to disagree.&gt; How does using "correctly" reduce the clarity? 

It is beyond the comprehension of children working at this level. Kids need time to develop the ability to understand new, difficult words. You can't just throw any word at them and hand them a dictionary and expect them to be able to comprehend it. That's not how it works.&gt; she could just as easily claim that he had consented to everything

That defense would not work in any real court room, with someone who was drugged, bound and mutilated.The problem lies in that "if."

These kids probably *don't* understand context all that well-- at least, not all of them. But they know what "right" means because parents and games and TV shows have, for the entirety of their life, asking them to point to the animal that goes "MOO" and then saying "THAT'S RIGHT! GOOD JOB!"

Essentially, to them, "right" means "affirmative response" regardless of where it's placed in a sentence.

Not to mention that now the teacher has to explain why "right" isn't correct *this* time, even though that's the word they've heard used all their life (often times even in that context), and-- hell, even *I* can barely understand that, even though I know it's True. Kids understand that right means right. They don't understand that it only means that sometimes, and they're simply not developed enough to understand it.&gt; You underestimate how far/fucked up things can go

No, I have a decent grasp of the law.

&gt; I mean, where's the evidence those marks came at the same time?

Literally any EMT/medic, or hell any generic police officer, who viewed him at the scene would be able to tell the wounds are fresh.

If she were to claim it at a later date, there would be no evidence either way.

And even if she claimed it a little late, the evidence here is *incredibly strong* in the guy's favor.

You're kinda fearmongering, dude. There's a lot broken in our system, but it's not bizzaro-world.As I said, I'm not a lawyer and we don't know the details

but a severe beating can absolutely be in self-defense. It might not be.

"he keeps hitting her longer than necessary to stop the immediate threat" is an assumption you made, not one that was presented. He might have hit her exactly as long as was necessary to subdue the threat. And even if he didn't, technically, that doesn't matter-- it matters what can be proven (or rather, what a jury can be convinced of).

So that's where things get murkier. Again, not a lawyer, don't have the details-- but we *know* he was bound, drugged, and mutilated-- do we *know* that the beating he gave her wasn't necessary to prevent it further? Does the evidence show it *wasn't*? Cuz the evidence sure shows *some* kind of assault was necessary in self-defense.Now pretend a Trump supporter asks you the same question.&gt; But the fact that anyone has to explain the joke means I still have a ways to go, writing-wise.

maybe, maybe not. this is reddit, stuff goes people's heads all the time (even mine), even if it's hilarious. or maybe not even goes over people's heads, but just doesn't strike them as funny so they don't see the humor/joke in the situation, so they don't see it as a joke.I'm from Indiana and it'd never occur to me to say "thaw" instead of "unthaw"

so there ya go.That's pretty much where the rest of us know him from too, though more than a few remember him from his daily show daysI'm curious, what kind of beans are we talking? Baked beans? It seems like a lot of trouble to go to for lazy comfort food.I'm convinced people just like being snobbish about it. I don't prefer it, I'm never going to pick it at a bar, but if someone hands me one I'm not going to chuck it out in disgust.If they do, they're going to be $20+/piece. And maybe more. And they almost definitely don't.

Find a good bar nearby (I always have fun at Mother Burger not too far, but I haven't had their mojito-- try the margarita!) and get a bit buzzed before the show.&gt; I think the threat to him was clearly over.

You don't know that. You don't have those details, and in fact, it's likely the jury wouldn't have those details. Any half decent lawyer could make a *strong* self-defense case here.

&gt; beating her up after the fact 

You don't know it was after the fact. You don't know what danger she presented. What you do know, from what was given, is that she bound him and mutilated him. Can you say with absolute certainty that he was completely, entirely safe once he was free of the binds? From the woman who had just *drugged* him, *raped* him, *bound* him and *mutilated* him?&gt; Cheating is fairly common.

No. It is not.Squares and rectangles. All affairs are cheating, not all cheating is an affair.

(we can argue about this but the accepted definition of an affair is an ongoing relationship)It's entirely possible you will eventually wear her down to the point where she gives in and comes back. For a little while.

How many times do you want to go through this? I'm sorry this happened, but it sounds like it's over. She's not happy in the relationship, and if she comes back, she's just going to end up unhappy again and fucking some other guy again. Or just continue the guy she's probably fucking now.I question whether a single thing you've just said is accurate.Didn't you hear? Trump closed down the part of the internet that kept it completely accurate at all times.&gt; EDIT: It's perfectly normal here in India for people to ask their loved ones if they had their meal. It's like a sign of caring. My bad. Extremely sorry for not making that clear. This is my first post on reddit. :(

Why did you ask the question if you're just going to give *us* the answer you want to hear?what in the fuck she's been hanging out with and talking to this guy for two months, he tried to make a move, he's asked her out on dates, and she's never once said "I have a boyfriend?"

i don't know what that means man, but i would be concerned.Three Little WomenI can totally believe thatI'd tell you, but how would you know if I'm accurate?Rewarding financially? No way. Mentally?... Also no, it's frustrating and eats at your soul. Emotionally, though, absolutely. And if you're persistent enough, work long and hard enough, you might get the first two as well.

The hours aren't great. They're not ER doctor bad, but when you start out you're looking at some grueling hours. When you advance a little bit, the hours get a bit better, or at least you get paid better for over time, but you're still looking at long hours.

The biggest thing to be aware of is the odd hours. You might go weeks without seeing your friends, girlfriend, family, etc.

I wouldn't say employment is scarce, more people are making movies now than ever before... But it's extremely competitive. I guess it probably is scarce compared to other fields, though.

Yes you can work your way up from the bottom, but especially now it's going to be easier for those who have a lot of money. But it's not impossible for anyone. Remember though you hear about the rags to riches stories more than the riches to riches stories, because those aren't as interesting.

What it comes down to is, you gotta want it. And I mean really want it. Most of us would probably say we're only in this business because we can't do anything else.

Anyway, good luck and I hope I helped.
looking through those, i have completely forgotten how to hold a pencil&gt; the black kid with my name got called in, and they obviously knew he wasn't involved.

uh, do you think schools work on some fucked up kind of double jeopardy? "Dang, we called the wrong one in! Well now we have to let them both go."

They'd just call the other guy in after dismissing the wrong guy.if i remember middle/high school, the IT staff is the math teacher. Whenever he's not busy teaching math.not even just for kids, but can you imagine even adults being required to be completely silent for, what, seven and a half hours each day?

that's ridiculous.is it... is it not fewer? i can never remember.its first use was noted as being in Dickens's half-finished and only recently published work, "On Fleek or Off: Telling a Tale of Women's Undergarments"

It has since resurfaced in several notable periodicals, such as Time Magazine and Cosmo, where it entered modern popular vernacular.We already covered this earlier up in the thread, but "Top 40" is not the definition of one hit wonder.When people who love origins don't understand why people hate it...


this shit is exactly why. WB Montreal just didn't put in the love or care, and it's a bunch of small things that ultimately wreck the tone.

In the rocksteady games, if they didn't want you to go somewhere they'd put an impassable gun system, or at the very worst batman would say something like "I need to solve this crime before I go anywhere." That's the same kind of invisible wall, they're both obviously just plot devices to keep you where the game wants you, but at least it's something Batman would actually do. Just a tiny bit more thought and care besides "Don't go here cuz we don't want you to."

Instead you just end up saying "Goddamnit Batman, it's fucking police tape. You can take down Solomon Grundy but the police tape is giving you trouble?"&gt; Though, if there was a negative health affect, it wouldn't be due to the lack of calories, water also has no calories.

well yeah, but these have negative calories while retaining flavor you'd expect some calories. so yeah, not ingest calories isn't directly unhealthy, but the reason it's zero calorie *might* be

though you're right, all of the extensive studies have proven there's no negative health effectsi dunno. i've never actually paid percentage of final bill after a discount, but there have been a few times i almost have (you look at the total, you calculate the tip) before stopping myself and remembering that's a discount price.

And I'm more aware/generous of tipping than most, so I could easily see someone doing it and not realizing they did something wrong. In fact, I'd say the majority think that's what you're supposed to do and just don't think it through that it's a dick move.&gt; your stupid social construct

If you don't want to involve yourself in social constructs, don't involve yourself in society.

Stay at home and cook for yourself if you're too cheap to pay a fair price that society *and the law* recognizes as a social custom. **If** we all did away with tipping as standard, then you'd be justified. But we haven't, and you're not. You're just cheap.Eh, kind of. It's no less valid than it was before. It's not quite the same as a reboot in comics, because it wasn't the official media anyway (even if it was recognized as canon)... and I totally wouldn't be surprised if at some point they continue that continuity parallel to disney's anywaySometimes being able to rationalize plotholes in my mind makes me enjoy a show/movie a lot more. Occasionally if I can't get past something I genuinely can't enjoy it from there (like 21 Jump Street being completely based off a ridiculous False premise).

So I get where they're coming from.

Sometimes though, I can just say fuck it and move on.I especially like how the youtuber lets everyone know who the footage actually belongs to, otherwise I may have gotten confused and thought Disney had transferred the four billion dollar rights to some guy with a youtube channel.

Also, isn't it neat how putting a disclaimer up about not owning the footage makes it totally legit and legal?

(fwiw i'm not saying this guy made any major transgressions, it's freaking youtube, but i'm poking fun at the fact that he thinks he needs to put a disclaimer up, and that that disclaimer somehow protects him from whatever retribution he's imagining)It sounds like they screwed you in a lot of ways, but this sentence is pretty telling:

&gt; I never signed anything acknowledging that program nor did I agree about the $1200. 

because the thing is, you're obviously leaving out some information and just giving relevant facts that you think protect your side. You didn't "sign" anything, which you seem to assume means you're covered, but you don't mention whether or not you actually downloaded it. You don't mention what you agreed to, you don't mention what you said to whom or what you were told, just that you didn't sign anything.

So, the problem now is that there's a high likelihood of you just looking for people to side with you without giving the whole story. I'd go talk to a lawyer, because they're going to be able to poke *all* the holes in your story and get to the bottom of what really happened and what you can do. When you're looking for advice, being one-sided for yourself isn't the best course of action.

for instance, you bring up mandatory overtime with no OT pay... oh no, those bastards!

But wait, are you on salary? Are you exempt from OT pay as a medical worker? Any other exceptions (there are *many* exceptions to getting OT pay)? I don't know. It's possible you don't know. But I find it likely you have a pretty good idea, but maybe don't want to look too far into it and would rather just paint these guys as the baddest guys out there. A lawyer would be able to pick up on all these bits and pieces of your story that have tons of exceptions you're not willing to admit or look into.oh, stop being elitist. it obviously existed back when this was made, otherwise *no one* would get the joke

but it wasn't nearly as prevalent as it is now. it was a joke on a rare occurrence back then, poking fun at the "weird" people, and now is much more accepted and commonplace. That's what makes it prophetic.

The worst part of this is (and this is where I get downvotes), you're just pointing out what everyone already knows to help yourself feel superior at everyone who's not getting what's obvious to the rest of us.

In other words, congratulations on your acute sense of recognizing the obvious.so what is it that's keeping you from making a move, the fact that *she* wants to take things slow because of her previous relationship, or the fact that she keeps going back to them?

because if it's the former, fair enough but then why even say the latter? and if it's the latter, that really has no bearing on whether you make a move or not.it's a gender-neutral insult, unless you're specifically talking about the person's dick hole. i could as easily call a guy or girl a dickhead.What do you want to study them for? What are you trying to learn? What's your end goal.

Pick a topic and seek out things which illustrate that topic. You can't just "study directors" and hope to unlock the secrets of film making. You need to know what you're looking for.Probably not, but I have no idea what your skills are. Most professionals with that title make five to ten times that amount.

But is it a fair wage for you? That depends on more factors than we know.

A good place to start though, is whether or not you're using your own gear. I'd bet that you're using your own gear... And I bet your total package would be at least if not more than $200/day to rent. So yeah, they're probably taking you for a ride based on the value of your equipment alone (this is super common for amateur and low budget projects... Can't afford gear, so hire an operator at less than the cost of the gear)

At the end of the day, whether it's fair or not, it really just matters whether you're happy with it.

Also, you probably won't have any luck negotiating a higher budget. They probably decided what amount they wanted to pay and found someone at that price (and can do so again) rather than finding someone they wanted and budgeting what they're worth.

e: apparently it's $200 flat, not per day. so... that changes things a bit... Wait. Your budget is $800 total?

Are you... Getting a flat $200 for two weeks of work? I thought it was $200/day.

Well, let's just say at that rate you must REALLY want to shoot this. From a monetary standpoint you're far better off searching for other jobs. Not even film jobs, even just washing dishes pays more.

So if you are getting two hundred flat... Yeah, I would make sure you REALLY want the job.

ps if this was me and i really wanted to do the gig but they were only offering $200 *flat*, i'd tell them to put it towards food or extra booze at the wrap party and i'd do the job as a favor. that's a pretty insulting number, and it's better to have a favor in your pocket anyway. plus, you get a little higher ground if someone starts giving you shit for anything. if you get stuck in traffic and are ten minutes late, no one can give you shit for it. you want to go smoke a cigarette but the producer tells you you need to move on, you tell them to go ahead and dock your pay. people are a lot more lenient when you're doing something as a favor than if you're doing it for pay, even if the pay is just $1.

~~but i may be misunderstanding you and you're getting $200/day.~~ saw your other comment. $200 flat for two weeks. ouch, man. if you're actually working two weeks straight, that's $14/day. if you're only working five days a week out of the two weeks, you get all the way up to $20/day. yeah if i wanted the gig that bad i would probably pass on the rate and just do it as a favor.If you're not cracking up in the first couple pages, it's probably just not for you.

Funniest book i've ever read, including the entire hitchhiker's trilogythe bummer is that because you grow your own in the country, they probably think you're the rare exceptionokay, well, where *should* I go in France, then?that's only True if you're in a place where it's easy to find. Go to most rural or suburban areas and you're gonna have a lot of trouble finding it.

Hell, in some places you're going to have trouble finding "cheese." That's it, no qualifiers, just food that is actually cheese and not velveeta or kraft cheese-flavored product.&gt; and then just give them back.

and then he sells them to someone elsethat relationship sounds super unhealthy.

not because he had a weird fetish, but because he kept trying to make you an unwilling participant in it.

that's fucked up.The best place to start is to go ahead and begin directing, writing and editing.

Then look at your stuff and figure out what it's lacking.

Now you know what to study, and you can go study it.

I promise, if you don't know what you're looking for, studying directors won't help at all.nintendo games were and are *riddled* with glitches, they just weren't as obvious in normal gameplay.

just go watch a speedrun vid of, like, any pre-2000 nintendo game. bugs/glitches galore.Here's what you can do:

Call the credit card company and the cops. Tell them he stole your credit card, present them with the evidence, and tell the credit card company you did not authorize those charges. They will seek to verify whether or not you authorized them, and when they find out you didn't, they will refund the money.

They will then track down your brother and attempt to get the money from him. This will probably mean he goes to jail for cc/identity fraud.

Your father will have to do the same.

If no one wants your brother to end up in jail, you probably just need to accept the fact that when he steals money from you, it's his money now. You can either use the law's protections to ensure justice, or not. You can't have it both ways.1) Learn not to be a bitch.

2) Tell everyone else your story so they don't repeat your spineless mistake and send a potentially innocent man to jail.Uh... what?

The idea of basic human rights is that every person deserves a certain amount of respect and benefits that can't be taken away. This is an opinion, in actuality no human "deserves" anything just for existing-- nature doesn't give a shit if you live or die. So "basic human rights" are whatever we decide they are.

In more developed countries, the government decides there are things like having access to food and shelter, maybe clothes, maybe (not always) health care, that kind of thing.

Other countries can not give those things without punishment because... there's no one to punish them. I don't really understand that part of the question.well that's not even a little bit True. we have tons of laws ensuring privacy-- it's kind of a big deal.

you may be mistaking it for not having *absolute privacy* everywhere you go.There's no such thing as an objective basic human right. Like I said, mother nature doesn't grant you any rights at all. Only *people* can grant rights, and they grant whichever rights they decide should be basic. They're just people with opinions, and not everyone has the same one.Corey and Shawn and I don't care if it's not a movieIt definitely was to me, but to be totally honest it's funny in a completely different way. It's more... Wordplay. I don't know how funny you'll find it that a guy named Major Major made it to the rank of Major, making him Major Major Major (technically his middle name is Major too, but calling him Major Major Major Major would be ridiculous) but I found it hilarious

But it's not played for laughs at all, it's completely serious. I mean, the author knows it's a joke, it's not like it's funny unintentionally.

Oh hell you'll see what I mean.My roommates gave me a ton of shit for this but in college I was extremely comfortable taking a long piece of cardboard, one of those foam egg crate mattress toppers, and laying a comforter over both and sleeping on that.

If you like firm beds it's extremely cost effective if you're not one to get embarrassed, and all those items can be found for cheap or free.

If you mean you want a frame, I can't help you except to say keep checking craigslistThat is almost never True.It seems unlikely any single person would get rich off this. They'd need way more research money than any single scientist could afford, meaning they're likely working for a corporation. Even if the corporation made millions off this, it would get divided up amongst the owners.You say it as a joke but marketing companies will buy high karma accounts.Keep going man, it's confusing intentionally and brings it together laterDude, shut up.Dunno. There are other factors though. Go Google it, I guessThey can still do that with an essentially limitless method of adding accessories, but everyone figured out the best way to make money is to keep releasing the same game every year with minor changes, relaxed qc and a shit ton of cosmetic dlcOkay. Now go think about which of us that makes the more responsible adult. The one who lived frugally yet comfortably in a time of financial struggle

Or the one that makes fun of someone for being poorYeah, that sounds totally hilarious. You're definitely hilarious. It's my fault for not understanding how hilarious you are.Creative. I like it! Keeping medical advancements from the public for personal profit, it's the American wayThat's one of the least creative hits ever. Imagine that pitch session.

"Guys, we're losing kids. We need something fresh, something new, for the pre school demographic. Something that really sells it, that no one else is doing. Johnson? What've you got?"

Johnson pulls his head out of his hands, annoyed that loud noises are coming at him. The coke has mostly worn off, but the alcohol is still taking its toll.

"Ugh. Uh. What about, like... A face."

"A face? Explain yourself, Johnson."

"Okay. Uh. Didn't expect you to take that seriously. So it's like, a face. It can be red. Or blue. Whatever, it's both."

"You mean it switches colors?"

"Sure, whatever. And it talks to kids before and after commercials. But it's, yknow, cute about it."

"Johnson, that's brilliant. And what do we call this face?"

"Uhhh....."Eh. Kind of. Not really.It's a lot easier when you're terrible. I'm gonna die immediately by someone, might as well pop a few shots off at the Hero before it happens.well, 1) jack *freed* the slaves. it's not that dark

2) that movie is literally about being enslaved on a pirate shipAnd every time someone brings this up, I feel compelled to say (at the risk of many downvotes),

**that is a fan theory with no direct evidence that that order was given before the falcon left the death star**

it's a good fan theory, it's one that explains a lot and which i enjoy

but it's not supported by the evidence in the movie

so stop declaring it as fact.

(by the way, the stormtroopers are *always* bad shots, not just on that death star encounter)actually it made zero sense.

we have a clear, documented history of the evolution of computers. or are we to believe that computers were following a linear progression but that current iteration of computers happened to be reverse engineered from alien tech, even though there was a clear logical progression taking us there any way?

or did alan turing actually reverse engineer them for the very first computer, and if so why was it so goddamn basic if it came from alien tech, and how did we manage to progress them parallel enough to the originals over the next *fifty* years to still be able to infect them? hell i can't even infect a mac with a pc.

yeah, this explanation just brings up more questions. it actually makes more sense to be like "uh, it was a special program that works with everything"...that was part of the story.&gt; Sauron was actually a lieutenant to a more powerful evil being, Morgoth

who's that guy and what happened to him? (I could wikipedia it but i'm looking for a layman explanation which i'm sure any site online wouldn't give)They invited Bill Goldman (the writer of the book and movie) to set one day.

Allegedly, during the scene where the princess gets her dress caught on fire, goldman freaked out and ran out to put the flames out.

Everyone stopped and was like "Dude, Bill, that's supposed to happen. Y'know... like how you wrote it."

He says oh, right and they reset the scene.

And he goddamn does it again.

They had to take him off set to finish shooting.alternately, allegedly the actors had to go to singer and tell him they couldn't act with del toro because they had no idea what he was saying. del toro had decided his character should speak with a very heavy slur.

singer thought about it, decided he liked it, and told them to just go with it. in the movie, you see a lot of the characters look at del toro's character in confusion right after he speaks, then just ignore him and move on. it's genuine.&gt; -The Wachowskis originally had it in the script that the humans were being used as a neural computer network instead of an energy source. Studio heads decided against this as they believed that audiences wouldn't understand it.

people bitch about this change a lot, and i understand why...

but no one knows if that movie would have been as successful if it had been neural network instead of battery. maybe those execs were right. we don't know if they made the right call or the wrong call, all we know is they made the call and the movie was insanely successful.One sided bias. He probably didn't say it like that and genuinely didn't consciously think that, but that's how the story teller saw it so that's how she told it

e: come on, you guys really think he went on the phone and said "No, I want you to stay my fuck buddy and not bang anyone else, wait for me to call you but sometimes i won't and will go fuck other people but you're not allowed to"? How naive is that?

Nah. More likely he said "Look, maybe we can work things out, let's take some time before you get in a relationship with someone else"

and OP said "Do you want to get back together?"

and the guy said "Well, no, but let's figure some things out first"

and OP mentally decided "Oh so you just want me as a fuckbuddy while you also fuck everyone else, but I can't be with anyone else"i dunno, they all sound kind of like selfish crybaby dicksto hear devs talk about it, apparently this mentality is super frustrating, because people complain about bugs, but devs don't know what the fuck bugs there are (or more specifically, what's causing them) because no one ever reports that shit

they just go online and complain about itshoot it to every festival that has no submission fee and doesn't mind non-exclusive premieres.Eh. It'll be limiting but you won't be dead in the water.

In order of preference, festivals like:

1) Being a world premiere

2) Being a regional premiere

3) Something that isn't available to the public

4) Something that isn't available to the public for free

You're better off waiting until you've done the festival circuitI'm not sure what you're asking. They have the footage and are selling it. It's public domain, so they're allowed to do that without having to get permission or pay licensing fees to anyone.Sure. But you don't have them.grow upthey didn't relight, so i'd suggest it's mostly a time saver and/or aesthetics. there's only two of them and you're not gonna get them confused, so there's no real reason to stick to the line. if they decide one shot would look better backlit, and the other would look better side lit, they can just change the angle. or if they want a profile shot but there's set dressing in the way, they can go to the other side. i'd say anyone looking for a thematic or tonal reason is *probably* looking too hard for depth. more likely it's just an instance where boyle knew he wasn't bound by the 180 line so didn't bother with it.

personally i'm not a fan, the scene does feel a little shakey to me which could be because of that, and not in a good way. but hey, maybe it'll make more sense in context of the movie.which brings up my final point: we're expected to believe that we developed computer hardware *and* software so closely parallel to alien technology in *fifty* years that we could upload a virus to it? Again, macs and PC's aren't even that compatible, and they were developed simultaneously by the same race.

Not to mention that alien tech had advanced fifty years as well. I can't even take a virus from ten years ago and infect a modern computer.

Trying to come up with this explanation raises even more questions than not having an explanation at all.Why do you think film school isn't for you? With your current plan, I think you'll find you never quite have the free time (or drive) to progress as you need to as a professional on set. There are a couple options, but the best "bide my time while I work on getting into the industry" plan is film school. You get to learn, you get to practice, you get to make connections and you get four whole years to work on your craft before you get thrown out into having to get a job.Depends on which budget you're talking about/who's looking at it. It's included in what a studio is going to look at when deciding if a film is profitable or not, for sure. It's not part of the production budget though, because it's not part of the production.What's your experience? What position are you going for? What's your portfolio look like? What's your cover letter look like? Which jobs are you going out for? What kinds of connections do you have? And how long have you been trying?I'm convinced the bubble is going to pop sometime soon. I heard the same stuff in Michigan, in Boston, in... Was it Oregon? Maybe Georgia? Anyway, everyone was convinced they were the next new York/LA, until it all dried up. Maybe Atlanta will be smarter and keep it going, but I'm not convinced.my take on it when people say they *need* to work for free or insulting wages to get a portfolio is...

just go shoot your own stuff. You might as well if you're providing all the gear anyway. Get a basic concept together, something simple, grab a few friends to be actors and go shoot it (if you don't have a friend/equipment to run sound, make it a silent film). You'll not only get material for a portfolio, but you'll get material that you can specifically design to show off your skills. And you don't have to worry about what will undoubtedly be an inexperienced director/producer tying your hands.

the only reason i'd recommend someone go with someone else's project for portfolio reasons is if they're doing something really cool you can't do yourself, which probably means a lot of money, which means a big budget, which means... not the kind of projects that pay you $200.&gt; what will you be able to do with the fact that you have DP'd a feature in the future?

in this day? nothing. people can and do make horrible, shit movies that technically run for eighty minutes, being able to put "feature" on your credits list means nothing by itself these days.a little copy/pasting, a little clever editing, a few look-alikes, some good make-up, a few bald guys not facing the camera aaaaaand what looks like one guy who might even be in a mask or prosthetics.take a long time in the bathroom when there's a line.

the whole time up there, "come on buddy, fuck this guy, doesn't he know there's people out here? so fucking inconsiderate, what's his problem"

then you get in there and it's like "my turn now, bitches! I waited for it, I earned it, I get all the time I want"&gt; more often than not.

...that's not really a standard of quality that fills me with confidenceyou don't get to *not* take the helicopter ride if you're stuck on a mountain during a fire or whatever. it's like the er: no one's going to deny it to you based on your financial situation, but if you have any money, you probably won't afterwards.this stopped being funny the tenth time i saw it on facebook.&gt; throw more men at it strategery is effective

doesn't china win at that strategy?so make a bridge theni don't need or want to see a mental health physician. if i did, i could pay for it. since i don't, i'm not paying for it.

others, however, are paying for it either way.sure, but when you hit the "report a bug" button, it doesn't just tell the devs "hey, something fucked up!"

it tells them exactly what fucked up and how, and what the program was doing before and leading up to and during the fuck-up, and, i assume, loads of other things like software version, maybe what OS, whether any other programs were interacting with it...

whereas online people just say "Hey the thing fucked up, it sucks!"sounds a lot like braidi like how in #2 the artist has clearly spent *tons* of time learning how to draw amazing, nearly photo-realistic (though exaggerated) boobs and body shape

and then you get to the toes and it's like "fuck it"i think there are a few times they heavily imply the parents smoke but don't actually show it... just like with the main castthe very first spin-off was *fine,* in a tbs saturday morning movie of the week kind of way (except if it was actually on tbs it'd be edited for content, which means it'd be twenty minutes of a guy trying to learn how to play the flute)I'm a lot more brazen knowing I'm judgment proof.

"Hey, you signed this contract which says you have to do this thing or we'll sue you!"

"Go for it, bitches. Good luck getting nothin' from my nothin'."i never quite believed this. i'm sure there will be *some* people who try to mooch, but they'll probably be pretty see-through, and if they aren't who cares because you're apparently having fun.

i have plenty of friends, and there's a few very rich people in the group, and we never hang out with them for their money at all. we hang out with them because we like hanging out with them. if they offer to pay for stuff, awesome. it lets us do cool/fun things together we otherwise wouldn't. if they don't, that's cool too.most of them, in my experience, automatically log that stuff and you just hit the buttonyeah that's the oneno, i hate not being able to drive. i love driving. so much. it's so relaxing, it's so convenient. anytime anyone starts getting cabin fever in nyc, i'm convinced it's because they can't drive.

that said, i do love a lot of things about our public transportation system. it is convenient, it is cheap, it's nice not worrying about whether i'm too drunk to drive, the subway gets me anywhere in the city for a couple bucks, etc.

i just really miss driving.dude, what's the one word you can always use to describe sonic, no matter what video game, tv show, comic, or any other form of media?


**fast.**

sonic needs to be fast.

he's not strong, he doesn't have any range

you need to beat on your opponent often, and do it fast. get in, get out.

you seem to be trying to play more mindgames, reading, trying to get in to punish bad moves.

do that shit with a different character, because sonic is all about getting the other guy before he hits you. before he even knows what's going on.yeah, i loved that book.well if i want to talk a day trip an hour outside of the city, sure. but if i want to go to DC or Connecticut for the weekend or something the cost is huge.yeah, exactly.nope, but i've seen this kind of stuff happen enough that no one in real life would say the things op claimed he said, but people often twist their ex's words into what they inferred them to mean (and may even be right, but that's not the point). that may have well been the situation op ended up in had she gotten back with the guy, but i'm positive he wasn't that blunt about it. and not just to not be a dick-- people simply aren't that self-aware.so build a tunnel thenYep, he sure does. After the space dogfight. Nowhere is it mentioned the plan extends to them on the deathstar. There's every reason to believe that vader would have wanted to keep the princess if he *already had* the princess, but changed orders once she escaped

or that vader never gave the actual command to the stormtroopers, but knew they'd get away if he didn't go after them himself.

i guess the annoying thing is, there's always someone that brings up tarkin's line, which shows how much people want to cling to this despite there being no evidence: they point out the line even after i've stated that there's no reason to believe it applies to the stormtroopers **on** the death star.&gt; It depends on who I send it to. Do you want me to send it?

Sure, you can send it.

Sounds like you're in a tough spot. As others have said, Dallas just isn't quite the place to do what you're trying to do.

That said, it sounds like your major problems are diffusion of skill sets and lack of experience (I know, it's fucking frustrating as hell that you need a job to get a job).

What I'd do is one of two things:

1) Lower your standards for being a PA and focus just on getting work as a PA. Check craigslist every day and go for every PA gig that comes up.

2) Get your friends together and start making movies. Make your own stuff to increase your portfolio and learn. Then you can start reaching out to friends or friends of friends and start shooting concerts and weddings, maybe local art shows, that kind of thing. Offer to do it for severely reduced prices, write up a great proposal about how you're looking for experience and willing to shoot their concert for fifty bucks or something.

That's at least a start.a lens, a battery, a memory card is the bare minimum to get it to record.

after that i would get a tripod, then i would get better/more lenses, batteries, memory cards.

after that i would tailor things to the kind of shooting i'm doing.ebay's also pretty good about buyer protectionhow many?you're just describing a typical movie structure.

one main protagonist who's flawed and in nearly every scene. that's how most movies are, or strive to be.No matter how much testing a company does they're never going to find everythingMy dad has the same kind of thing where he always says the same joke that we've heard thousands of times. Watching a big flashy sci Fi movie, just when something crazy happens like the heroes blow up the huge starship or whatever...

"You know, this is based on a True story."

Eventually I started beating him to it. This is why dad jokes never die.I find it likely you're not "recoiling" in the same way, but rather moving away/pushing him away. Recoiling is a reflex, not a conscious decision for a reason.

If you're genuinely recoiling as a reflex, it would indicate you don't want to be kissed/touched by him in general, not just because of the setting/circumstances. A more appropriate word may be "flinch." If someone flinches when you try to kiss them, it's not because they're doing the dishes.I'm a few hours late and don't have an interesting story, but you asked, so...

when my girlfriend made plans to be away for work for several months without even discussing it with me, i knew it was time for a talk. We had always been on the precipice of "Will things last?" because there were several barriers, and that was the time I knew that no, things aren't moving forward in the relationship and they aren't going to.

It's not that I was mad she was leaving, I would have supported her, but not even being a factor in that decision or her even talking to me about it first was a pretty clear sign. We talked about it and ended it amicably, we both knew it meant we weren't moving forward.Nah, George would find out the SO was never sneak-moving-in at all, he had jumped the gun because she had to leave some clothes at his place because her cleaners closed for a few weeks, and all of a sudden she comes home and he's moving his couch into her apartment while she was supposed to be at work.

"George, if you had a problem with my clothes at your place you could've just said something."

"Ohhhh ho ho no, that's just what you *want* me to do! I talk to you about your clothes and you convince me to let you move in, and then it's not 'my' apartment, it's 'our' apartment. Well you can have it!"I had a high school friend who this happened to once, except instead of a teen pregnancy it was a *fake* pregnancy she came up with to get him to support her... so he goes off to the armed forces (think it might have been navy) to support his family, sends her money, comes back and finds out there's no kids and she's been banging everything that moves.

Really feel for that guy.yeah, but does she have to practice on other guys? i mean, what one of us here would turn down extra practice sessions?it's early for a typical relationship. usually two to three years is most common.

of course, some do it in six months. hell, some do it in a few weeks, and i bet we can find someone that did it day of.

and then some who don't do it even after ten years. there's the whole spectrum, but yeah, typical is two to three years. and that's of people who have moved in at all, many date for several years without ever moving in and usually end it (imo, the reason they never moved in is because they knew in some form it wasn't going to be a permanent relationship)eh, academic integrity aside simply doing the essay for her isn't that big a deal, it shouldn't be outrageous that a married couple share the workload based on who can do what when

it's the specifics surrounding it that made it suck.it boggles my mind how terrible some people can be. like, a total lack of human decency. when i hear about some people's ex's, i'm amazed they were with them at all. i know what self-delusional can do, but still... boggles my mind.

even if i gave zero fucks about someone i wouldn't *laugh* when they cry. i'd at least feign comfort, and i'd expect any normal person to do the same.what counts as a long trip? My last SO and I did a four-day vacation, had a blast. The one before did about a week and had a ton of fun. I know it's not a perfect indicator, you can still go on trips with someone who's not right for you, but do you think it needs to be more like two weeks? or just a couple days?good point, we should probably make it a bridge insteadrum and coke is the nectar of the godsi have a friend who apparently doesn't understand how notifications work.

i'll get:

two calls in a row

texts "hey whats up"

"hey"

"?"

"hey whats up"

"dude where r u"

"hey"

followed by another phone call

no matter how many times i try to explain it to him, he still does it. there are only two options here: either i am unable to respond, or am unwilling. either way, texting me *more* isn't helping the situation! one is just fine!also, like it or not, there are some people that would have a huge problem living with a bi or gay person, so best to just let them know up front so they can decline the apartment, rather than them finding out two weeks in when one of the dudes brings a dude home, and the new roommate flips their shiti have a friend who will kick into that mode occasionally, and it's really frustrating. 90% of the time he's an awesome dude and one of my best friends, but for some reason every now and then he needs to be top dog and just shits on someone (he usually picks one person too, whoever's the easiest target. I'm convinced he doesn't realize he's doing it, something in him just wants attention and he does things that get it)oh for sure, your particular scenario is total bullshit. i'm just saying, it's not bullshit because you were doing the work, it's bullshit because of the situation around it.&gt; I mean is it really any different that any other blood?

No. Do you expect us to be totally cool with getting covered in, or shown in the toilet, any other kind of blood?

Besides a few exceptions, *most* bodily fluids are pretty gross. They're natural, they're healthy... they're still gross.&gt; The more time I spend on reddit, the more I realize how many girls have crazy expectations for men's genitalia.

I mean, that's the thing. Sure, there are other ways to get a girl off but *some* really prefer the dick, and after a guy comes there's not a lot of incentive there for him to get it back up, so she's going down furiously to get it back up and keep going and I'm just kinda like "ehhh that's... probably not gonna happen"so, real talk, how often do you masturbate and how often do you have sex?

i noticed it got *way* easier for me to orgasm during sex when i completely stopped masturbating. if i still do occasionally, it's much more difficult for me to orgasm during sex.

something to think about.you bastards are the reason i have to stand eight feet away from public urinals to take a leakugh, i don't get how people can do this. it's so fucking uncomfortable.&gt; cockholes

uh, that's not... uh..i've had it happen veeeeery few times (and, by the way, it's not a measure of how good the sex was, so don't start thinking if your man hasn't done it you didn't do a good enough job or something)

but i've done it to plenty of women, so i assume it is in fact far more common with them. maybe something about stronger/more orgasms?apparently scientists (look how specific i am) have concluded that the pain factor of a male passing kidney stones is higher than that of child birthit's really funny watching tv shows that span this period, the early episodes are all "Ugh, where is this person, I wish I could find them but they're not where they said they'd be"

and then halfway through season 5 or whatever it's just "Oh I'm going to text Jake on his cell to tell him what movie times I just looked up on my phone" basically out of nowhere. They're not there, then they're there.eh, people keep saying this... but i greatly prefer my dslr. my phone can't do manual controls and the zoom is terrible. maybe other phones have better control/quality, but i'm on a fairly modern one (droid razr maxx)well, but he doesn't though. he uses the laws of nature in improbably ways, not impossible ways.

except when he does it in impossible ways.

but he didn't that time.if any part of the world wasn't submerged, it's kind of missing the whole point. in other words, god woulda dun goofed.okay, but there's a huge difference between "some major floods happened!" and "the entire world was literally covered in water while exactly two of *every single animal* were all put on one big boat for forty days to repopulate the earth"

with the first one, y'know, okay that makes sense.

with the second one it's like... where do I even *start* explaining how impossible and illogical that is?no it wasn't. it was released in 2014, but had most of its run in 2015.okay, i figured out why this sounded so off.

it's actually listed as the highest grossing movie of *2014*, because it was technically released on christmas of 2014 (i knew there was no way in hell it beat avengers).

this makes it a bit trickier, because in that list it's competing against movies it didn't actually compete with. 2014 was way more relaxed in terms of the big franchises, because all the other huge tentpole franchises were gearing up for big releases in 2015.

also, this is domestic only, not counting foreign box office

e: but yes your point stands that it's very surprising that a movie with that subject matter made that much money&gt; I can't believe someone thinks this is good PR for Jesus.

i'm pretty convinced at that point they're not saying it for you, they're saying it for themselves.That's less funny and more just douchey.A good server will ask if they're ready for it first, so they will have indeed ordered the check.

Note: technically proper etiquette is to ask if there's anything else you can get them, or if the restaurant is pushy about upselling ask if they want dessert, and if the answer is no it's strongly implied the customer should ask for the check. Either way bad move to just bring it unasked.... What are YOU looking at? Because that shows the release in 2014

E: the first line of the article even says it's a 2014 movieIt's never been that hard for me to understand (I'm a non-believer). Someone loses their daughter, you don't think it's easy to believe they're literally in a better place and you'll get to be with them again someday?

Someone is going through a crisis and has no idea what to do with their life, you don't think it's easy to believe someone has a plan for them and will put them on the right path?

Someone experiences huge personal tragedy, you don't think it's easy to believe something made it happen for the greater good?

I can't bring myself to believe it, but I completely understand those who do.

I was working a mentalist/speaker of the dead show once, and it was 100% exactly what you'd expect with the guy using what was overheard before hand and general intuitiveness to make vague guesses about people's relationships. Completely see-through from an objective viewpoint.

"I'm seeing a name that starts with an H... anyone here have someone that starts with an H?"

"Yes, I do."

"I'm seeing a close relative... a brother? A father?"

"No, my roommate's sister."

"Ah, must not be you then. Anyone else? A relative that starts with H?"

"My step-father's name was Henry."

"Yes! It must be you! He says he misses you and loves you."

"Oh that means so much to me."

that kind of thing. (somewhat more in depth, the guy was super skilled at it, but that's the basic idea)

And yet all these people believed it 100%, simply because they wanted to. It was comforting to them to believe that their loved ones were at peace and still existed in some form and still cared about them.

ps and there were a few times when it didn't work, of course. the guy would say "I'm getting a Frederick... any Fredericks? No? No one with a Frederick? That person must've gotten lost on the way here!" "hahahaha." and they kept right on believing itThere's a corner on 42nd street in manhattan i can stand on and see three starbucks.i think the difference is they maybe don't *want* it as much as men, but *enjoy* it as much as men (generalizing, of course)

sounds like a semantics difference but i think it explains why some men go to absurd, and occasionally disgusting or pathetic attempts to get it, while women usually don't.i honestly don't know what in the holy hell has convinced you it was released in 2015. literally nothing anywhere is saying that, even the wikipedia article you gave says it's a 2014 movie, released *to theaters* on dec. 25th 2014.

i mean... that's as definitive as it gets.this tends to lessen significantly after high school, then college. it still exists, but most normal people recognize those people are scumbags.ayup. you can tell the difference between complaining and bragging from 1) who brings it up first (if you mention you got little sleep and they one-up you, that's bragging) and 2) when it gets into the realm of impossibility. want to complain you only got three hours last night, okay, that sucks. want to "complain" that you've only had five hours of sleep for the past 72 hours? No, I don't believe you and I'm not impressed (unless you are a doctor working in the ER or something)no, you can definitely manage it, there's something mental that's holding you back.

wake-up call.

(by the way, there's nothing wrong with not sleeping with chicks, and there's definitely nothing wrong with not sleeping with shitty chicks... but it's certainly not impossible)having a massive tolerance sucks

1) you have to spend way more money to get drunk (freaking annoying when my date wants to go to an expensive bar, to her it's twelve bucks for a drink that gets her drunk, for me it's twelve bucks to not even start feeling a buzz)

2) it's a lot harder to hit the line between "drunk" and "too drunk," so you often end up either buzzed but not drunk, or falling down hammered.it *was* released in 2014. I honestly don't know what you're getting at. Yes, let's look at where it says "Release dates". Quoted directly from your source:

&gt; Release dates
November 11, 2014 (AFI Fest)


&gt;December 25, 2014 (United States)

Both of those are 2014. Neither is 2015. Nowhere does it say it was released in 2015.

And i'm not arguing with the other guy, I'm arguing with *you*, who said it was released in 2015. It was not. I honestly don't get why you're still going on about this, besides that you must be the worst troll ever.&gt; nearly as deadly

point of contention, something is either deadly or it isn't. if it's "nearly" as deadly, it's not deadly.Anytime I get the heroes I always manage to die before I kill anyone. I don't know what the fuck I'm doing in this game.that's a difficult situation. it's easy to say after the fact, but in the moment you're the guy who's being a pain in the ass, everyone else is just going with it, and the dude's not *wrong,* you are using his services which no one forced you into, it's just a dick move of him to wait until you're in the car to say anything.

in other words, easier said than done. do you *really* want to start a fight with your friend's dad, and probably your friend, which may ruin the night when you're just looking to have a good time?

e: okay, i guess you're all a bunch of total badasses who absolutely would have raised hell as a pressured 16-year old against a grown man who's completely in control of you and could drop you on the side of the road because the guy was being kind of a dickbag. you're all very, very cool.&gt; Unless the captain refunded each player pro rata to each player (about $2/player?), we can assume he pocketed the money.

there's a small chance the captain refunded the $10 to the player who couldn't make itthat doesn't matter. you don't get to call in what someone "owes" you when you "owe" them more for the exact same thing. That's not how owing someone works.

If the father had been in desperate financial straits, the proper thing to do would be to explain the situation and ask for some help.

Or, as others suggested, tell them they need to eat before hand or on their own.I'm not disagreeing, I'm just saying it's a lot harder to say no when you're a teenager in that situation&gt; it is entirely wrong for that man to demand payment.

i'm not disagreeing at all. what i'm disagreeing with is all the people saying they definitely wouldn't have paid.

you very likely would have, as would nearly all of us.if they *hadn't* died in that accident

but you had found out they were driving under the influence

would you be okay with personally killing them? Would you be willing to walk up to each of them with a gun and shooting them in the head?

Probably not, because condemning someone to death for a stupid, immature mistake is not what we want to do.

And yet somehow, you're doing it anyway.I don't understand the point these videos are trying to make.

1) A huge amount of new yorkers are just going to say "No" to get you to leave them alone because they think you're trying to scam them out of something. They won't even really look at the guy

and 2) ask enough people *any* question, even the most obvious ones, and you're going to get some who don't give the right answer. They freeze up, they forget, or they just don't know. I'm positive this video isn't an accurate representation of all the people they askedSeems like a lot of it has to do with exactly where he's aiming though. Doesn't kill my believability if a trained gunsman stands a foot away from the lock, knows exactly where to shoot it and fires, especially if it's a bit of an older lock.believe what you want, but it's not an impossibility for anyone&gt; An editor is not there to service a director.

Yes, they are, just like everyone else on set. We're all there to put on screen the director's vision as faithfully as possible. Editing is quite literally a service you are providing.

That doesn't mean you should take abuse, it doesn't mean you need to be a loyal lapdog who gets barked commands and obeys them

but you'll be a lot happier when you realize your job, and your only job, is to get what the director wants on screen. And if that means doing what the director wants instead of what you want, that's the gig. (In fact, it should probably *not* be the gig because it probably means you're the wrong guy for the project, if you're in frequent major disagreements)

the only time you *aren't* "servicing the director" is when the producers tell you to do something different. in which case, time for a talk...The most important thing is do what you're told and do *only* what you're told.

For your first day, just do that.

After that, you can start being a *little* more assertive, asking if you can get anything for anyone, what you can help do, that kind of thing.

And remember, if you don't know something ask. **Do not** try to figure it out on your own. You might break something, you might hurt someone, or worst of all you might look really stupid. No one's going to blame you for asking questions.Be honest

is every clip here from a project you've worked on? Are these all from videos online somewhere I can go watch? It seems like a lot of these are just you playing/messing around, testing out your camera, and maybe even a few that you just got for your reel.

Build up your portfolio first, and then take your shots from that.

You'll understand why once you've done it.nope, i was one of the failures who decided i didn't want to anymore.If I had work that I couldn't get done but she was capable of doing, absolutely. In fact it's very common for someone to ask their spouse to go in and file papers or something for them if they're unable to do so. Hell, I've helped my parents out even at their work."I'm not dealing with this shit" man.

"We need to keep our identities secret! Have you come up with an alter ego for yourself?"

"No, Batman. I'm not dealing with this shit. Let's just go punch some bad guys."man, you know what offends me? you have *bill freaking nye* on your show and you waste like thirty seconds on whether or not he was making a dick joke. you don't have anything better to talk to him about?

e: i paused too early. they went on for like a solid minute. "Ohhh DICK jokes! Hahaha" SHUT UP AND LET THE MAN TALK ABOUT LIFE ON MARS GODDAMNIT.i totally understand why they thought this would be a good idea. it sounds like a good idea. let's have one of the leading scientists on to talk about and explain these recent revelations, then let's have common people to represent, well, all the viewers to see how bill nye can explain to them why the common people should care about this.

the problem was these specific people were like "Man I don't care bout none of that shit!"

Personally I would *love* to be asking Bill Nye why this is important... because I don't really know. He did a fair job of explaining it, but he had to spend more time just convincing them not to be morons.i believe that was the jokewell, here we run into a problem. racist/sexist jokes are okay as long as *you specifically* find them funny? why do you get to be the decider on what's allowed to be racist/sexist?

a better way of putting it would be racist/sexist jokes are fine so long as they're *jokes.* As in, an actual joke that's not just someone being racist or sexist. Even if I don't find it funny, I at least appreciate that it's done for the art of comedy.

But if someone's like "Man, I hate when those lazy black people get into the group, they never get any work done."

"Dude..."

"Come on, it's just a joke!"i am 100% behind this so long as it means i get a refund on the taxes i pay for the city street cleaners.you know what's worse than that? the people who, when you do hit your turn signal ahead of time, speed up like a madman to prevent you from changing lanes in front of them.

*that is not why I turned on my signal.*i think that's more a middle class thing, really. when you're *poor* you go bargain hunting on craigslist. i suppose that might just be a factor of changing times and having the internet as a resource.said by people with good money to spendis... does lemonade not mean what i think it means in this context?not quite the same, but apparently they had a way different direction in mind for the character until LeBlanc came on and they saw what he was doing with JoeyI'm almost sure they had special bras with nipples built in or somethingthere was a whole episode about it...

what gets me though isn't just that they were rich, it's that to be "I can afford a two bedroom apartment *in the village* on my salary" rich, you have to be *rich.*

And they don't act *rich.* I know people making crazy amounts of money and they still need a roommate for their 2-bedroom in the east village.

There are certainly rich people at that age out there, and it could probably be from someone in the jobs those guys held...

but 1) that's definitely not the attitude they took and more importantly

2) it's supposed to be a show about typical 20-somethings in new york, not the extremely rare outlier

so yeah, you can technically handwave it away, but that's a lot of mental gymnastics to excuse what's obviously a logical oversight for the sake of good television.unless he was the director of the museum, he's probably not going to be able to afford that apartment. he was living in (in today's money) what would be around $4k/month. It's suggested you spend 1/4 of your income on rent, meaning he'd need to be making around $192,000/year at the museum.

Even if it's very well funded, he's probably not making that much for just a regular position at the museum. (Although he might if he had supplemental income, I can't remember was he working at the museum and as a professor at the same time?)episodes went off the rails with the latest season. first season was great, second was good but not as good, but it got progressively worse.

how they ended it i only have the faintest bit of curiosity. the big "problem" at the end makes zero sense. none at all. that's not even a little bit how that works (frustratingly, for being a show written by such a prolific writer, *about* writers, it gets a lot wrong about how being a writer works... and not small stuff, but series-changing stuff)yeah schwimmer tried to go the directing route but no one really gave a shit. i'm sure it's been keeping him busy though and he'll be able to guest-direct episodes of television pretty much any time he wants to.maybe tom selleck? i'm not, y'know, willing to go look it up or anything but my guess would be that or monica's/ross's dad.well, i don't know how it worked back then but it's possible they got some kind of advance or somethinghe would have definitely been paid for the pilot, which definitely would have been catered.it's pretty difficult to *ever* nail down "how much money someone has"

were they including debt? were they including credit cards? were they including liquid assets? what was in his bank account?

they may have just been including what was literally in his pocket that day and not mentioned the fact that he had a $10,000 check in the mail that he got the next day.

take it with a grain of salt. the point is he was pretty poor, and that's probably relatively True, but he likely wasn't sleeping in a gutter trying to decide if his last $11 should be spent repairing the hole in his shoe or buying himself food for the first time this week.he should play a montage of all the clips he was supposed to show on conan but never did. like a two minute mash-up of every trailer.You can always quit. Nothing can ever legally keep you in any job.

In very rare instances, there will be a clause in a signed contract stating that damages/penalties must be paid if the employee terminates the contract early.

If you don't have this clause in a signed contract-- if you don't have a signed contract at all-- you can walk away and never have any repercussions.

(besides the obvious technically they can sue you even if they don't have any grounds, which could be annoying)sure, if you can prove they were lying.

but can you prove they weren't just mistaken? can you **prove** they knowingly told a lie, instead of just mis-remembered, or mis-heard, or some other form of not totally understanding the situation and were simply speaking to the best of their abilities, even though their statement was incorrect?

also, keep in mind it's not perjury if you go on stand and correct your statements. so everyone who switched their stories is cleared, it's not perjury if you switch your story.it sounds like they were all friends of the woman, and she was abusing her power knowing that the bartender and bouncer would have her back.

the cop was probably just mistaken, though he could have *really really thought* OP was guilty and stretched the truth to make it more convincing (it's more frequent than we'd like to admit)Shit gets lost in the mail, dude. It sounds like a lame excuse but it really does happen....guys, is it really that important we nail down an exact analogy? the thing's super rare. got it.That's a pretty shitty thing of him to do, though. The idea is that he's covering it so no one, even the owner, will realize it's gone, right? How is that any different from taking it out of someone's wallet when they're not looking?

Also, just because it's on the ground doesn't mean it's up for grabs. The law backs me up on this.I used to be addicted to hokey pokey.

Eventually though I managed to turn myself around

(I just came from the dad jokes thread)I'm not sure what you're reacting to, but it's not resolution. By definition, if you're looking at something, you can't resolve it any better than you can resolve anything else. Your eyes don't get sharper just because you're looking at a thing on a tv screen.

You may be noticing stronger backlight, or just an increased sharpness from other screens. You may be noticing higher color contrast (which adds to perceived resolution) or post-sharpening processes which can also increase perceived resolution.

But you can't naturally resolve a tv screen any more than you can resolve anything else.From my very poor understanding of "infinite," if something is truly infinite and possible, the thing will absolutely exist at some point within the infinity.

This means if there are a truly infinite number of universes, inter-dimensional travel must not be possible.There are two possibilities and anything anyone else says is wrong.

The first is that there aren't a truly infinite number of alternate realities.

The second is that inter-dimensional travel isn't possible.

In a truly infinite amount of realities, by definition, if inter-dimensional travel were possible it *will* absolutely have been invented and one of the dimensions *will* absolutely have contacted us. That's, like, the definition of the word infinite.But where did the half come from?&gt; SO multiple generations had to have been a shitty flightless form that was less efficient then both the future animal and the previous version.

I don't think that's how it works. Evolution doesn't look long-term. It looks for right now. It picks the features that make the animal best able to survive right now, given the minimal changes it can make. So on its path to become a flying animal, each iteration would have had to be more efficient for survival than the iteration before. That means each single step it took towards flight had to leave the animal better off than it was before.buuuut isn't evolution actually more concerned with reproducing than survival? And aren't we still reproducing? Meaning we're still *evolving* traits that are most likely to get us to reproduce, even if "intelligence" keeps us from dying.

So it seems to me, and granted this is a very short term thing that may not stick around long enough for evolution to do its thing-- but it seems to me what we're actually evolving towards are people either uneducated about birth control and/or those with very high sex drives.

In other words if we're evolving into anything, it's a bunch of horny dumbasses.THEN WHAT GOOD ARE YOU&gt; There are many things "truly infinite", but not many of them are all encopassing. Think about it. If you gathered every possible real number, you'd have a truly infinite amount of numbers. If you decided to take the half of that True infinity, y